The Project Gutenberg eBook, The Meadow-Brook Girls in the Hills, by Janet
Aldridge


This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org





Title: The Meadow-Brook Girls in the Hills
       The Missing Pilot of the White Mountains


Author: Janet Aldridge



Release Date: February 26, 2006  [eBook #17865]

Language: English

Character set encoding: ISO-646-US (US-ASCII)


***START OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE MEADOW-BROOK GIRLS IN THE
HILLS***


E-text prepared by Al Haines



Note: Project Gutenberg also has an HTML version of this
      file which includes the original illustrations.
      See 17865-h.htm or 17865-h.zip:
      (http://www.gutenberg.net/dirs/1/7/8/6/17865/17865-h/17865-h.htm)
      or
      (http://www.gutenberg.net/dirs/1/7/8/6/17865/17865-h.zip)





THE MEADOW-BROOK GIRLS IN THE HILLS

or

The Missing Pilot of the White Mountains

by

JANET ALDRIDGE

Author of the Meadow-Brook Girls Under Canvas, The Meadow-Brook Girls
Across Country, The Meadow-Brook Girls Afloat, The Meadow-Brook Girls
by the Sea, etc.







[Frontispiece: "I'm the guide, Janus Grubb."]





The Saalfield Publishing Company
Akron, Ohio ---------- New York
Made in U. S. A.
Copyright MCMXIV
By the Saalfield Publishing Company





Table of Contents


CHAPTER

     I  The Man with the Green Goggles
    II  Miss Elting's Mysterious Caller
   III  The Start that Came to Grief
    IV  An Exciting Night
     V  On the Burning Bridge
    VI  Their Troubles Multiply
   VII  Horses Give the Alarm
  VIII  Crazy Jane's "Find"
    IX  Scaling the High Cliffs
     X  A Slippery Climb
    XI  The Tragedy of Chocorua
   XII  Tommy Falls Out of Bed
  XIII  Placing the Blame
   XIV  Giving a Toboggan Points
    XV  Leaving the Trail in a Hurry
   XVI  "Such a Lovely Slide"
  XVII  What Came of Shooting the Chute
 XVIII  Face by a Fresh Mystery
   XIX  The Story the Light Told
    XX  Seeking a Desperate Revenge
   XXI  The Ascent of Mt. Washington
  XXII  A Rout and a Capture
 XXIII  A Mysterious Disappearance
  XXIV  Conclusion




Illustrations


   "I'm the guide, Janus Grubb." . . . . . . _Frontispiece_

   "Green goggles!" cried Harriet excitedly.

   Up and up wound the trail.




The Meadow-Brook Girls in the Hills


CHAPTER I

THE MAN WITH GREEN GOGGLES

"I hear that Janus Grubb is going to take a passel of gals on a tramp
over the hills," observed the postmaster, helping himself to a cracker
from the grocer's barrel.

"Gals?" questioned the storekeeper.

"Yes.  There's a lot of mail here for the parties, mostly postals.
Can't make much out of the postals, but some of the letters I can read
through the envelopes by holding them against the window."

"Lemme have a look," urged the grocer eagerly.

"Not by a hatful.  I'm an officer of the government.  The secrets of
the government must be guarded, I tell ye.  There's six of them----"

"You don't say!  Six letters?" interrupted the grocer.

"No, gals.  One's name is Elting.  She's what they call a chaperon.
Another is Jane McCarthy--I reckon some relation of the party who wrote
me a letter asking what I knew about Jan.  I reckon Jan got the job on
my recommendation."

"Who are these girls, and what do they think they're goin' to do up
here?"

"Call themselves 'The Meadow-Brook Gals.'  Funny name, eh?" grinned the
postmaster, balancing a soda cracker on the tip of his forefinger, then
deftly tossing it edgewise into his open mouth.  "They pay Janus ten
dollars a week for toting them around," he chuckled.  "Read it in the
McCarthy party's letter to Jan."

"What are they going to do up in the hills?"

"Climb over the rocks for their health," grinned the postmaster.

"Huh!  When they coming to town?"

"On the evening mail train to-day.  Hello!  There's Jan now on his way
to meet them.  Say!  Will you look at him!  Jan's had his whiskers
pruned.  And, I swum, if he hasn't got on a new pair of boots.  Git
them of you?"

The storekeeper nodded.

"How much?" demanded the postmaster.

"Four seventy-three.  Knocked down from five dollars.  Wish I'd known
he was going to draw down ten dollars a week for this job.  I'd have
got four seventy-five at least for the boots."

"Never mind, you can let Jan make it up on something else," comforted
the postmaster.  "Reckon I'll go down to the station to see the folks
come in."

"I was going to ask you to look after the store while I went down,"
returned the grocer.

The postmaster decided that he wouldn't go.  The other man hurried out,
while the government employe helped himself not only to another handful
of crackers, but to a liberal slice of cheese as well.  He stood
munching his crackers and cheese and gazing out reflectively into the
gathering twilight, when he suddenly started and peered more keenly.
That which had attracted his attention was a stoop-shouldered man.  The
fellow wore a soft hat, the brim of which was slightly turned up in
front, but his face was well masked by a huge pair of green automobile
goggles.

"Well, I swum!" ejaculated the postmaster.  "If I didn't know the
feller was in jail up at Concord, I'd say that was Big Charlie.
Hm-m-m.  No.  This one is too stooped for Charlie.  Charlie's six foot
two in his socks.  I wonder who this fellow is?"

Even then the mail train was whistling, and the postmaster began
bustling about preparing to receive the evening mail, always an event
for him as well as for the villagers, who ordinarily flocked into the
office, hoping to catch sight of a familiar handwriting or hear a name
mentioned that would give them foundation for a bit of gossip.

It was while he was thus engaged that five young girls and a young
woman some years their senior got down from a coach to the railway
platform, where they stood gazing expectantly about them.  The young
women were dressed in tasteful blue serge suits, with hats of the same
material, a sort of uniform, the villagers decided, and, had not the
station platform been too dark, the eager spectators would have seen
that the faces of the visitors were tanned almost to swarthiness.

"Shall I ask some one if Mr. Janus Grubb is here?" questioned one of
the girls.

"No, wait a moment, Harriet," answered the young woman in charge of the
party, "I will ask.  Surely the guide should be here to meet us, since
Miss McCarthy's father had arranged for it."

"You are looking for a guide, Miss?" questioned a voice at her side.
Miss Elting, the guardian of the party, glanced up inquiringly.  She
looked into a face of which she could see but little.  The most marked
feature of the face was a pair of huge green automobile goggles.  These
gave to the face, which she observed wore a peculiar pallor, a sinister
effect, caused no doubt by the goggles.

"We are looking for Mr. Janus Grubb.  Are you he?" she asked sharply.

The man nodded.

"This way," he said in a hurried voice.

"Come, girls," urged the guardian; "I thought Mr. Grubb would not fail
us."

"And a funny looking person he is," scoffed Jane McCarthy.  Her
companions, Hazel Holland, Margery Brown and Grace Thompson, giggled.
Harriet Burrell plucked the sleeve of the guardian's light coat.

"I wouldn't go with him, Miss Elting," she urged.

"Why not, dear?"

"I don't like his looks.  Make him take off his glasses.  There is
something peculiar about him."

"This way, please!" the guide's voice took on a tone of command.  They
had nearly reached the upper end of the platform when he issued his
peremptory order.  Just then a shout was heard to the rear of them.  A
man came running toward them.

"Hey, there!" he called.  The girls halted.  "Are you the Meadow-Brook
Gals?"

"Yes, sir," answered Miss Elting, brightly.

"Well, I'm mighty glad to know about it.  'Pears as if you didn't know
where you was going."

"And who are you, sir?" demanded the guardian.

"I'm the guide, Janus Grubb."

"Will you listen to the man!" chuckled Jane.

Harriet nodded with satisfaction.

"Janus Grubb?  Why, sir, I don't understand.  We have already met Mr.
Grubb," cried Miss Elting.

"Somebody is crazy," muttered Jane, "I think the man with the green
goggles is the lunatic."

"Show me the man who said he was myself," roared the newcomer.

Miss Elting turned to point out the man who had been piloting them
along the platform.  She uttered a little exclamation.  The man with
the goggles was nowhere in sight.  "Why, where did Mr. Grubb go?" she
exclaimed.

"I'm Janus Grubb and I'd like to see the man who says I'm not," shouted
the guide indignantly, forgetting that he was addressing a woman.

"Please come to the station agent with me.  If he identifies you, I am
satisfied," declared Miss Elting with dignity, looking disapprovingly
at the excited man.  She moved back toward the station, followed by her
charges, and a moment later the railroad agent had identified Janus to
her entire satisfaction.

The girls giggled.  There was something funny about their having been
deceived so easily, but Miss Elting did not regard matters in that
light.  "Can you tell me who the man with the goggles is"? she
demanded, turning to the real guide after the identification had been
made.

"If I knew him there'd be trouble," threatened Janus.  "What kind of a
looking feller was he?"

Harriet answered, giving a very excellent description of the man with
the goggles.

"Don't know him," said Janus, stroking his whiskers reflectively.
"Lucky for him that I don't.  What do you want to do now?"

"Go to the post-office," cried the girls.

"There must be mail for as there," added Hazel.  "I'm so anxious to
hear from home."

"Yeth, tho am I," lisped little Grace Thompson.

"You have arranged for us at the hotel for to-night, haven't you?"
demanded Jane McCarthy.  "Father said you would look after these
matters for me."

"It's all right, Miss.  We'll go to the postoffice now.  I'll look
after your baggage when we get you settled for the night.  We won't
take it away from the station till we talk over what you want to do.
Are you ready?"

They walked down the street, laughing and chatting, a happy lot of
girls, followed by a group of curious villagers, who even accompanied
them into the post-office.  It was unusual to see so many pretty girls
in Compton, for summer visitors seldom came to the place.  Furthermore,
these were different from any visitors ever seen there, so far as dress
was concerned.  While waiting for the mail to be distributed, the girls
laughed and talked, apparently utterly oblivious of the presence of the
staring villagers.  Miss Elting inquired for mail for the party as soon
as the wicket was opened.

"Here, Tommy, is a letter for you," she smiled.  Grace took the letter
eagerly.  "And here are letters for Harriet, Hazel, and Margery.  There
is one for me, too.  It is from your father, Jane."

"I have a letter here from Dad.  I--will you look at that?" Jane stood
staring at the window.  For a brief instant she had caught sight of a
man wearing a huge pair of goggles.  He was peering through the
post-office window at them.  But as she looked, the man disappeared.
"It was our friend with the green goggles again as sure as I'm alive!"
she exclaimed.  "He was staring in here for all he was worth, but the
minute he saw me looking at him he vanished."

"I am afraid we are going to have trouble with this mysterious
individual," declared Harriet.  "He seems to have developed a peculiar
interest in our affairs that is far from flattering."

"We are not going to be annoyed as we were last year," said Miss Elting
firmly.  "Mr. Grubb, there is something very strange in all this.  If
for any reason you know this man or have even the slightest idea of his
identity I must ask you to be perfectly frank with me."

Janus Grubb declared solemnly that he had not the least idea who the
man could have been.  Nor had he been able to find any person who had
seen the fellow approach them.  Miss Elting and the guide stepped out
to the porch, followed by the girls, still chatting over the news from
home contained in their letters.

"Now, where do you want to go first?" asked the guide after they had
reached the porch.

"We will trust to your judgment," answered Miss Elting.  "You know
best.  We wish to try a little mountain climbing and we wish to see the
larger of the White Mountains.  We would like to see everything of
interest in the White Mountain country."

"That's a pretty big contract," chuckled Janus; "but I reckon we can
show you what you want to see.  For instance, there's Mt. Chocorua,
Moosilauke, Mt. Washington, Mt. Lafayette and as many more as you like,
all the real thing and offering all the climbing you will care to do,
unless you want to follow the trails that all the visitors take."

"No, we do not.  We prefer to blaze our own trails, or, rather, to have
you do so, and the rougher they prove the better, as long as it is
safe.  My girls are equal to any sort of rough-and-tumble climbing.
How do we get to the mountains?"

"I've engaged a carry-all to take us out to the foothills.  From there
you can walk or ride.  If we take the rough trails, of course we'll
have to climb."

"I shall ask you to lay out your route, then arrange to have some of
our baggage shipped on to meet us, say a week from now.  Our necessary
equipment we can carry.  The girls are used to shouldering heavy packs.
You will provide climbing equipment.  I understand from Miss McCarthy
that you are a climber."

"I'm everything and anything in the White Mountain Range," answered the
guide boldly.

"Then, what do you say if we make Mount Chocorua first?"

"Perhaps you had better decide for us."

"This mountain is three thousand five hundred feet high.  The way we
shall take you will, I think, find rugged enough to please the young
ladies," added Janus, with a grin behind his whiskers.  "What time will
you be ready to start?"

"As soon after daylight as we shall be able to get our breakfast."

"He had better bring our baggage from the station to-night.  Then we
can have our packs in readiness," suggested Harriet Burrell.

"Yes, please do that, Mr. Grubb."

"Anything else, Miss?"

"Not that I think of for the moment.  We have our tent in sections.  We
also shall pack our blankets and such other things as will be needed.
The rest of the equipment can be sent on ahead to meet us wherever you
say.  I don't know what the most convenient point would be.  Where
would you suggest?"

"I can send it to the Tip-Top station on Moosilauke.  Will that do?"

"Yes."

"Then I'll be going," said the guide.  "I'll take you over to the
Compton House, and if you want to see me again this evening, you can
call me on the telephone."

Janus had started to move toward the steps preparatory to going about
his duties, when an exclamation from Harriet Burrell caused them to
turn sharply to her.

"There he is!  There is the man with the goggles!" she whispered,
pointing toward the store.  They saw a stoop-shouldered man standing
with his back against the large window.  He was facing them, but, his
face being in the shadow, they were unable to distinguish the features.
The light in the store being at his back, and his head slightly turned
to the steps, toward which Janus was moving, Harriet Burrell was
enabled to look directly through one of the lenses.  She saw that the
glass was green and that it masked effectually the eyes of the strange
man.

"Quick, Mr. Grubb!" cried the girl.  "The man again!  Find out who he
is!"

Janus, who had moved down to the second step, now started back, and was
on the porch with one bound, thrusting the Meadow-Brook Girls aside in
his eagerness to reach the man who had impersonated him.

"Where is he?" shouted Janus, in a voice that brought most of the
villagers from the store on the run.  "I see him!"  Grubb made a leap,
when, as though he had vanished into thin air, the stranger disappeared
from sight.

The Meadow-Brook Girls gasped in amazement.  But Harriet Burrell,
quicker in thought and action than even the guide himself, leaped from
the end of the porch and sped swiftly around the side of the store
toward the rear yard.




CHAPTER II

MISS ELTING'S MYSTERIOUS CALLER

"Come back here!" shouted the guide.  Harriet halted.  She hesitated at
sight of the black shadows there rather than at the command.  She
distinctly heard some one floundering over a high board fence that shut
in the rear yard of the store and post-office.  Janus's hand was on her
arm.

"Well, I swum!" he exclaimed.

"Oh, that's too bad.  He got away," cried Harriet ruefully.  "I was too
slow.  I could have caught him just as well as not, had I not been so
stupid as to wait."

Harriet and the guide walked to where her companions were standing, not
certain what they ought to do, not quite sure what had occurred.

"This one's all right," chuckled Janus.  "She's got the spunk, but she
needs watching.  She'll get the whole outfit in trouble.  Tell me about
it," he concluded, turning to Harriet.

"You saw it, sir?" asked Harriet quickly.

"I didn't see anything," returned the guide.  "The man was standing on
the spot where you are standing at this moment.  He was listening to
what we were saying, but for what reason I can't imagine.  I made the
mistake of calling to you.  I shouldn't have done that.  When you
started for him he disappeared."

"Yes, we saw him; then we did not," added Miss Elting.

"You didn't stop to think.  You were too excited, and, besides, I was
nearer to the man than were the rest of you girls.  He simply dropped
down on all fours and ran off the porch like a dog or a cat."

"Well, I swum!" muttered the guide.

"Mr. Grubb, I don't like this," declared the guardian severely.

"Neither do I, Miss," he replied in a tone that made the girls laugh.

"I am not certain what I ought to do, Mr. Grubb," continued Miss
Elting.  "If it means that my girls are to be annoyed and disturbed, we
shall be obliged to look for another guide.  You know I have a personal
responsibility in this matter.  I shall have to think it over.  Unless
you can give me reasonable assurance that these incidents will not be
repeated, then I shall have to make some different arrangements.  You
will please send the luggage to the hotel as suggested.  I will see you
early in the morning, at any rate.  Come, girls."

Janus, somewhat downcast and very thoughtful, led the way to the
Compton House, a short distance down the street from the post-office
and grocery store.  The girls began talking almost as soon as they had
left the store porch.

"Please, please don't discharge him," begged Hazel.  "He is such a nice
man."

"And thuch nithe whithkerth," added Grace Thompson.  "He lookth jutht
like an uncle of mine, who----"

"I agree with the girls, Miss Elting," interjected Harriet.  "We are
able to take care of ourselves.  Perhaps this is simply another crazy
man, of whom we shall be rid as soon as we leave the village for the
mountains in the morning.  Please don't dismiss Mr. Grubb."

"I shall have to think this matter over," was the guardian's grave
reply.  "We do not care to repeat last summer's experience.  You
remember what came of relying on the assurance of a stranger."  Miss
Elting referred to the manner in which they had been tricked by the man
who had charge of her brother's houseboat the previous summer, and
whose treachery had caused them so much annoyance.

None of the Meadow-Brook Girls made reply.  They were as fully puzzled
in this respect as was their guardian.  Miss Elting, however, pondered
over the mystery all the way to the hotel.  They found the Compton
House a very comfortable country hotel, rather more so than some others
of which they had had experience during their previous journeys.
Arriving at the hotel, they hurriedly prepared for supper, for they
were late and the other guests of the house had eaten and left the
dining room before the Meadow-Brook Girls had even entered the hotel.

By the time supper was finished, their luggage had come over from the
station.  Janus Grubb, went home, not a little troubled as well as
mystified by the occurrences of the evening.  Who the man could
possibly be he had not the remotest idea.  He tried to recall who of
his acquaintances might be guilty of playing such a joke on him.  To
the mind of Janus the incident could have been only a prank, though he
questioned the good taste of any such interference between himself and
his customers.

On the contrary, Miss Elting and her young charges attached more
serious meaning to the performances of the man who had regarded them
through green goggles.  They regarded the incident with suspicion and
agreed to proceed only with the utmost caution.

None of the readers of this series need an introduction to Harriet
Burrell and her three friends, who figured so prominently in "THE
MEADOW-BROOK GIRLS UNDER CANVAS."  It was in this narrative that the
four chums made their first expedition into the Pocono woods and for
several happy weeks were members of Camp Wau-Wau, a campfire
association of which the girls became loyal members.  At the end of
their stay in camp they decided to walk to their home town, sending
their camping outfit on ahead.

The story of their journey home on foot was told in the second volume,
"THE MEADOW-BROOK GIRLS ACROSS COUNTRY," in which an Italian and his
dancing bear, a campful of gipsies and a band of marauding tramps
furnished much of the excitement.  Then, too, the friendly aid and
rivalries of a camp of boys known as the Tramp Club furnished many
enjoyable situations.

It was in the third volume, "THE MEADOW-BROOK GIRLS AFLOAT," that
Harriet Burrell and her friends were shown as encountering a
considerable amount of adventure.  The girls led an eventful life on
the old houseboat on one of the New Hampshire lakes, and also
encountered a mystery which, with the help of the Tramp Club, was run
to earth, but the solving of it entailed the loss of the "Red Rover,"
their houseboat.

And now the Meadow-Brook Girls were about to spend a few weeks among
the "Marvelous Crystal Hills," as the White Mountains in New Hampshire
have been aptly termed.

Much time and thought had been spent in preparing properly for this
long vacation jaunt.  Camp equipage had all been overhauled, and much
that would serve excellently where there was transport service had been
discarded for this journey into the hills.

Resting for a while after finishing supper, the girls began to make up
neat packs containing such bare equipment and food supplies as they
believed to be indispensable.  Then there were the tent, blankets and
cooking utensils to be looked after.  Of course, the guide would carry
much of this dunnage, yet our girls were no weaklings, and no one of
them expected to shirk carrying her fair share of the load.

It was after nine o'clock when Harriet and her chums finished the
making-up of the packs.  Soon after a clerk knocked on the door of Miss
Elting's room.

"There's a man below who wishes to speak with you," the clerk informed
her.

"It must be Mr. Grubb," guessed the guardian, and left her packing to
go downstairs.  She glanced into the lobby of the hotel; then, not
seeing Janus there, stepped into the parlor.  A man, a stranger, was
sitting near a door that led out to the hotel veranda.  In the light of
the kerosene lamp that hung suspended from the ceiling she was not able
to make out his features at first.  She saw that he wore a heavy black
beard, that he was rather roughly dressed, but that his hands were
white.

"Are you the man who wished to speak with Miss Elting?" she asked,
confessing to herself that she did not wholly like the appearance of
the man.

"Yes," he answered, rising.  Now that the light fell on his face she
noted that he had a low, receding forehead.  His beard covered the
greater part of his face.

"About what do you wish to speak with me?"

"Well, it's rather a delicate matter, Miss," the man made reply, gazing
down at the carpet, twisting his soft felt hat awkwardly.  "I--I wanted
to ask if you needed any assistance."

"What do you mean?"

"You are going into the mountains?"

"Yes, sir."

"You will need to have some one to show you the way and look after you
and your party."

"We already have engaged some one to do that.  You mean a guide, I
suppose?"

He nodded.

"May I ask your name?"

"John Collins."

"Do you live here?" she asked, curious to know more about the man, whom
she began to distrust.

"Not now.  I live over in the next village.  I was in town and heard
that you folks wanted a guide.  I know more about the White Mountains
than any other man in the State of New Hampshire.  I can show you more,
and take better care of your party, than anybody else you could find."

"Do you know Janus Grubb?"

"Ye--yes," Collins twisted uneasily, "I know him."

"He is to be our guide.  The arrangements were made some time ago by
the father of one of our young women.  Mr. Grubb starts with us
tomorrow morning, unless there should be some change in the
arrangements."

"I'm sorry, Miss."

"I'm sorry, too, since you have been so kind as to offer your
services," replied the guardian politely.

"I didn't just mean it that way, Miss.  I meant about Janus."

"How so?"

"I don't just like to say.  Yes, I will, too.  Do you know anything
about Jan Grubb?"

"No," admitted Miss Elting.

"Then you'd better ask.  I am afraid you are putting too much
confidence in him."

"Mr. Collins, please be more explicit.  What do you mean?"

"You'll find out after you've got out into the hills.  He doesn't know
any more about the hills than a little yellow dog that's spent all its
life in town.  He'll get you into all kinds of trouble, and then he'll
leave you to get out of it as best you can.  You remember what I tell
you."

"Of course, I thank you for telling me," answered the guardian rather
stiffly.  "However, we are quite satisfied with Mr. Grubb.  As I
understand it, he is a highly respected citizen of Compton and an
efficient mountain guide.  That will be quite sufficient for us."

"I need this job.  I--I need the money, Miss," whined the stranger.

"I am satisfied with the arrangements I have already made." Miss Elting
turned to leave the room.

"My family needs it.  I've been out of work a long time, and----"

"I am very sorry.  I wish it were in my power to assist you, but I have
very little voice in the matter.  Another person--the one who is paying
the expenses of this trip--attended to all that.  You will see that it
is quite useless to plead, deep as my sympathy is for you."

The man rose and eyed her with an expression that was particularly
unpleasant to behold.  Miss Elting returned her strange visitor's gaze.
Something other than his looks repelled her, yet there was nothing in
either manner or words to account for this feeling of repulsion on the
part of the guardian.

"In case anything should occur to make it necessary for us to look
further for a guide I shall remember you," she said slowly.  "I suppose
I can reach you here at Compton?"

"N--n--no," was the hesitating answer.  "But if you need me, I'll he
about.  Mark what I tell you, Jan Grubb is going to get you into a fine
mess!  You will be sorry you ever engaged him; that's all I've got to
say about it.  Good night, lady."

"Good night, Mr. Collins," replied the woman coldly.  His final words,
so full of rancor, had destroyed what little sympathy he had aroused in
her.  Miss Elting stood aside while the man stepped toward the door.

At this juncture Harriet Burrell appeared in the doorway leading to the
hall.  She had missed Miss Elting, and, not finding the guardian in her
room, had come downstairs in search of her.  Harriet had not known that
the guardian was engaged.

"Oh, I beg your pardon, Miss Elting.  I did not know--I thought you
were alone."

"It is all right.  Come in, Harriet.  What did you wish?"

Harriet did not reply.  Instead, she gazed perplexedly at the
retreating form of Miss Elting's late caller.

"You'll be sorry you ever took up with that hound," flung back the
fellow, turning as he was about to step out on the veranda.

Miss Elting made no reply.  Her lips tightened a little, then she
turned with a half-smile, regarding Harriet's frowning face quizzically.

"What does it mean, Miss Elting?" questioned the girl.

"I don't know, my dear.  The man wanted to act as our guide.  I am glad
he isn't the one who is to lead us over the mountains.  I don't like
him at all.  You heard what he just said?"

Harriet nodded.

"He was referring to Mr. Grubb."

"Oh!"

"I don't know what to make of it.  What reason do you suppose he could
have for coming to me in this manner?  It is all very strange."

"I don't know, Miss Elting.  I am wondering."

"Wondering what?"

There was something in the set of the shoulders, in the swing of them
as the man walked away, in the poise of the head, that had impressed
Harriet Burrell as being vaguely familiar.  Something of this must have
been reflected in the Meadow-Brook Girl's face, judging from the
guardian's next question.

"Of what are you thinking, dear?"

"I have seen that man before, Miss Elting."

"Where?"

"I don't know.  My memory connects him with something unpleasant.  I
wish I knew what it is, for I am positive there is something wrong with
him.  Wait!  I know!  I know of whom the man reminds me.  Can't you see
it?  Don't you know?" cried Harriet eagerly.

The guardian shook her head.




CHAPTER III

THE START THAT CAME TO GRIEF

"Who do you think it is, Harriet?"

Harriet Burrell whispered something in the ear of the guardian.  Again
Miss Elting shook her head, this time with decision.

"Wrong, this time.  There isn't the slightest resemblance that I could
observe.  I thought of that, too.  But let's not bother our heads about
it any further.  We have things of greater importance to consider this
evening, and, besides, we must go to bed soon; we are to make an early
start in the morning, you know."

Harriet shook her brown head slowly.  She was positive that she was
right in her identification of the visitor, Collins.  She determined to
ask some questions at the first opportunity.  This she did on the
following morning, inquiring of the hotel clerk about the man who had
so strangely called on Miss Elting.  The clerk said he had never heard
of the man.  In the preparations that followed Harriet forgot about the
caller.  Grubb had a carry-all at the hotel before they had finished
their breakfast.  The equipment for the party occupied little room.
Janus had consulted with Miss Elting about the food supplies, and these
were packed in the smallest possible space, with the exception of a few
packages for their use before they got into the mountains.

The drive to the point where they would leave the wagon would occupy
the greater part of the day.  The girls looked forward to that day's
journey with keen anticipation.  They started out decorously and
quietly, for the inhabitants of the village were early risers and the
girls did not wish to attract unpleasant attention to themselves.  Once
they were well out of the village, however, the Meadow-Brook Girls'
spirits bubbled forth in song, shout and merry laughter.  The air was
crisp and cool until the sun came up, then it grew warm.

Janus, sitting up by the driver, was almost sternly silent.  Miss
Elting, in the light of the previous evening's interview, regarded him
from time to time with inquiring eyes.  She could not believe what her
caller had told her of their guide.  Janus was plainly an honest,
well-intentioned man.  Of this she had been reassured that morning in
an interview with the proprietor of the Compton House.

At noon, their appetites sharpened by the bracing air and the fact that
they had eaten an early breakfast, the party made a halt.  The horses
were unhitched and allowed to graze beside the road.  The guide built a
fire, Harriet and Jane in the meantime getting out something for their
luncheon, which was to be a cooked one instead of a "cold bite."
Hazel, Jane and Margery spread a blanket on the ground, while Tommy sat
on a rail fence, offering expert advice but declining to assist in the
preparations.

It was a merry meal.  Even Janus was forced to smile now and then, the
driver making no effort to conceal his amusement over the bright
sallies of the Meadow-Brook Girls.

"Come!  We must be going, unless you want to camp beside the road
to-night," urged the guide.  The girls had finished their luncheon and
were strolling about the field.

"Why, we haven't thettled our dinner yet," complained Tommy.

"You'll have it well settled in less than an hour.  The road from here
on is rough," returned Janus.  "You'll be wanting another meal before
the sun is three hours from the hills."

"We want to pick some wild flowers," called Margery.

"Girls, don't delay us!  The driver wishes to get back home to-night
and we must reach the camping place in which Mr. Grubb has planned for
us to spend the night," warned the guardian.

"Yes, we've got to hike right along," agreed Janus.  "Hook up those
nags and be on the way, Jim," he added, speaking to the driver.

It was only a short time until they were on the way again.  The country
was becoming more sparsely settled, the hills more rugged and the
forests more numerous.  Here and there slabs of granite might be seen
cropping up through the soil; in the distance, now and then, they were
able to catch glimpses of the bare ridges of the mountains toward which
they were journeying.

"Those mountains," explained the guide, "are called 'The Roof of New
England.'  There's not much of any timber on top, but on the sides you
will find some spruce, yellow pine and hemlock.  It's all granite a
little way under the subsoil; and over the subsoil grows moss.  Among
these mosses and the roots of the trees almost every important stream
in New England takes its rise, and some of them grow to be quite decent
rivers.  You ladies live in this state, don't you?"

Miss Elting nodded.

"I am afraid we never realized what a beautiful state New Hampshire is
until we began looking about a little," answered Harriet Burrell.

"There are too many thtoneth," objected Tommy.  "I thhall be afraid of
thtubbing my toeth all the time."

"Lift your feet and you won't," suggested Margaret, with a smile.

"Buthter, I didn't athk for your advithe," retorted Tommy.

"There are the foothills," interrupted the guide, "and there is
Chocorua.  Isn't she a beauty?"

This was the girls' first real glimpse of the White Mountains.
Chocorua loomed high in the air, reminding them of pictures they had
seen of ancient temples, except that this was higher than any temple
they had ever seen pictured.  Its gray domes, flanked by the other tops
of the neighboring range, stood out clearly defined.

"Three thousand five hundred feet above sea level," the guide informed
them, waving a hand toward Chocorua.  "Doesn't look that high, does it?"

"Have we got to climb up there?" questioned Margery.

"We are going to.  We do not have to if we don't want to," replied
Hazel.

"Oh, dear, I'm too tired to go on," whined Margery.

"I knew Buthter could never climb a mountain," observed Tommy, with a
hopeless shake of her little tow-head.  "But never mind, Buthter, you
can thtay here and wait until we come back.  It will only be a few
weekth and you won't be tho very lonely.  Of courthe, you will mith me
a great deal."

"Don't worry yourself over me," snapped, Buster.  "I can climb as well
as you.  But if I did stay behind, you can make up your mind I wouldn't
miss you."

"Stop squabbling, girls," laughed Harriet.  "Neither one of you could
get along without the other."

The granite domes soon faded in the waning light.  The driver urged on
his horses.  The carry-all bumped over the uneven road, swaying giddily
from side to side, the girls clinging tightly to the sides of the
wagon, fearing that they might be thrown out.  Darkness shut out pretty
much everything at an early hour.  Janus decided that they had better
wait for supper till they reached the "Shelter," a cabin part way up
the side of the mountain, where tourists halted for a rest or to stay
over night when intending to climb the mountain.  It was not expected
that there would be any save themselves there on this occasion.

The road grew so uneven that the driver became a little uneasy.  He
finally declared that he did not dare to try following the trail up to
the Shelter that night; that either he would put them down at the foot
of the mountain or make camp there until the following morning, when he
would continue the journey up the mountain to the shelter.

Janus consulted with Miss Elting.  He said they could walk to the
Shelter in a couple of hours, provided the girls were hard enough to
stand the climb.  The guardian assured him that they were equal to
anything in the walking line.  It was, therefore, settled that the
driver should take them to the foot of the mountain, whence they would
make their way on foot to the stopping place for the night, thus
beginning their tramp at the base of the mountain.

"How much farther have we to go?" questioned Harriet.

"A mile farther on we pass over a long, covered bridge.  The road takes
a sharp bend beyond that.  The foot of the mountain lies less than a
mile from the end of the bridge.  We shall soon be there," answered
Janus.  The girls burst forth into song.  Janus had to shout to make
himself heard when he spoke to the driver.  The horses were traveling
at a lively pace.  They did not enjoy the disturbance behind them, and
their driver, having wrapped the reins about his arms to give him
greater purchase, was pulling sturdily, his feet braced against the
dashboard of the carry-all.

"Here's the bridge," cried the guide.

A lantern had been lighted and hung from the rear axle of the
carry-all.  But this did little more than cast weird, flickering
shadows ahead.  It certainly did not light up the road ahead of there.
In the dense darkness the bridge was not visible to the eyes of the
Meadow-Brook Girls.

"The bridge ith coming.  Low bridge!" piped Tommy.

"Be quiet; I fear we are making the driver's work difficult," warned
Miss Elting.

"Oh, but isn't this the fine ride?" cried Crazy Jane.  "It's almost
like being in my own darlin' automobile with the landscape slipping
past on a greased track.  Now, what if one of the horses should fall
down?  Wouldn't we be tumbled into a goose pile!" chuckled Jane.

"Oh, thave me!" cried Tommy.

"Don't suggest anything so awful," begged Margery.

"Oh!  What's that!" exclaimed Harriet.

The others did not know to what she referred, but they felt a sudden
jolt as the vehicle lurched to the side of the road, then back again.

"What is it?" demanded Hazel.

"The horses have taken fright," answered the guardian calmly.  "Be
careful that you do not excite them further."

"Are--are the hortheth running away?" stammered Tommy.

"Not yet," reassured Harriet.

"Don't be frightened," called back the guide encouragingly.  "Jim can
hold any hosses that ever chewed a bit.  We'll be on the bridge in a
minute; then they can thrash all they want to.  Look out!"

There followed a crash, a breaking, splintering sound as the right rear
wheel of the carry-all swerved into the side of the covered bridge a
few inches from the outer end.  The wheel put a hole through the siding
of the bridge.  It was fortunate for the carry-all that the wheel had
not swerved a second earlier.  Had it done so, the carry-all must have
been wrecked on the stout post at the outer end of the long bridge.

What had so startled the horses none of the occupants of the carry-all
knew.  The driver knew that they had had a narrow escape from being
hurled down an embankment.  It was a bad place for horses to take
fright.  He had managed, however, to pick the team up by the reins and
set them down in the middle of the road, where they remained but a few
seconds before they were swerving to one side again, then they began
leaping and galloping through the long, covered bridge.

Once more a rear wheel raked the boards.  The girls cried out, fearing
that they would be hurled through the siding and down into the river.
They were clinging to the sides of the vehicle, gripping them firmly
with their hands.

"Don't lose your presence of mind, girls," cried Miss Elting.  "I think
the driver has the animals under control now."  She was obliged to
shout in order to make herself heard.

The roar of the carry-all on the floor of the bridge was terrifying.
As the vehicle rolled over the loose planks of the bridge floor the
sound was almost as if a Gatling gun were being fired, accompanied by a
crash, now and then, as the wagon was hurled against the side of the
bridge.

"Oh, what a mess!" shouted Jane McCarthy.  "Are we near the other end,
or has the miserable old bridge turned around since we started?  The
horses are now going faster than ever, and we'll be going at the same
rapid gait a few moments from now, or maybe seconds----"

Crash!

The carry-all once more struck the side.  Then something else occurred.
There was a sudden stoppage of the horses, accompanied by the sound of
breaking woodwork.  It was as if the bridge were collapsing.  The
Meadow-Brook Girls were piled in a heap at the forward end of the
vehicle, then hurled straight over the dashboard and on over the
horses, amid shouts and screams.  There seemed to be no end to the
crashing and screaming for some moments; then a sudden silence settled
over the darkened structure, broken only by the frightened neigh of a
horse.




CHAPTER IV

AN EXCITING NIGHT

"Girls!"  It was Miss Elting who called.  "Oh, girls, are you hurt?"

"I'm killed.  Thave me!" moaned Grace.

"I think I'm alive, but I'm not sure," cried Jane.  "I've scraped the
skin from my nose entirely.  What a mess! what a mess!"

"Wait!"  The guardian's voice was commanding.  "Margery, Hazel!"

"Ye--es," answered two voices in chorus.  They sounded far away.

"Harriet!"  There was no reply.  She repeated the call, but there was
still no answer.  Miss Elting became alarmed now.  She was still
sitting in the broken carry-all, to which she had clung desperately at
the sudden stoppage, thus preventing herself from being hurled out, as
had occurred to her charges.  Thus far not a word had been heard from
the two men.  Now, a groan somewhere ahead attracted the teacher's
attention.

"Girls, don't move!  We do not know what has occurred.  Does any of you
know where Mr. Grubb is?"

"Yeth.  He ith right here.  I jutht touched hith whithkerth," answered
Tommy in a weak, plaintive little voice.  "I gueth he ith dead."

The guardian clambered from the rear of the carry-all.  The lantern had
been extinguished by the shock.  She got down, carefully groping about
in the blackness for the lantern.  She uttered a little exclamation of
thanksgiving when her fingers came in contact with it.  But the chimney
had been shattered by the shock.  Only the lower part of it remained,
just enough to shield the flame when once this should have been
restored.  It was but the work of a few seconds to relight the lantern.
Miss Elting ran around to the front of the vehicle.  She beheld a
strange scene.

Both horses were down.  At first they appeared to be lying on the floor
of the bridge.  A closer look showed the guardian that the forelegs of
each animal had gone right through the floor.  Then the further
discovery was made that there was little flooring at this point.  The
planks that had once formed the floor at this particular spot lay piled
on each side of the driveway.  Only the beams held the horses from
falling through to the water, a few feet below.

A short distance beyond lay Janus Grubb, sprawled on his back; while
close beside him, lay the form of the driver.  Margery and Hazel were
sitting to the right, huddled in each other's arms.  Tommy,
white-faced, with her feet curled under her, sat close beside Janus,
gazing down into his bewhiskered face.  Jane McCarthy was leaning
against one side of the bridge.  Her own face had lost much of its
usual color.

"Harriet!" gasped Miss Elting, "what has happened to her?"

Jane shook her head and pointed to the opening in the floor.  The
guardian understood.  Harriet must have been hurled right through and
down into the river.

"Girls!  Look after the two men.  Hurry!"  She ran to the opening, then
lying down, peered into the darkness.  "Ha-r-r-r-i-et!"

"Hoo-e-e-e-e-e!"

The guardian sprang to her feet.  It was unmistakably Harriet Burrell
who had answered her, but the voice of the Meadow-Brook Girl had
sounded far away.  Miss Elting believed that the girl had succeeded in
reaching the bank of the river.  Jane had thrown herself down beside
the unconscious guide and was at work making heroic efforts to bring
him back to consciousness.  The driver already was struggling to get to
his feet.  Tommy hopped up, and, hurrying to him, gave such assistance
as her strength would permit.

The driver staggered; after walking a few steps he leaned against the
side of the bridge with both hands pressed to his forehead.  Tommy
regarded him wonderingly.  His head was still dizzy; he had no clear
conception of what had occurred.

By this time the guardian had gone to Jane's assistance and was
pressing a bottle of smelling salts to the nostrils of Janus Grubb.
Janus twisted his head uneasily, as though to get away from the pungent
odor of the salts.

"He will be all right in a few moments, I think.  I wish we had some
water," murmured Miss Elting.

Jane ran to the wagon.  She returned with a rope and a pail.  Tying the
rope to the pail, she lowered the latter through the opening in the
floor.  A few moments later she presented a pail of water to Miss
Elting, which the guardian sprinkled little by little over the face of
their guide.  Janus gasped, struggled and rolled over.  Jane turned him
on his back again.  This time a solid volume of water was dashed into
his face.  He turned over and made a feeble attempt to rise.  Another
volume of water smote him in the back of the neck, hurling him to the
bridge floor.  This time Janus got to his feet, brushing his eyes, for
they were so full of water that he could not see.

"I can let him down at the end of the rope and souse him in the
stream," suggested Crazy Jane.

"No, no, no!" protested the guardian.  She took Janus firmly by the
arm.  "Where do you feel bad?"

"I swum!  I swum!" mumbled the guide.  "I swum!"

"You'd have had to swim if you had gone through the hole in the floor,"
retorted Crazy Jane.  "Harriet went down there, and----"

"Eh?  What--wha--at?" gasped the guide, blinking rapidly.

"Sit down a moment," urged Miss Elting.  "None of us is seriously hurt.
How about you?" gazing at the driver.  "No bones broken, I trust?"

The driver shook his head.  Janus was gazing at the opening in the
floor with a puzzled expression on his face.  He stared at the planks
banked on each side, nodding understandingly.

"Been fixing the bridge.  Forgot to put the planks back in place," he
muttered.

"Isn't it rather strange that so important a thing should have been
forgotten, Mr. Grubb?" questioned the guardian significantly.

"I swum!  I swum!" repeated Janus, running reflective fingers through
his beard.

"You haven't thwum yet, but if you thtep into that hole you will have
the pleathure of thwimming," warned Tommy, for the guide had been
edging closer and closer to the opening in the bridge floor.  He drew
back a step.

The driver had recovered sufficiently to note the distressing condition
of his horses.  Now he limped toward them.  "They're goners!" he
groaned.

"I don't believe it," answered Jane shortly.  "They will be, if you
don't do something.  Why don't you get them out?"

"How can I?" moaned the poor fellow.

Jane started to speak, but a loud "Hoo-e-e-e" from the far end of the
bridge caused her to pause.  The call was repeated.  Then they heard
Harriet running toward them.

"Look out for holes in the floor!" yelled Crazy Jane.  "You can't tell
anything about this perforated old bridge.  Come back here, Tommy
Thompson!"  Tommy had started to run to meet Harriet.  Margery grabbed
and pulled her back.  Tommy jerked away angrily, but this time it was
Jane McCarthy who laid a firm grip on the little girl's arm.  "You stay
right here."  Jane lifted her voice in a prolonged call.

Harriet Burrell answered in kind.  A moment later Harriet came running
up to them, dripping from her unexpected plunge into the river.

"Was any one hurt?  Oh, I'm so glad!" as a quick glance told her that
all of her companions were there.  "Oh, those poor horses!"

"Buthter thought thhe wath killed, but after I told her thhe wath all
right, thhe felt better," observed Tommy, with a sidelong glance at
Margery.

"Just as though I'd pay any attention to what you say," retorted
Margery, her chin in the air.  "You talk entirely too much."

"I'm so glad you weren't hurt, Harriet," said Hazel, "but I'm sorry you
are so wet."

The water was running in little rivulets from Harriet's clothing.  But
her interest was centered not on herself but on the two men who were
standing by the groaning horses, trying to decide what could be done to
get the animals out.  Miss Elting slipped an arm about Harriet's waist.

"How thankful I am that you are safe," whispered the guardian, kissing
Harriet impulsively.

"The water was very cold," shivered Harriet.  "I really didn't know
what had happened until I went in all over."

"Were you thrown directly through the opening?" questioned the guardian.

"No.  I think I fell on a horse first.  I rolled off before I could get
hold of anything to stop myself.  Then----"

"Then you fell in," finished Tommy.

"Yes, I did, and with unpleasant force.  Fortunately, the water was
deep and the current not very swift.  But it was so dark that I
couldn't see which way to swim.  I found the direction of the shore by
swimming across the current; otherwise I might have gone up or down
stream, for I could distinguish nothing.  I touched bottom just a
little way from where I fell in.  Had I struck just a little way to the
right I think I should have been killed.  You girls are fortunate that
you didn't fall through the bridge.  Was any of you hurt?"

"Yeth, Jane lotht thome thkin from her nothe, but she can grow thome
more, and it will thoon be better again."  Tommy's reply drew a smile
from her companions, but they were all too much disturbed to feel like
indulging in merriment.  Besides, there were the suffering horses.

"May I make a suggestion?" asked Harriet, releasing herself from Miss
Elting's embrace.

"Somebody will have to make one pretty soon," declared Janus, brushing
a sleeve across his forehead.  "What is it?"

"I should think that if you were to place the ends of planks under the
horses, we might pry them up a little, so that, one by one, you could
shove other planks under them.  In that way we might get enough planks
down to enable the horses to get a foothold."

"Can't be done," answered the driver.

"There will be no harm in trying," urged Harriet.

"It's a good idea," nodded Janus, after having stroked his whiskers
reflectively.  Janus always consulted his whiskers when in doubt, and
among the graying hairs usually found that for which he sought.  He was
the first to go after a plank.  The near horse was the one to feel the
support of the plank as the guide worked it under one side of the
animal.  Janus turned the end of the plank over to Harriet Burrell
while he ran for another plank.  This was repeated, the driver, after a
time, taking part in the operation, until four planks had been worked
in under the horse.

"Now, all work together," urged Harriet.  "Mr. Grubb, see if you and
the driver can't get a couple of planks clear under the horse.  If you
can get the end of a plank on one of the beams you will have done
something really worthwhile."

Miss Elting, Jane, Hazel and Harriet each were assigned to "man" the
end of a plank.

"Now, all together!  Hee--o--hee!" shouted Janus.  A plank slid easily
underneath the stomach of the near horse and came to rest on a beam.

"Hooray!" cheered the guide.  "That's what comes of having a head on
one's shoulders.  Young woman, you've got one.  Let him down a little.
Here, Jim, you get some planks around under that other horse.  We'll
have them up, but we may break their legs in the final effort.  I don't
know.  Somebody will have to settle for the damage done here to-night."

"The wagon is broken," Margery informed them.

"Never mind the wagon.  It's the horses we must save," answered Miss
Elting.  "We can't leave them to suffer."

Fifteen minutes of hard labor sufficed to raise the horses a little and
to place them in greater comfort.  The sharp edges of the beams no
longer cut into the flesh, and their breathing was less labored.  The
party paused to rest from their efforts.

"If we had some rope and pulleys we could get the animals out without
much difficulty," reflected Janus.  "But how to do it now I don't know.
I swum!  I'm dead-beat."

"Can you lift?" questioned Jane.

"Tolerable."

"Then why not pick up first one fore-foot, then another, and place them
on the planks.  You'll see what the horses will do then."

Janus scratched his head and fingered his beard.

"I swum, Jim!" he grinned, "let's try it."

Each man took hold of a fore-foot of each horse, and, without much
difficulty, raised it to the planks before each animal.  They were
about to go after the other fore-foot when Tommy, who had been standing
back at a safe distance, attracted their attention by uttering a little
cry.

"Oh, look! it ith growing light," she exclaimed.

"Daylight?  Why, it is getting light," cried Margery.

A faint glow was flickering at the end of the bridge, casting rays
through the farther portion of the covered structure.  The light was of
a reddish tinge.  At first, not realizing that the night was still
young, the Meadow-Brook Girls welcomed that light with shouts of
approval.  But there was something strange about the glow that caused
Miss Elting, Harriet and the men to gaze in open-mouthed wonder.

As they gazed the glow seemed to grow stronger.  Then it flamed into a
great glare of red.

"Fire!  Fire!" yelled Jane McCarthy.

"The bridge is on fire!  Run for your lives!" shouted the guide.
"Never mind the horses.  Run!"

With one common impulse the girls and their guardian started toward the
other end of the bridge, which was not more than twenty feet from them.
Margery uttered a scream of terror.  Jane grabbed her by one shoulder,
giving her a violent shake.

"Don't make things any worse than they are.  Tell when you begin to
burn, but don't make us think we are burning till the fire gets to us."

"Go on, girls," cried Harriet.  "I'm going back to the other end.  We
must think about saving our packs and our horses."  Unheeding their
warning shouts, the girl ran back toward where Janus and the driver
were still engaged in trying to lift the horses.  Miss Elting had
followed Harriet, and the two women now implored Janus to hurry with
the rescue of the animals.

"It's no use!" he exclaimed angrily.  "We can't do it before the fire
gets to us.  We are likely to lose our packs, too, unless we let these
horses go and attend to them."

"Never mind the packs," said Harriet stubbornly, as she laid a firm
hand on one of the guide's arms.  "We are going to save these poor
animals.  Let us keep on trying, and I feel sure we can not fail.  Now,
think hard.  What is the quickest and best thing to be done?"




CHAPTER V

ON THE BURNING BRIDGE

"We'll have to do our own thinking," then said Jane McCarthy, who had
come upon the scene at that moment.  She glared at the guide and the
driver, who stood staring dumbly at Harriet.

"We must save those helpless horses," repeated Harriet, her eyes
turning anxiously toward the two patient animals.

"But you girls must not stay here too long," cautioned Miss Elting.

Suddenly Crazy Jane burst forth into a loud hurrah, and, running to the
wagon, returned to the driver with a hand-saw.  By this time Margery,
Tommy and Hazel had come cautiously back to where the horses were.

"Saw the timbers out from under the horses," advised Jane.  "It may
hurt them to drop into the river, but it's better for them to drown
than to be burned alive!  Move quickly, now!"

"Janus," muttered the driver, "we're a pair of mutton-heads!"

"We are," agreed the guide, as he ran to get the other saw.

The rasping of the saws began instantly, the Meadow-Brook Girls moving
closer to observe the work, casting frequent apprehensive glances over
their shoulders at the thick cloud of smoke which issued from the
farther end of the bridge.  The fire did not appear to be making much
headway, still it did not seem to be abating.  Already the framework of
that end of the bridge was outlined like the figure in a set piece of
fireworks.  They could hear the crackling of the flames, and the wooden
tunnel was becoming filled with smoke.  Tommy was coughing, to remind
her companions that they were in need of other quarters.

"I don't think I would cut the ends off," suggested Harriet.  "Saw them
nearly through, then cut the opposite ends.  Otherwise you may leave
the animals dangling in the air with no means of helping them out."

Janus nodded approvingly at Harriet's suggestion.

"I reckon you're right," he agreed.  "Jim, tackle the other end.  We'll
let this near horse down first and see how he makes out.  If it works,
we'll drop the other fellow in the same way."

A warning snapping sound was heard.

"Stand clear!" bellowed Janus.

The girls sprang back, and just in time.  Pieces of plank shot up into
the air, one striking the bridge roof with a crash.  Then the near
horse, with a neigh of fear, disappeared into the black water below
them.  They heard a loud splash.  Harriet, leaning over, peered into
the river.

"He's swimming.  I can hear him," she cried joyously.  "Isn't that fine
that you thought of that, Mr. Grubb?" she exclaimed, turning a flushed
face to the guide.

"Huh!  Thought of it?  I'd never thought of it if I'd kept my thinking
machine going for a hundred years.  Now the other horse, Jim.  We'll
have to step lively.  Them flames is getting too nigh for comfort.  Now
you folks had better get out of here!" he commanded.

"Not yet," smiled Harriet, "we still have work to do.  We must get the
things out of the wagon.  If we lose them, we shall be in a fix."

"Mercy!  I hadn't thought of that," cried the guardian.  "But shall we
have time to carry them across?"

"The men will have to carry the heavier articles.  I think we shall be
able to manage it.  Come, help me get the things out of the carry-all."

Harriet ran to the wagon, followed closely by Miss Elting and Margery.
Tommy alone held back.  Hazel and Jane also hurried forward to assist.

"All those who wish their suppers will have to work," cried Harriet
Burrell.

"We need a fire company more than thupper jutht now," retorted Tommy
Thompson.  "If we had a fire engine we could make thith fire look
thick."

Harriet was in the carry-all passing out bundles and packs.  She
dropped a sack of cooking utensils to the floor of the bridge with a
great clatter.

"Carry them to land," she directed Tommy and Hazel.

"There goes the other horse," cried Miss Elting, as a crash and a great
splash for the moment cut short their conversation.  Janus uttered a
yell of triumph.

"We got 'em both free!" he shouted.

"That's what," agreed Jim.  "We'll pull the carry-all ashore next."

"I am afraid we won't have time.  The fire is almost too near for
comfort now," said Harriet.  Then she darted back to the carry-all to
secure a blanket that she recalled had been laid over the back of the
front seat of the vehicle, and which had been forgotten when removing
the other things.  Reaching the wagon, she decided to take the cushions
also.  Then Harriet made a final search of the wagon to be sure that
nothing of value had been left.  The carry-all had been well stripped.

The girl sprang out, casting a quick glance overhead, when she
discovered, to her dismay, that the flames were already at work, they
having rapidly eaten their way along the ridge of the bridge.

"Gracious!  I must get out of here and without a moment's loss of
time," she cried.

"Hurry!" bellowed the voice of the guide.  "We haven't time to save the
carry-all.  Get out from under.  The bridge is going to fall."

As Harriet made a dash toward safety the burned end of the bridge fell.
There was a rending noise as the weakened girders gave way under the
weight of the bridge.  A shower of sparks and flame shot into the air.

Miss Elting, Jane and the two men stood on shore, shouting with all
their might to Harriet Burrell.  But Harriet did not hear their warning
shouts, nor had she need of warning.  She knew only too well what was
occurring.  Suddenly the long bridge caved in and went down well past
the middle with a tremendous crashing and snapping and roaring, sparks
and flames shooting still higher than before, the burning timbers
hissing and sending up a great cloud of steam as they fell into the
river.

Miss Elting, grown dizzy at thought of Harriet, had stumbled and
fallen.  Jane McCarthy quickly raised and dragged the guardian away.

"Harriet!" shouted Miss Elting.

The frightened girls took up the cry, but there was no answer.  Harriet
had gone down with the burning bridge.




CHAPTER VI

THEIR TROUBLES MULTIPLY

Miss Elting and Jane McCarthy had climbed down the embankment, and,
standing at the river's edge, scanned the water with pale faces and
anxious eyes.  Dark shapes drifted past them, shapes that caused them
to start apprehensively as they caught sight of them.

Nearly all of the bridge that had been on fire was now in the water.
The structure had broken off short, taking most of the fire with it
into the river.  The broken end, still in the air, glowed here and
there, the glowing spots fading and dying out one by one.  Of this the
two women saw nothing.  They were heavy with anxiety.  It did not seem
to them possible that Harriet Burrell could have escaped alive.  Janus
and Jim, who had run to the river bank, were now plunging here and
there, stumbling, groping, wading or swimming about in the river to
have a look at some bit of wreckage that resembled a human form.  They
believed that Harriet had been swept down to her death with the burning
bridge.

All at once Jane raised her voice in the cry of the Meadow-Brook Girls.
"Hoo-e-e-e!" she called shrilly.  But no answering cry from the missing
girl relieved their suspense.

"I'm afraid we can do no more," said Miss Elting with a catch in her
voice.  "Oh, why did I leave her?  Why did I not insist on Harriet's
leaving that awful place with me?"

"You couldn't help it," soothed Jane.  "But you mark me, Miss Elting,
Harriet is alive and sound, just like the rest of us.  You leave it to
Harriet Burrell to take care of herself.  I tell you it's all right.
Hoo-e-e-e-e!"

"Don't!  Oh, don't!" begged the guardian.

"Why not?  She'll hear me and she'll know which way to go when she
comes up from the water," answered Crazy Jane breezily.  She was
putting on a brave show of cheerfulness, and somehow this cheerfulness
began to take hold of Miss Elting.  Her shattered hopes began to rise;
she began to take courage even against her better judgment, which told
her that Harriet could not possibly have escaped.  Even granting that
she had, they would have seen or heard from her before this.

Janus stood dripping beside them.

"Now, you ladies go back.  I'll do all the looking that's necessary.
Candidly, I don't think Miss Harriet escaped.  She was caught when the
old bridge fell down, but I'll keep on looking for her.  I'll keep
right on looking all the rest of the night."

Jane led Miss Elting up the bank despite the protests of the guardian
that she did not wish to go, but preferred to remain where she was.

"We can do nothing here," urged Jane, more gently now.  It was all that
she could do to keep from breaking down and crying, but she knew she
must keep up her courage.  Besides, she was still hoping, at times
almost believing, that they would find Harriet Burrell awaiting them on
shore.

"Didn't you find her?" cried Hazel.  They had climbed the steep bank
and returned to the girls.

Neither woman answered.

Margery burst forth into a loud wail.  Tommy and Hazel stood in blank,
rigid silence.  They could not believe that Harriet was gone.  Miss
Elting sank down on a pack, while Jane stood gazing moodily off over
the sluggish river.

Janus came in a few moments behind the guardian and Jane, his arms
hanging limply at his sides, his chin lowered almost to his chest.

"I'm afraid it isn't any use to look further," he said.  The little
party scarcely heard the guide.  Jim had gone on up the bank.  They
could hear him whistling and chirping to the missing horses to call
them to him.  Then they caught the sound of a whinny and a moment later
another.  The animals had heard and recognized their master.  Jim
captured and haltered them with the ropes that he had brought from the
carry-all for the purpose.  He then led the animals off to one side,
where he secured them to trees.  The driver then walked slowly along
the bank to join the others of the party.

Suddenly Jane McCarthy cried out sharply, "Who's that?"

A series of little splashes had been heard out in the river; then, out
of the gloom, grew the dim outlines of a moving figure.

"Who is it?" cried Miss Elting, scarcely daring to trust her voice.

"It is I.  What is all the excitement about?" called a familiar voice.

"Harriet!"

A chorus of screams greeted Miss Elting's cry.  Four girls and their
guardian, regardless of the wetting they were receiving, rushed
helter-skelter into the river, throwing themselves upon the staggering
Harriet.  They snatched her up, carrying her ashore despite her
struggles and protests.  They laid her down on the packs, each trying
to do something for their companion whom they had believed to be lost.

"For goodness' sake! what is the matter?" demanded Harriet, sitting up.

"Lie still, dear," urged Miss Elting.  "You will be all right in a few
moments."

"All right?  There is nothing the matter with me, except that I'm wet
and cold."  Harriet got up and shook herself, gazing anxiously at her
companions.  "What is it, girls?  Tell me!"

"Oh, Harriet, don't you know?" breathed Hazel.

"No, I don't.  You are all here, aren't you?" she demanded, with a
quick glance about her.

"Yes, now we are," nodded the guardian.  "Don't you understand?  We
thought you had gone down with the bridge."

"Well, I did go down, but not with the bridge.  What of it?"

"We thought you were dead," continued Miss Elting, her voice shaking.

Harriet looked from one to the other of her friends.  "Why, you poor
dears, no wonder you looked so woe-begone.  Now that it is all over, I
don't blame you for thinking so."

"Well, I swum!" muttered Janus, combing out his whiskers with the
spread fingers of his right hand.

"So did I," laughed Harriet.  "That's why I'm here."

"Tell us how you escaped.  Can't you see, we are hardly able to believe
that it is really you?" was Miss Elting's excited reply.

"It's myself, and no other, as Jane would say.  After you had left me I
ran back to the wagon to get the blanket and cushions we had left
there.  I knew the fire was near me, but I thought I had time enough to
get away from it.  Suddenly I felt the bridge giving way.  I was close
to the opening into which the horses fell when things began to happen,
and I made a long, desperate dive into the river, hoping to get out
from under the bridge before it fell on me.  I remember seeing a great
shower of sparks falling around me as I shot through the air.  I
wondered if it were the bridge that was falling with me.  Then I struck
the water.  I swam under the water with the current as fast as I could,
then when I thought I had gone far enough, to make it safe to rise, I
did so.  I don't recall what happened after that.  I must have been hit
by something, or else bumped into a timber when I rose to the surface.
It is a wonder I wasn't drowned.  When I came to my senses I was slowly
drifting down stream, clinging to a piece of charred plank.  I know it
was charred because I could smell it.  You know how wet, burnt wood
smells?  This piece of plank smelled that way."

"Nithe, appetizing odor," nodded Tommy.  "Yeth?  Go on."

"I did not know where I was, but I knew I was drifting downstream.  I
kicked until I had headed the plank at right angles to the shore, and
remained on the plank until my feet touched bottom; then I got up and
began plodding along upstream, knowing that, sooner or later, I should
find some of you folks.  I heard someone call.  Was it you, Jane?"

"It was myself and no other," replied Jane

"I thought it was you.  I was out of breath, so I didn't try to make
you hear me."

"Well, I swum!" ejaculated Grubb under his breath.  "I never expected
to see her again."

"What of the horses?"

"Got 'em," answered the driver tersely, "Carry-all gone to the
everlasting bow-wows.  What now?"

"If the ladies want to go on, we will load the stuff onto the horses
and tote them that way to the place I had already picked out for a
camp."

"How far is it?" questioned Miss Elting.

"Oh, a mile farther on, I should say."

"I fear it would not be wise to go on just now.  I think it would be
better for us to make temporary camp somewhere hereabouts.  We are
completely exhausted.  Harriet must have a change of clothing and we
all need something warm to drink and eat.  Do you know of a good place
to make camp for a little while?"

"Back about a quarter of a mile is a grove.  There's a creek running
through it.  That will be a good camping place."

"Please have the driver assist you in getting the equipment there.
Don't lose any time.  Harriet, are you cold?"

Harriet shook her head.  "I'm going to help carry the stuff to our
camp.  Then I shall be sure of keeping warm.  Come on, girls.  Where
are the bedding packs?"

"Down there by the tree, Miss," replied Jim.

Harriet ran to the tree.  "I don't find them," she called a moment
later.

Jim harried to her.  He was mystified to discover that the packs were
not where he had left them.

"You didn't throw them in the river, did you, Jim?" questioned Harriet.

He declared vehemently that he had not; that he had placed them well
back from the water, and that they could not possibly have rolled into
the river.  Jim announced that he was going down the shore to look for
them, just the same.  This he did, starting away at a trot.
Wonderingly, and somewhat disturbed, for the bedding and the clothing
packs contained articles that could not be done without, the girls
instituted a search of their own, but found nothing.  The loss of the
packs meant their return to town to purchase more supplies.  No one
wished to do that, in the first place; and, in the second place, they
needed warm, dry bedding and dry clothing for use that night.

While Jim was in search of the missing equipment the girls went to work
and collected the scattered contents of some of the packs.  Suddenly
there came a long-drawn shout from down shore.

"I've got 'em!"

"I thought so," nodded Miss Elting.

Jim came back lugging a pack soon thereafter.  The water was running
from the pack, under whose weight the driver was staggering.

"Found them in the river," he explained.  "Had drifted into a cove.  So
heavy I couldn't carry more than one at a time.  The other packs are
open and the stuff spread all over the cove.  I gathered it up as well
as I could.  You'll have to give me a rope to tie the things up, or
else bring them back in wads."

"In the river?" cried the girls in chorus.

"Well, I swum!" muttered Janus, pausing from his labors long enough to
consult his whiskers.  "Things are moving kind of fast."

"Oh, this is nothing, nothing at all," laughed Crazy Jane.  "You will
think things are moving after you have been out with the Meadow-Brook
Girls for a time.  Things always do move when we are around.  Look out
that they don't move so fast as to sweep you with them.  My! but this
is a heavy pack."

The girls had taken the wet pack from Jim and were dragging it up the
bluff.  Janus tied this and two other packs on the back of one horse,
then began making ready for doing the game with the other animal.  By
the time he was ready, Jim had returned with still another wet bundle
of equipment.

"Our clotheth are in that pack!" wailed Tommy, as she surveyed the
bedraggled outfit.  "What thhall we do?"

"Keep quiet and go on up to camp," said Margery severely.

"Come, come, girls!" urged Miss Elting, a little irritated.  She had
not yet quite recovered from the shock of Harriet's disaster.  How
great a shock this had been her charges had not fully realized.

The heaviest packs were soon loaded on the horses, after which Janus,
leading one animal, went ahead to pilot them to the spot chosen for a
temporary camp.  Nearly half an hour was consumed in finding their way
there.  The night was dark and many obstacles in the shape of rocks and
fallen trees and stumps were found in their path, and the guide's call
that they had arrived was the most welcome information the girls had
received in all that eventful day's journey.

"Here, Jim, unload these packs while I gather the wood for a fire, so
that we can see what we are doing."

"Fire!" scoffed Jim.  "Little fire you will see to-night, unless you
have some matches.  I haven't any.  It was a bad job when I took this
contract."

"Never mind expressing opinions.  I'm responsible for making a fire,
and nobody is responsible for what's happened to us on the way out
here.  It is just one of those unforeseen disturbances that come to the
best regulated families," said Janus testily.

"I think I can find some wood for the fire," suggested Harriet.  "I
just stumbled over a dry stick.  Here it is.  Is there any birch bark
here, Mr. Grubb?"

"No, but I'll fire some leaves.  I've got plenty of matches," he
confided to Harriet.  "I didn't tell Jim.  It isn't necessary for these
fellows to know too much, you know."

"Just between ourselves," chuckled Harriet under her breath.

"Sure.  I've got a daughter just your age, and she's almost as good a
campaigner as you are, though I reckon this night's doings would have
been too much for her.  You don't find many such as you and your
outfit."  Having expressed his opinion, Janus proceeded to his work,
and a moment later had a quantity of dry leaves ablaze.

"Now fetch on your wood.  Who says Jan Grubb can't build a fire when
there isn't anything to build with?" he boasted.  "Easy.  Not so much
at a time.  You'll press it down to the ground so the draft can't get
under it, and then your nice little fire will go out.  We'll build a
roarer, then we can start a smaller one for cooking."

"I won't be sorry to eat a square meal," chuckled Jane.

"Nor I," agreed Margery, "I haven't eaten a square meal for ages."

"Be careful, girls.  Don't stand so close to the fire.  You will burn
your skirts," warned Miss Elting.  "You will have holes in them almost
before you realize it."

Harriet had left that fire and was laying another.  She called to Jane
to get the supper things ready for cooking.

"Margery, you and Hazel set the table.  If you can't find a dry
blanket, simply clear away a place on the ground.  We shan't be so
particular about our table this evening."

"What about it?  Do we stay here all night, or are we to go on?" asked
the guide.

"I think we had better make camp for the night," decided Miss Elting.

"I reckon it would be a good idea.  I'll make a line and dry out the
stuff.  It's pretty wet," decided the guide.

Janus drove some stakes that he had cut down.  Then, stringing a rope
between them, the two proceeded to hang up the wet bedding, which
consisted solely of soft, gray army blankets.  He took the wet clothing
of the girls from the packs, hanging this on the line also, and a few
moments later the blankets and the garments were steaming.  So was the
coffee pot.  Bacon was the only other food put over for cooking.  The
travelers were too hungry to care to wait long for their supper.

It was not long after Harriet and Jane had begun cooking the bacon
before they sounded the supper call.  No one was late for supper that
night, and each sat down tired and travel-stained, but there was not a
word of complaint from either men or girls.  They made merry over the
meal, made light of their misfortunes, and altogether enjoyed
themselves fully as well as if their circumstances had been different.

"What I should like to know is how those things got in the river?"
demanded Janus as the meal neared a close.

For a moment no one spoke.  The guide's question was one which no
member of the little party was prepared to answer.  So many unpleasant
events had occurred in such rapid succession that it was difficult to
place the cause of this latest disaster.




CHAPTER VII

HORSES GIVE THE ALARM

"Will you tell me where you placed the first packs when you came ashore
with them?" asked Harriet, turning to the driver.

"Right against the rocks."

"And behind that large boulder?"

"Yes.  How did you know?"

"Oh, I saw where you threw the first pack down.  It left the mark of
the rope in the soft dirt," explained the girl.  "I am not gifted with
second sight, but I did see that.  What I started to say was that I
know how the packs got in the river."

"You know?" asked Miss Elting.

"Yes.  They were thrown in."

For a few impressive seconds no one spoke.  Janus combed his whiskers
with the fingers of one hand.  Jim, the driver, sprang to his feet, his
face crimson with anger.

"I won't stand for that.  Why should I throw the old stuff in the
river?" he demanded indignantly.

"I beg your pardon.  I did not accuse you of it," said Harriet.  "I
know you did not.  It was some other person who threw the packs into
the river."

They gazed at her in amazement.

"Harriet, what _do_ you mean?" cried the guardian.

"If she had lived up here two hundred years ago or so the people would
have tied her to a stake and set fire to her," declared Janus,
punctuating his declaration with a series of quick, emphatic nods.

"The driver placed the pack behind the boulder and against the rocks,"
said Harriet.  "Surely, he knew where he left the things.  What is
more, I looked while he had gone in search of them, and, as I've
already said, saw where he had left the pack.  The rest was easy to
understand.  The packs could not possibly have got into the river
unless they had been thrown there."

"But who----" began Jim.

"I don't know.  That it was none of our party goes without saying.
Perhaps Mr. Grubb can tell us.  Who do you think it could have been,
sir?" she asked, turning to the guide.

"I swum!  I swum!" muttered the guide.

"It isn't possible!" exploded Jim.

"I reckon Miss--Miss Burrell is right, Jim," agreed the guide.  "Either
you threw the stuff in, or somebody else did, and we know you didn't,
so what's the answer?  The young lady has given us the answer, and
there you are."

"I'm sorry," pondered Miss Elting.  "I was in hopes this journey would
be free from unpleasantness, but here we are meeting with difficulties
at the very start of it.  Have you any enemies who would wish to do you
harm, Mr. Grubb?"

"No, no, no!  Nothing like that, Miss."

"Do you know a man named Collins?"

"Collins?  Never heard of him.  Who is he?"

"I don't know.  I will tell you something that you do not know, either.
The night we arrived at Compton a man called on me at the hotel to ask
me to discharge you and let him act as our guide instead.  He said he
needed the money.  He also said we would be sorry for having taken you
as our guide; that we would get into no end of trouble were we to go
with you.  He intimated a great deal more than he put into words.  It
was plain that he disliked you very much.  He made a distinctly
unfavorable impression upon me.  Harriet saw him, too, just as he was
taking his leave."

"Well, I swum!"  Janus was tugging nervously at his whiskers.  There
were beads of perspiration on his forehead.  His lips moved rapidly,
but he uttered no further words for some moments.

"You may go out in the woodth and thay it, if you want to," suggested
Tommy, who had been regarding the guide shrewdly.

Every one laughed.  It was so plain that Janus _did_ want to say
things, yet restrained himself because of his position and the party he
was conducting.

"Forget it!" he exploded.  "I haven't any enemies.  Nobody but a crazy
man would try to interfere with Janus Grubb.  They know me.  Why, there
isn't a man in the state who wouldn't swear by me.  If you think I'm
not dependable, that----"

"No, Mr. Grubb," hastily interposed Miss Elting.  "Please do not
misunderstand me.  We are quite satisfied with you, but I hope you will
be cautious.  It is plain that you _have_ an enemy, and, what is more,
I am positive that I have talked with that man, and that we had better
proceed with caution."

"I'll take care of the rascal, once I set eyes on him," growled the
guide.  "What-for-looking man was he?"

Miss Elting described her caller, Harriet adding a few words with
reference to the peculiar hitch of Collins's shoulders as he walked.
Janus eyed the guardian with a worried look.  His fingers opened and
closed nervously.   He gulped, then turned to her.

"Perhaps I'd better not go on with you.  I'll get some one else to take
you through the mountains.  I----"

"No, Mr. Grubb.  You will go on with us," insisted Miss Elting.  "We
are not afraid.  We are quite used to taking care of ourselves, but I
wished to impress upon you the advisability of being on your guard.  If
you have an enemy who intends to do you harm, naturally we shall be
likely to suffer with you.  For that reason I urge caution.  Another
thing about which I should like to speak is the burning of the bridge
this evening."

Janus braced himself.  It was as if he looked for an inquiry on this
subject, but had been hoping to avoid it.

"Yes?"

"I wish some one would explain how the bridge happened to catch fire,"
urged the guardian.

"So do I," he admitted, still consulting his abundant whiskers.  "What
do you think?"

"I think some one set it on fire," declared Jane explosively.  "I'd
like to meet the villain on the broad highway, some time when I have my
car!"

"Yes, it was set on fire," agreed Hazel, nodding reflectively.  "I
thought so at the time.  Since thinking over the matter further I am
more positive of it than ever.  It was an awful thing to do."

"The person must have known that we could get away," suggested Harriet.
"I believe it was done to spite Mr. Grubb."

"To spite me!" shouted Janus.  "What do you mean?"

"I believe the planks were taken up so that you couldn't get across the
bridge with your horses and wagon.  I think whoever did it wished to
make you lose your horses and carry-all as well as our stuff.  If it
was our mysterious enemy, then he knew that we could escape.  But how
can you get back with your horses?"

"There's another bridge five miles above here.  I'll go that way in the
morning.  I'll ride one of the horses and lead the other one."

Harriet rose and piled more wood on the campfire.  She then began
laying out the sections of their tent, which she laced together.  Janus
stepped over to her.

"You sit down, Miss.  We will do that," he insisted.  Jim was sent out
to cut some poles for the tent, Janus in the meantime smoothing off a
space on the ground on which to pitch the tent.  The canvas was still
quite wet.  Examination of the blankets showed that these had not yet
dried out sufficiently to make them fit for use.  "I guess you'll have
to sit up and wait for the things to dry out," declared the guide.  He
was troubled over what had happened as well as what had been said that
evening.  Janus, too, was still thinking of the description given him
of Miss Elting's caller.  He thought he knew whom that description
fitted, all except the beard.  It was the beard that spoiled the
picture he had in mind.  He pondered over this all during the time he
was working on the tent, pausing now and then to stroke his own beard.

"Don't worry about it.  We are not afraid," said a soothing voice at
his side.  He glanced around to find Harriet Burrell's brown eyes
smiling up at him.

"Eh?  What?"

"I said don't worry.  We aren't afraid."

"Thank you, Miss.  You are the right sort.  Yes, we'll take care of the
gentleman, if it should prove to be some one trying to do us harm."

"You know who it is?"

Janus shook his head.

"You think you know?"

Again the guide shook his head dubiously.

"I might, but I don't," he replied somewhat ambiguously.  "It isn't the
party I had in mind.  He isn't around these parts now.  Jim is going to
see the sheriff when he gets back to Compton and have the officer look
into this bridge affair.  I was a deputy sheriff in the county once.
The present sheriff will do anything for me.  Besides, this is a matter
he's bound to look into, anyway.  Here, Jim, get hold of that
end-pole."  Harriet sprang to the other end and raised the pole,
setting the lower end firmly on the ground, motioning to Jane to make
fast the side wall on one side.  Hazel also ran around to the other
side, Margery to an end, then, for a few moments, the Meadow-Brook
Girls gave an exhibition of their skill in pitching a tent, while Janus
and Jim stood back in open-mouthed wonder.

"There!" exclaimed Harriet, flushed of face, eyes sparkling, "that is
the way we make camp."

"Well, I swum!" muttered Janus.  "It beats all."

Jane turned the blankets on the line.  By this time the clothing in the
packs was fairly well dried, but it looked wrinkled and old.  Harriet
now began digging a trench around the sides of the tent, so they should
not be flooded in case of rain.  Janus took the pick from her,
completing the job.  The Meadow-Brook Girls moved rather rapidly for
the slow-going Janus.  He was unused to such activity, especially in
women.

Margery and Tommy were busy clearing away the supper things.  Jim went
out to bring the horses in nearer to camp, where he tied them up for
the night.  At Janus's direction the driver also made a bed for the two
men out among the trees some distance from the tent that was to be
occupied by Miss Elting and her charges.  The preparations for the
night went on with rather more confusion than usual, the party having
been more or less upset by the occurrences of the evening; beside
which, they had not yet become familiar with the routine that marked
the well-ordered camp.

"There isn't a dry piece of cloth in the place," complained Margery,
after examining the line of blankets and clothing.  "What are we going
to do?"

"Sit up until the blankets, at least, have dried out," answered Jane.
"They are nearly dry now.  See!  Harriet is doing something to them.
What are you trying to do, darlin'?"

"Spread out some blankets on the ground and I'll show you," answered
Harriet laughingly.  "It is an Indian trick I learned a long time ago."

The girl had placed some large, round stones in the fire, heating them
to a point that caused them to sizzle when a drop of water came in
contact with them.  Poking three of these heated stones from the fire
Harriet rolled them in one of the gray army blankets.  She did the same
with other blankets; then, passing from one to another, watched closely
for the odor of burning cloth.  Only one blanket had to be opened to
permit the stones to cool off a little.  For a full half hour these
heated stones were permitted to remain in the blankets.  Then, upon
unrolling, the blankets were found to be dry and warm and ready for use
for the night.

"Well, I swum!" observed the guide, "you've taught me something.  Say,
what do you young women need of a guide?  You know more about camping
than any guide in the state."

"Oh, we have plenty to learn," answered Harriet brightly, busying
herself in placing the blankets in the tent, Jane, in the meantime,
being engaged in fitting the flap to the opening.  The other girls were
standing about, sleepily rubbing their eyes, for it was now midnight,
and they were weary both from the physical exertions of the day and
night, as well as because of the many hours that had elapsed since they
left their beds shortly after daylight.

"Is there anything more we can do for you?" risked Janus, with added
respect.

"Nothing more, thank you," returned Miss Elting.  "You two had better
turn in now.  Good-night."

Janus fixed the fire, then walked briskly away.  In their tent the
girls had begun undressing before this.  Fortunately their kimonos had
not been soaked, and after being warmed at the fire by Harriet the
loose gowns felt decidedly comfortable.  No time was lost in rolling in
their blankets, which had been spread on the ground.  For pillows
inflated rubber bags were used.  No one complained of the hardness of
their beds, the little company was too sleepy.  Silence soon settled
over the camp, and the Meadow-Brook Girls slept peacefully.

Two hours had elapsed when they were awakened by a commotion somewhere
outside.  The shrill neighs of the horses sounded the first alarm,
followed by what seemed to be a fall, a whinny, then the rapid beating
of hoofs.

Harriet struggled to get out of her blanket, in which she had wound
herself tightly.  The tent was in darkness.  She decided that the
campfire had gone out.  For a moment she had to think hard to recall
where she was.  Before she had untangled herself, the others of the
party were struggling to free themselves from their blankets.

"What is it?" cried Margery in terror.

"Stay where you are!  I don't know.  Something is wrong out there,"
answered Harriet, hurriedly pulling on her skirt.  "Dress yourselves.
We don't know what--oh, look out!"

Something struck the tent a terrific blow, followed by a series of
snorts and squeals.  The tent began to waver.

"It's falling!" cried Miss Elting warningly.

"Get to the other side," shouted Harriet Burrell, herself leaping to
the right-hand side of the tent in a single bound.  Her companions
fell, rather than sprang, aside.  They were none too soon as it was,
for the tent swayed, then lurched to the right, collapsing over the
heads of the Meadow-Brook Girls amid the continued snorts of horses
near at hand, accompanied by the sound of beating hoofs and the shouts
of the two men at the other side of the camp.




CHAPTER VIII

CRAZY JANE'S "FIND"

Tommy, having been unable to free herself from her blanket, had rolled
over and over until she reached the opposite side of the tent.  Margery
Brown, not having got out of the way, had been hit on the head by a
tent-pole, which knocked her down and so dazed her for the moment that
she lay whimpering where she had fallen.

Of this Harriet and Miss Elting were unaware.  Their efforts were
directed toward getting out of the tent to learn what had occurred.
They could hear the canvas ripping; and the noise of the floundering
hordes just outside was still going on.  Together the two women fought
their way out from under the canvas.

"Catch 'em!  Catch 'em!" Jim was yelling at the top of his voice.  "The
horses are getting away!"

"Yes, and they have taken a good part of the tent with them," called
Harriet.

The men had halted, not knowing whether they should proceed or not.

"Come on! come on!" cried Miss Elting.  She could not see the horses,
but she could hear them crashing through the bushes whinnying in
terror.  There was something sinister in this sudden outbreak,
something that neither Miss Elting nor Harriet Burrell understood.
Jane, having crawled from beneath the overturned tent, came running to
them.

"What a mess!" she cried in dismay.  "I feel as though I had been in a
railroad wreck.  What was it?"

"The horses," answered Harriet.

"Is that all?  Didn't anything fall on us?"

"I think we had a narrow escape from being trampled by the horses."

The guide came running to them.

"Was any one hurt?  What, the tent down?"

"Yes.  The animals ran into it and tore it down," replied the guardian.
"I don't understand it at all.  Do you, Mr. Grubb?"

"I swum, I don't!" he exploded.  "Run into the tent?  Why should they
do that?"

"They must have been terribly frightened," averred Jane McCarthy.
"Now, what could have frightened a pair of horses enough to make them
so blind they couldn't see a tent?  Will you tell me that?"

The guide kicked the embers of the campfire, and piled on some light
wood.  At this juncture Hazel came out, leading Margery, who had both
hands pressed to her head.

"Something fell on her head," explained Hazel.

Miss Elting took Margery to the fire and made her sit down.  Margery
had no need to be urged.  She sat down, all in a heap, and would have
toppled over had not the guardian held her up.  A lump as large as a
horse chestnut had risen on the stout girl's head.

"Oh, my dear!  You did get a bump, didn't you?" cried the guardian.
"Sit right where you are.  I will bring some liniment.  Fortunately,
the skin is not broken.  Mr. Grubb, won't you please see what you can
do with the tent?  I fear it is seriously damaged."

"I want to look at those halters, first, if you can wait a minute."

Miss Elting nodded, then hurried to the collapsed tent, under which she
burrowed and groped about in the dark in search of her medicine kit,
which she finally found and brought to the fireside.  Margery's swollen
head was treated until the soreness had become eased a little.  Harriet
and Jane supported her to a blanket that they had brought from the
tent, and, after tucking her in, left the unfortunate Margery to doze
and rest.  Tommy crept over and kissed her on the forehead.

"I'm tho thorry, Buthter," she whispered sympathetically.  "I withh it
might have been me who got the bump on the head.  But never mind; you
will be better pretty thoon.  Don't you think tho?"

Margery's answer was a moan.  Tommy crept away with a troubled look in
her eyes.

"The horses broke their halters," Janus was saying as Tommy joined her
companions.  "Can't understand what skeered them into doing that.  Jim
must be having a chase, or he'd have been back before this.  Want to
quit?"

"Certainly not," answered Miss Elting with emphasis.  "But we should
like to know what it means."

"Might have been a bird or something.  Doesn't take much to startle a
horse when he's asleep.  I've known a partridge to fly up before a
sleeping horse and cause the animal to break away and rip things up
generally.  You'll find, if you find at all, that it was something like
this skeered Jim's nags."

"I gueth it wath a two-legged bird," observe Tommy wisely.

"That would be strange, indeed," answered Miss Elting.  "How many legs
do birds ordinarily have?"

Tommy flushed.

"That ith tho.  I wath thinking a bird had four legs, jutht like a
table."

Margery groaned.

"Oh!  Are you feeling badly again, dear?" called Miss Elting.

"Yes."

"What is it?  Does your head pain you?" questioned the guardian.

"No, it's Tommy.  She gives me a pain."

"Tommy, come help us put up the tent," urged Harriet.  "Maybe it will
fall on your head next.  That will make Margery feel well again, won't
it, dearie?"

Margery, in a weak voice, agreed that it would.  Tommy retorted that
she didn't care if it did.

The tent was found to have been quite badly torn.  The hoofs of the
horses had left great rents in it.  After examining the canvas it was
decided not to try to repair it that night, but to leave it as it was
until morning, when the girls would be better able to see what they
were doing.

They had once more raised the tent, having been obliged to cut one new
pole, when Jim returned leading the horses.  They were very nervous and
kept tossing their heads, rearing and plunging at the slightest unusual
sound.

"Something wrong with them.  I don't know what it is," he said, in
answer to the guide's glance of inquiry.

"Lead 'em up here.  Well, I swum!"

"Wha--at is it?" demanded Margery, sitting up.

"Look at that, will ye?"

The girls got as close to the animals as was prudent.  Janus parted the
hair on the hip of one horse and pointed to a small wound.  The other
horse bore a similar wound.

"Oh, they have hurt themselves.  Isn't it too bad?" sympathized Hazel.

"Hurt themselves!" exploded the guide.  "Those wounds were made with
some sharp instrument, maybe a knife.  I don't know.  Now, can you
blame them for running away and taking the tent down?  This business is
moving too fast!  What are we going to do?"

"You are the guide, sir.  You are the responsible head of the party,"
replied Miss Elting.

"I thought I was, too.  But, I swum!  I don't know which from t'other
any more.  Jim, what do you think about that?" pointing a finger at the
horses and indicating their wounded hips.  "Did they get them
themselves, or did somebody do it to them?  I can't make up my mind."

"Some one did it, Jan.  The hosses never did that themselves."

"But how could they?"

"Maybe tied a knife to a long stick.  Didn't mean to do any serious
work or would have cut deeper.  Just went through the skin, that's all,
but enough to set the critters crazy.  See any one about these parts?"
questioned the driver, turning to the girls.

"No, sir.  We were under the tent.  We saw nothing," answered Harriet.
"I think it must have been the squealing of the horses that awakened
us.  The next we knew we were being trampled on and the tent was down
about our ears.  Have you looked about here carefully, Mr. Grubb?"

"For what?" returned Janus quickly.

"For thpookth," Tommy replied pertly.

"Pshaw!"

"I mean have you looked where the horses were tied," explained Harriet.
"You did examine the halters.  You say they were broken, not cut.  I
think we should look further."

"Yes.  I agree with Harriet that we ought to make a careful search of
the ground about the camp," said Miss Elting.  "We cannot afford to
miss opportunities that might solve this mystery.  I wish you and the
driver would make a start," she urged.

"All right.  Where's the lantern?" demanded Janus.

"It went down with the bridge," Harriet informed him.  "We have
another, a smaller one, but I hardly think it will be of much use for
our purpose.  I'll tell you what.  Why not use some of the dry pitch
pine roots that you gathered?" suggested Harriet.  "They are ready to
burn and will make excellent torches.  We have plenty of kindling wood
without them."

"An excellent idea," approved the guardian.

Janus glanced at Jim and nodded.  "I told you so," chuckled the guide.
"I knew she could suggest something."

Janus gathered up some roots, whittling one end of each stick into a
sunflower-like bunch of shavings.  These ends he lighted, whereat the
torches flared up into flickering, smoking flames.  The guide led the
way, followed by the entire Meadow-Brook party, Margery Brown having
become so interested as to forget her troubles for the moment, though
the lump on her head was still large and painful.

Just before reaching the trees where the horses had been tied, Miss
Elting suggested that all save the guide and Harriet stop where they
were.

"If so many of us go forward we shall not only be likely to miss any
clues there are, but perhaps destroy them altogether.  I have an idea
that we are going to find something that will enlighten us," she added.

"That's good, common sense," agreed the guide, nodding his approval.

"Is there anything you wish us to do, Mr. Grubb?" asked Miss Elting.

"Little Brownie is the pilot," replied Janus jocularly, waving a hand
in Harriet Burrell's direction.  "Whatever she suggests, we will do.
We can't do any better than to follow her lead."

Harriet's cheeks flushed.  She had taken a torch and began slowly to
circle the trees to which the horses had been tied upon arriving at the
camp site.  At first her circle was a wide one, Janus following her
example by beginning well out beyond the trees.  Harriet's smoking
torch was held close to the ground, sweeping from side to side, the
torch bearer assuming a crouching position with head well lowered, body
bent almost double.

"Look out!" shouted Tommy, as Harriet came abreast of her party.

"Wha--at?"  Harriet straightened  up sharply.  "What is it!"

"You will burn your nothe, if you don't look out."

"Oh, Tommy!" Harriet laughed merrily.  "Is that all?"

"I was thinking the same thing," chuckled the guide.  "Wish I could
bend over like that.  But don't bother us, little one.  This is our
busy night, and right serious business it is, too."  The laughter
disappeared from his face and Janus bent low to his task.

The others of the party had either seated themselves on the ground or
leaned against trees.  They chatted while the guide and Harriet Burrell
sought for the true trail, but it was not very encouraging work.

The two torches flickered and smoked weirdly, now and then becoming
mere glows like distant lamps in a fog, as the bearer slipped behind a
tree or was masked by an intervening growth of bushes whose foliage was
very thick and dense.

"Oh, Mr. Grubb, who of our party has brass-headed tacks in his boot
heels?" called Harriet.

"I have.  Why?"

"I found a heel mark that gave me that impression," answered Harriet
laughingly.

"Well, I swum!"

"It was a guess about their being brass-headed, though," she admitted.

"You would have made a prize sheriff, Little Brownie," declared the
guide, gazing at her admiringly.  "If I'd had you to nose the trail
when I was after Red Tacy and Charlie Valdes it wouldn't have taken me
a matter of two months to get them."

"Who are they?"

"A couple of outlaws who turned things upside down in these hills some
years ago.  But I got them both.  They are serving terms up at Concord
now.  Find anything?"

"No, sir."

The circles were steadily narrowing, though the man and the girl were
working slowly and deliberately, really covering the ground by inches,
so thorough was their search for clues of the supposed night visitors.
No spot of the size of a hand escaped the keen scrutiny of one or the
other of them.  They could not have answered had they been asked what
particular thing they had hoped to find, but in some vague way each
felt that a clue to the mystery would be turned up as a result of their
search.  If a person had stolen into camp under cover of the night,
wounding and stampeding the horses, it was probable that footprints or
other evidences of his presence had been left behind, a tell-tale clue
to the recent visitor.  As yet, not a single trace had been found by
the searchers.  They continued with their work until they finally
brought up facing each other in front of the trees to which the broken
ends of the halters were still tied.

Harriet glanced up into the perplexed face of the guide and laughed.
Janus gave back a glum look and muttered, "I swum!"

"Have you two sleuths finished your work?" called Crazy Jane.

"It certainly looks as though we had," replied Harriet.  "What do you
think, Mr. Grubb?"

"I reckon we're beaten."

"Yes.  We haven't found a clue of any consequence.  Perhaps we have
imagined too much, but I do not think so."

"Give me a torch; it's my turn now.  Let's see what Crazy Jane can
find," said Jane McCarthy.  "My grandfather was the champion shamrock
hunter of the Emerald Isle, and my Dad says I'm a pocket edition of my
grandfather.  Just watch me while I show you a few things."

Harriet handed her torch to Jane, and, walking over, sat down by Miss
Elting.

"Did you really fail for once, Harriet?" questioned the guardian in a
teasing voice.  She understood Harriet's peculiarities, knowing that
the girl was not given to talking when there was real or fancied reason
why she should not.

"I should say I did; that is, I did not discover anything that I could
feel certain about.  But some one has been here.  There was just one
footprint in a bit of soft dirt, but some one had most provokingly
stepped on it, nearly obliterating it.  From what I could make out of
the original footprint it wasn't made by any of our party.  That is all
I found, but enough to verify our suspicions.  Where is Jane going?"

Jane McCarthy was moving away from camp, apparently following the trail
made by the party when they came up from the river to make camp among
the trees.

"That's a good idea, too," she added approvingly, instantly catching
the significance of Jane's action.  "I never thought of trying it."

"I don't know just what you mean, but anything not thought of by you I
shouldn't consider worth bothering about."  Miss Elting laughed softly,
patting the brown head beside her.  "There!  She is returning, and
empty-handed like yourself, I'll warrant."

"Do not be too certain of that.  On the contrary, Jane has discovered
something."

"Why do you think that?"

"I can tell by the swing of her shoulders.  Miss Elting, Crazy Jane has
beaten us all; you see if she hasn't.  Hoo-e-e-e!"

"Jane!  Oh, Jane!  Did you find something?" cried Tommy, in a shrill,
high-pitched voice that Margery declared might have been heard a mile
away.  "What did you find?"

"Did I find thomething?" mimicked Jane.  "Does Crazy Jane McCarthy ever
fail to get what she goes after?  Yes, I did find something; something,
too, that will make you girls open your eyes.  And you too, Mr. Grubb!
Sh-h-!  Not a word," she warned dramatically.  "Come over by the
campfire, where we can see, and I'll show you all----"

"Thomething," finished Tommy Thompson.

"Yes, 'thomething,'" answered Jane with a nod, then hurried toward the
camp.  Her companions raced after her, Janus Grubb bringing up the rear
in long strides, the fingers of one hand clutched in his abundant
whiskers.  Jim stood gazing after them, his underjaw drooping.  Jim
hadn't yet quite come to an understanding of this most unusual company.
He stood there wondering until the girls had passed out of his sight,
after which the driver, with hands thrust deep in his pockets, walked
slowly campward, trying to make up his mind what had happened.




CHAPTER IX

SCALING THE HIGH CLIFFS

"Sit down, darlin's," commanded Jane, after the eager girls had reached
their campfire.  "Sit down and make yourselves comfortable."

"For goodness' sake, tell us!" exclaimed Margery.  "Can't you see we
are all just perishing with curiosity?"

"Yeth.  I'm motht thuffocated from holding my breath," declared Tommy.
"But Buthter ith thuffocated hecauthe she ith tho fat.  Don't you think
it ith awful to be tho fat, Mr. Januth?"  She gazed, in apparent
unblinking innocence, at the solemn-faced guide, who answered with
twinkling eyes.

"I dunno, Miss.  I never was fat.  Never had time to eat enough to make
me fat."

"That ith too bad," answered Tommy sympathetically.

"Come, come, Jane, don't keep us in suspense.  What did you find, or
didn't you find anything at all?" urged Miss Elting.

"Don't worry.  I made a find, but you never could guess, if you lived a
thousand years, what I found.  I couldn't have guessed it either.  Nor
could Harriet, as sharp as she is.  Now, listen, darlin's.  I found--I
found--oh, if you knew how funny you all look!  I found an old pair of
specs--spectacles.  I fooled you that time, didn't I?" she chuckled,
hugging herself delightedly.  "You thought it was something wonderful."

"Oh, fudge!" said Margery disgustedly.  "I might have known you weren't
in earnest."

"I call that real mean of you, Jane," pouted Hazel Holland.

Miss Elting laughed tolerantly, nodding at Harriet as though to say, "I
told you so."  But Harriet's gaze was fixed on Crazy Jane's face.
Harriet knew very well that there was something more to be said; that
Jane really had made an important discovery, and that, after having
teased her companions to her satisfaction, she would tell them the rest
of the story.

"Spectacles were made to assist people in seeing.  Suppose you let us
see, Jane," suggested Harriet.

"Now, now, Bright Eyes, don't be hasty," chided Jane.  "Do you really
wish to see?"

Harriet yawned as though completely indifferent.

"I am not so curious over your discovery that I cannot wait until
morning to hear about it.  I'm sleepy and I am going to bed, provided I
can find one," she replied, rising and stretching herself indolently.
"Good night, Jane."

"Wait!"  Jane knew that Harriet meant exactly what she said.  She knew
that it was time to stop trifling and to explain.  "If you must see
them, here they are."  She drew the "specs" from a pocket in her skirt,
holding them at arm's-length suspended from a string that the wearer
had fastened to them to keep the glasses over his eyes.

Harriet and Miss Elting uttered an "Oh!"

"I thought you would say something when you saw them," chuckled Jane.
Her face was flushed; her eyes sparkled triumphantly.

"Huh!  Goggles!" grunted Janus.

"You have guessed it the first time," cried Jane.

"Green goggles!  Do you see that, girls?" cried Harriet excitedly.

[Illustration: "Green goggles!" cried Harriet excitedly.]

"They are, indeed," breathed the guardian.

"Well, I swum!  Where'd you find them?" questioned the guide,
interested, but failing to catch the real significance of Jane
McCarthy's discovery.

"Oh-h-h-h!" chorused the Meadow-Brook Girls.

"And I believe they are the very same," declared Harriet, nodding
thoughtfully over the goggles, which she had taken from Jane's hand.
"You certainly have made a find.  I think we are beginning to
understand, Miss Elting."

"Yes.  Mr. Grubb does not, though."

"Some one dropped them; I understand that well enough.  But the
spectacles themselves don't tell us who the fellow is by a long shot.
I know you ladies have discovered something about the 'specs' and I'd
like pretty well to hear what it is."

"You are wrong in one way, Mr. Grubb.  These goggles do tell us who
dropped them, if our surmises are correct."

"You don't say?"

"Yes.  Do you recall the little experience we had on the station
platform at Compton on the evening of our arrival?"

"You mean about the fellow who tried to make you believe he was I?"

"Yes.  But perhaps you have forgotten our telling you that the man wore
goggles?"

"Well, I swum!"  Janus stroked his whiskers nervously.

"Yeth.  Tho did Harriet.  And thhe got wet," observed Tommy flippantly.

"Later on that same evening," continued Miss Elting, "we saw the man
again on the porch at the post-office.  You remember how you and
Harriet hurried down the steps after him.  As he stood with his back to
the window she had discovered that the goggles were green.  These may
or may not be the identical goggles, but I believe they are."

"I haven't the least doubt of it," interjected Harriet.  "These have a
white cord on them, as you can see.  So did those worn by the man that
night."

"I saw the fellow you mean," interposed Jim.  "I wondered who he was.
I was at the station to see if your party had come in.  This fellow was
keeping out of sight a good deal, but I plainly saw the specs on him.
Then I didn't see him any more.  He must have hit the trail up the
mountain."

"Well, I swum!" repeated Janus.

"I think you ought to compel the authorities to do something when you
get back to Compton," said the guardian.  "I believe this man of the
goggles is determined to wreak vengeance on us, and for some reason
that we know nothing about."

"I have it!" cried Harriet excitedly.  "Now I know who that man who
called on you reminded me of.  Collins was the man of the green
goggles.  Oh, why didn't I think of it before?"

"But Mr. Collins wore a beard; the other man did not," objected Miss
Elting.

"I can't help it.  They were one and the same.  Does that help you any,
Mr. Grubb?"

The guide shook his head.

"Tell them all about it when you get back, Jim.  The sheriff'll run the
fellow down.  I shouldn't be surprised if the sheriff came out here.
You tell him where we are going.  You better get started now.  No need
to wait till morning.  You young ladies turn in.  I shall keep watch
during the rest of the night.  I take no more chances.  It is time for
something to be done, rather than to wait till it's too late."

"I agree with you," answered the guardian, emphasizing her conclusion
with an emphatic nod.  "Now, girls, go to bed, as Mr. Grubb suggests.
I shall be with you in a few moments We must get as early a start as
possible."

"Yes, the trouble begins in the morning," agreed Janus.  "But I reckon
the young ladies are good for it.  They are pretty well seasoned, but
they will find themselves thoroughly fagged before to-morrow night."

It was not long afterward that the girls were sound asleep, not to be
awakened until an hour after daylight.  When they emerged from their
torn tent they were greeted by the welcome odors of breakfast, which
the guide now had ready to serve.  After breakfast began the hard climb
up the mountain, but the Meadow-Brook Girls approached it joyously.  It
was worth while because they were accomplishing something.  Packs were
made ready immediately after breakfast.  Fairly staggering under their
burdens, the party set out up a very fair pack trail, a short cut to
the Shelter, part way up the side of Mount Chocorua.

The Shelter was reached about the middle of the forenoon.  The girls
dropped their burdens and threw themselves down, breathing hard, with
flushed faces and bright eyes.  Even Margery seemed to be taking a real
interest in life, though she had complained a little of the bump on her
head, which was even more tender than it had been the previous night
after she had been hit by the tent pole.

"No time to waste.  You young ladies get the luncheon ready while I am
fixing the packs," called the guide.  "We must reach the Sokoki Leap
before night, or we shan't have a good place to sleep.  I am going to
leave a good part of the equipment here.  We will pick it up on our way
down to-morrow afternoon."

The girls dragged themselves to their feet and began preparing the
light luncheon that they had decided upon.  It would not be wise to eat
a heavy meal now, with the work of the afternoon before them.  In the
meantime Mr. Grubb assorted their belongings into neat packs.  They
were bacon, rice and flour, coffee and a little corn meal, together
with seasonings and butter, with a small bag of sugar and a can of
condensed milk.  One tin plate apiece and "one to grow on," a spoon, a
knife and a fork for each member of the party, one frying-pan, a coffee
pot and a tin cup apiece, made up the bulk of their equipment.  In
addition to this a belt-hatchet was worn by each member of the party,
the guide carrying long, slender but strong ropes that would be needed
if difficult climbs were attempted.  Janus ceased his labors long
enough to drink a cup of coffee and eat some biscuit.  He told the
girls to leave out enough bacon for the entire party for two meals,
figuring for three thin slices apiece to the meal.  Margery demurred at
being limited to three thin slices of bacon.  She declared she should
perish of hunger.

After luncheon the girls repaired to the hut to make ready for their
climb.

"Now, girls," began Miss Elting, "before starting I wish to caution you
that you must obey the guide.  He understands mountain-climbing.  I
have done a little climbing but not enough to qualify as an expert.
And, remember, no pranks while we are climbing; a single slip might
result seriously for all of us.  Which way do we go, Mr. Grubb?"

"Around back of the Shelter.  There is an easy trail leading up to the
top, but that isn't the way you want to go.  You want to climb.  You
shall.  Have you your belts on?"  He glanced over the girls critically.
"All right," he added, "follow me."

Janus led the way around a rear corner of the Shelter, after having
labeled and stowed their packs in the hut.  He said they would be
perfectly safe there, that no one would disturb them.  But the girls
were rather amazed when, instead of beginning to climb up, the guide
started down a sharp incline, calling to his charges to follow.

"Thith ithn't up," cried Tommy.

"We have to go through this gully first of all, then we begin going
up," he explained.

The couloir proved to be something of a hard proposition right at the
beginning.  Jagged rocks, sudden narrow miniature gullies, bushes with
sharp thorns, slippery, treacherous shale, made the descent a trying
one.  Once Margery lost her footing on one of these shale shelfs.  She
fell flat on her back and slid screaming a full twenty yards, shooting
out on a grassy slope little the worse for her slide, except that she
had been badly frightened.

Tommy was delighted.

"Wouldn't Buthter make a fine toboggan?" she laughed.

Reaching the bottom of the gully, a long, narrow crevasse in the
mountain, they began the real ascent.  Up and up they went, now and
then lying against a rock, to which they clung, out of breath from
their exertions, their faces flushed and warm.  Far above them Janus
pointed out a little projection of rock that seemed no larger than a
human hand.

"That," said the guide, "is where we camp to-night,"

"Thave me!" wailed Tommy.

"Keep going.  We _must_ reach the Sokoki Leap before dark," urged
Janus.  And far up there on the mountainside the Meadow-Brook Girls
fixed their gaze on the bit of rock that was to be their sleeping
place, and where they were to spend a night more full of interest than
they dreamed.




CHAPTER X

A SLIPPERY CLIMB

For a few moments after the guide's ultimatum they plodded patiently
along.  No one noticed that the sky was cloudy until a shower of cold
raindrops smote them in the face.  Tommy and Margery cried out in alarm.

"Climb!" shouted the guide.  "You've got to keep going.  It isn't going
to rain much.  Just that one little cloud overhead."

But the cloud, though small, held a deluge of water which was poured
directly down into the faces and over the heads of the Meadow-Brook
Girls, drenching them.  Furthermore, the water made the rocks so
slippery that it became difficult for one to take a safe hold with
either hands or feet.  Progress became more slow, the ascent more
difficult.

Janus proved himself a master in the art of climbing.  The girls met
with only one really dangerous situation during that afternoon's climb.
That was when they came to a place where there were steep slabs of
granite with no hand-holds.  Over them the girls were obliged to pass
with scarcely a foothold, what there were of these being almost too far
apart for them to reach.  The life line here came into use for the
first time.  The guide crawled over the rocks, taking one end of the
line with him; then the girls, one by one, crept after him, clinging to
the line, every step being made with extreme caution, for a slip would
have meant a drop of about thirty feet and a landing on sharp, jagged
rocks.  It would not have been a long fall, but the landing was another
matter.

Then, at the end, there was another difficulty.  Here they had to work
their way around a corner.  Only one could move at a time, the others
holding on tightly until she had reached a place where she, in turn,
could brace herself while the next one moved up; and so on until all
had passed the bulging rock that had seemed to bar their passage
absolutely.

"Fine!" approved the guide.  "You did it like veteran climbers."

"Where ith the camp?" wailed Tommy.  "I can't go another thtep.  I'm
finithed."

"Rest a few moments," directed the guide.

"The shower is ended," announced Miss Elting.

"Let it rain some more," declared Jane McCarthy sturdily.  "We can't
get any wetter and the rain will help to cool us off.  It doesn't seem
to be far to the camping place."

"It isn't far in a straight line.  We have to take a zig-zag course,
you see," said the guide.

Janus waved his hand as a signal for them to start.  Once more they
took up the weary climb, crawling from rock to rock, slowly getting
higher and higher, but at no time in danger of a long fall.  The
experience of a really perilous climb lay ahead of them for another day.

Twilight was just settling over the upper reaches of the mountain when
they halted for the final climb to their night's camping place.  In the
ravines darkness already had fallen.

"You will all wait here while I crawl around and get to the shelf.  I
think some of you may have to be hauled up," decided the guide.  The
girls gazed up a sharply sloping slab of granite, fully twenty feet
long.  It followed a diagonal course, the top of it being some rods
from the shelf where they were to make camp.  But, reaching the top,
they would be able to crawl along until they made the shelf, the only
level spot between themselves and the very top of Mount Chocorua.

Janus disappeared from view to the left, appearing twenty minutes later
at the top of the long, smooth slab.  He held a coil of rope in his
hands.

"Look out below," he called, sending the coil shooting down the slab of
granite.  "By taking hold of the rope, and bracing the body at the
proper angle, you mountain climbers ought to be able to walk right up.
Who is coming first?"

"Let Mith Elting go, tho we can laugh at her," suggested Tommy
teasingly.  "Thhe won't care if we laugh."

"Do!" giggled Margery.

"I shall be delighted if doing so will furnish you any amusement,"
answered the guardian calmly; "that is, provided you send Margery next,
then Grace, and so on."

Harriet promised to see that the order was followed out as suggested.
Miss Elting glanced up the sloping rock, took the line firmly in her
hand, then waved a good-bye to the girls.  She stepped cautiously to
the rock, braced first one foot then the other, and leaned back until
her weight was directed in the right way.  She then began walking up
the rock, hand over hand, with an ease that amazed the Meadow-Brook
Girls.  Janus reached over and took firm hold of the guardian's arm for
the last step to insure her safety.

"I haven't heard any one laugh down there, girls," called the guardian,
presenting a smiling face to them.  "You next, Margery.  I hope you can
climb up as easily."

"Why, I didn't think it would be so easy.  Of course I can do it.
Tommy, you watch me carefully so you'll know how to walk up.  It will
be your turn next."

"Yeth," observed Tommy, winking solemnly as she caught Crazy Jane's
laughing eyes fixed upon her.

Margery took hold of the rope, meanwhile gazing up the slippery slope.
Her courage failed her for the moment; then, as the memory of the
guardian's easy ascent came to her, she nodded confidently and began
the upward climb.

"Lean well back," called Harriet.

"Hold fatht, girlth," cried Tommy.  "If Buthter fallth there will be an
earthquake.  I thouldn't be thurprithed if the whole mountain fell in."

"Keep still, you make me nervous," rebuked Margery irritably.  "Isn't
it hard enough to climb this skating rink without being bothered by
you?"

In her irritation Margery forgot to lean back.  She began to lean
forward to assist herself, believing perhaps she could make more rapid
headway in the latter position, at the same time finding fault with the
girls for making fun of her.

"Lean back!" came the warning shout from above and below.  But the
warning was not heeded in time.  Margery Brown's feet slipped.  She
threw out her hands, though not soon enough to prevent striking her
nose against the hard rock with such force that it seemed to the girls
that it must have been driven into her face.

"Lean back, Buthter!" shouted Tommy, this time in all seriousness.

Instead of leaning back, Buster slipped back, landing at the foot of
the incline a sobbing, screaming heap.  Harriet and Jane sprang
forward, gathering up the unfortunate girl in their arms.  Margery's
face was covered with blood.  The blood was still streaming from her
injured nose.

"Oh, get some water," cried Hazel.

"There is none to be had here," answered Harriet.  "Does your nose hurt
you much, Margery?"

"Oh, ye--ye--yes," sobbed the girl.  "My nose is broken.  Oh, what
shall I do?  What shall I do?"

"Wait!"  Harriet tied the end of the rope to the back of Buster's belt.
"We will let them pull you up.  I think Mr. Grubb will know where to
find water up there."

"I don't want to go up," protested Margery.

Jane was now mopping the blood from Margery's swollen face.

"Ithn't it too bad that Buthter ith tho awkward," said Tommy in a
sympathetic tone.  "I don't think thhe will ever reach the top of the
mountain."

"Take her away!  Take her away!" screamed Margery.

"Yes.  Be off with you," ordered Jane.  "You have about as much
sympathy as these rocks."

"Is Margery seriously hurt?" called the guardian.

"Yeth.  Thhe thkinned her nothe," Tommy informed her.  "I gueth thhe
will be all right, after thhe hath grown thome new thkin."

"Pull up, please," called Harriet.  "Margery, lean forward this time
and keep your hands at your sides.  That is the way.  Mr. Grubb will
have you up there in no time.  Tommy, I am ashamed of you for making
fun of Margery when you knew she was suffering."

"I wathn't.  I'm thorry that Buthter thuffered.  I know what it ith to
thuffer.  Lotth of painful thingth have happened to me."

"Indeed they have, and we've all heard about them, too," said Jane
sarcastically.

"See how nicely Margery is going up.  That is the way we shall send you
up, Jane dear," said Harriet, with a mischievous twinkle in her eyes.

"You will not!" retorted Crazy Jane indignantly.  "I'll stay down
first, and you know I will.  But you're only joking and you know it."

"Hath Buthter broken her nothe?" questioned Tommy.

"I think not," replied Miss Elting.  "Come, get started, Tommy.  Mr.
Grubb will assist you.  I shall have to look after Margery's bruised
face."

"I don't need any athithtanthe.  I gueth I know how to get up there by
mythelf.  Bethideth, I don't want to thkin my nothe."

"Wait!" commanded Jane threateningly.

"No, I'm going.  Look out!  I'm coming.  Get Buthter out of the way,
pleathe."

"She doesn't know whether she is going or coming," was Margery's
withering comment.

"Oh, thith ith eathy," declared Tommy.  "All you have to do ith to take
hold of the rope with both handth, lean back ath if you were looking at
a bird flying over your head and--Thave me! oh, thave me!"

Had not Tommy quickly raised her head she might have sustained a
fractured skull.  Her feet left the rock and beat a positive tattoo in
the air.  A moment more and she had managed to entangle them in the
rope and, powerless to help herself, shrieked and struggled frantically.

"Thave me, thave me!  I can't move!" she screamed.

"You can use your voice, so don't worry," jeered Margery, who had
forgotten her own misfortune sufficiently to laugh heartily at Tommy's
predicament--in fact, they were all laughing.  It was not often that
anyone got the better of Tommy, and now that she had come to grief, the
entire party, not excepting Miss Elting, could not resist teasing her a
little.

"Thave me!" Tommy's screams had now become despairing wails.

"Just make believe you're watching a bird fly through the air," was
Jane's sarcastic advice.  "Lean back and take it easy."

"We will save you, Tommy.  Pull her up, Mr. Grubb," urged Harriet, her
sympathy overcoming her laughter.

"What, that way?" inquired Janus doubtfully.

"Yes, certainly."

Janus grinned, then began hauling in on the rope with both hands.  He
did it rapidly.  Tommy began to move up the slope, her feet still
entangled with the rope.  Janus pulled stolidly, paying no attention to
the torrent of expostulations that Tommy shrieked at him.  Her
companions were shouting, cheering and offering aggravating suggestions
to the little girl, Margery Brown's voice being heard above the rest.
It was the happiest moment she had known since the Meadow-Brook Girls
had started out to spend their vacations in the open.  Janus was
grinning almost from ear to ear.  Tommy lay on her back, gazing
scowlingly up into the grinning face of the guide.  Suddenly her
expression changed.  A look of cunning appeared in her eyes.  Then
Tommy Thompson turned the tables on her tantalizers in a way that set
the party in a greater uproar.  Janus Grubb, too, learned a lesson that
he did not soon forget.




CHAPTER XI

THE TRAGEDY OF CHOCORUA

"Pull harder!" screamed Tommy.  "I'm getting a ruthh of blood to my
head.  Pull fatht, Mr. Januth."

This sally was greeted with another shout from the girls.  Tommy,
having turned her head to one side to glance up the slope, had
discovered something.  That something was a little nub or projection
that protruded from the rock directly in her path.  Unless they changed
her course she would be scraped over the projection, which the girl
well knew would cause her some pain as well as tear her skirt.  But it
was not of this latter that she was thinking when she called to the
guide to hurry.  The little, lisping girl had evolved a plan; but, that
they might not suspect her of any trickery, she screamed the louder.

In her quick survey of the situation above her she also discovered that
the upper end of the rope was tied to a rock, so that the rope could
not get away.

"Fathter, fathter!" urged Tommy.

"The little one is planning mischief," declared Jane, gazing narrowly
up the slope.

"Yes, I know.  Get to one side," replied Harriet laughingly.

"What is it, honey?" whispered Jane.

"Wait!  You'll see some fun in a moment.  You may trust Tommy to get
even every time.  There he comes!"

Janus, under Tommy's urging, had leaned well forward.  He was grinning
even more broadly than before, pulling on the line with all his might,
the perspiration dripping from his forehead.  All at once Tommy swung
in the foot that was free and thrust it straight up the slope.  The
little projection caught her foot.  Tommy stiffened one leg and stopped
short with a jolt which shook her slender body.  But she didn't care.

"Thave me!" howled the little, lisping girl.

Janus, caught off his balance, did exactly what Harriet Burrell had
foreseen he would do.  The guide was jerked from his feet, and,
throwing out both hands before him to protect himself, went shooting
down the incline headfirst.

"Grab the rope!" he shouted, as he pitched over.

In the meantime something was happening to Grace Thompson.  No one
having grabbed the line, she, too, shot backward head first.

Harriet, fearing that the girl's head would be crushed when she reached
the bottom of the slope, sprang forward, and, bracing herself, stooped
over with her hands close to the ground.  It all happened in a few
seconds.  Jane had barely time to collect her thoughts when Tommy was
caught in Harriet's net.  Harriet had caught her by the shoulders and
stopped the force of the slide, but in doing so she herself toppled
over backward.

Jane uttered a war whoop.  Her joyous shout died a sudden death when
the oncoming Janus collided with her, bowling Crazy Jane over.  She
quickly rolled out of the way while the guide continued on over the
edge, tumbling down a second incline to the surface of a flat rock
about eight feet below.

Tommy got up, gazing about her in mild amazement.

"Did thomebody fall down, Harriet?" she asked.

"No, somebody fell up," jeered Jane.

"Look after Mr. Grubb," cried the guardian; "I fear he is hurt."

Janus pulled himself slowly to a sitting position, and took an
inventory to make sure that he was all there and still fastened
together.  For the moment he was not quite clear as to what really had
occurred.  When he saw the blue eyes of Tommy Thompson peering over at
him, he remembered.

"Oh, that ith too bad, Mr. Januth," she said with a voice full of
sympathy.  "You thouldn't have let go.  I might have broken my
prethiouth neck."

"Let go?" roared the guide.  "Consarn it, I didn't let go!  The rope
pulled me over."

"Ithn't that too bad?  Did you hurt yourself?"

"No."

Jane was sitting on the rocks, rocking her body back and forth,
laughing, trying to keep her voice within reasonable limits.

"Are you all right, Tommy?" called Miss Elting anxiously.

"No, I'm all pulled to pietheth.  Tho ith Januth, I'm afraid."

"Oh, girls, what am I going to do with you?  Please hurry.  It is
getting dark, and we must reach the shelf," implored Miss Elting.

The guide scrambled to his feet and began clambering up to Miss Elting
and Margery.  This time Tommy was directed to sit down, as had Margery.
She did so, chuckling to herself, and was quickly hauled to the top.
Hazel followed, sitting.  Harriet and Jane ran up with the support of
the rope, and in a few moments the entire party was together.

"You must follow me in single file," directed the guide.  "It's a
narrow trail to the shelf, so no nonsense.  Here, pass the rope along
and keep a tight hold on it, every one of you."

They did as directed.  None had any desire to play pranks, now that
they could barely see where they were placing their feet.  The guide
led them safely to the shelf rock, a huge slab of granite as level as a
house floor, about thirty feet long and ten feet deep.  At the back
towered a solid sheet of granite for a hundred feet or more, while in
front the rocks dropped sheer for almost twice that distance.

The girls shivered a little as they peered over the edge of the slab.
The guide unslung a bundle of sticks that he had gathered somewhere in
the vicinity and threw them down.

"Unload and get ready for grub," he directed.  "Here's enough wood for
the supper fire; I'll get some more later on; I know where to look for
it.  Better keep away from the edge.  There won't be any coming back,
if one of you falls over there."

"Yes, girls.  Keep well back.  We have had quite enough excitement for
one afternoon's climbing.  How do you feel?" inquired Miss Elting.

"Well, Buthter hath a thore nothe," answered Tommy, speaking for her
companion in distress.  "I have thkinned thoulderth and theveral
bruitheth.  I don't know how Jane and Harriet feel."

"I feel as if I'd been run over by my own motor car," decided Jane
McCarthy.

"My arms and my feet are tired," admitted Harriet.  "And, now that we
have discussed our miseries, let's think about supper.  We shall all
feel better after a good meal and a rest.  Here Margery."  Harriet
spread a blanket, which Buster welcomed by promptly crawling over to it
and lying down.  "The rock is awfully hard," she complained.

"Never mind, dearie; we'll pour some water on it and soften it for
you," comforted Jane McCarthy.

"Speaking of water, that reminds me: Where are we to get our water for
the coffee?" questioned Harriet.

"There's a spring on the other side of these rocks.  There isn't much
water in it, but I reckon there will be enough for us.  Never mind.
Don't you get it.  Don't you go puttering around where you can't see,"
Janus warned.

A little blaze sprang up from the pile of sticks he had heaped and
fired with a match.  The light from the fire soon threw the outer world
into black darkness.  They could not make it seem possible that there,
almost within reach of their hands, was a precipice dropping down
nearly two hundred feet.  But the thought caused them to keep well to
the rear of the shelf.

The guide gathered the cups, and, with these and the coffee pot, went
to the spring, a mere trickle in the rocks, where he first filled the
coffee pot, then the cups, carrying them back and placing them in a row
against the wall.  Harriet put the water over the fire to boil.  Miss
Elting sliced the bacon, while Jane prepared some rice for boiling.
The latter occupied considerable time in cooking and was not
particularly palatable.  Janus said that in the morning they would cook
enough of it to last for a day or two.

Hazel put the bacon in the frying pan.  Each one, except Margery, found
something to do and found joy in the doing despite their aches and
pains, from which not a member of the Meadow-Brook party was free that
evening.  The climbing had brought into activity little used muscles,
as the girls had by this time discovered.

The supper was late that evening.  Janus had brought the small lantern.
This he secured above their heads by thrusting a stick into a crevice
and suspending the lantern from it, thus shedding a little light
besides that given off by the campfire.  The party sat down with their
feet curled under them and thoroughly enjoyed the somewhat slender meal.

"How good everything does taste!" remarked Margery.

Jane averred that Margery's accident had done her good.

"I've been thinking about the accident to our guide," said Miss Elting.
"I don't know yet how it occurred."

"I caught my foot on a nub," Tommy informed her.  "That pulled Mr.
Januth down on hith fathe."

"Oh!  I see."

Mr. Grubb regarded Tommy suspiciously.  Her face wore an innocent
expression, but when Tommy winked solemnly at Harriet, Janus was
enlightened.

"Well, I swum!  I swum!" he repeated, "I believe you did that on
purpose."

"Why, Mr. Januth!" protested Tommy.

"Do ye deny it?"

"No, Mr. Januth, I don't deny it.  Athk me and I'll tell you the truth."

"All right, I ask ye.  Did ye pull me down?"

"No, thir.  You fell down, didn't you?  But I let my foot catthh on a
nub.  I knew it would pull you over.  You made fatheth at me tho I
helped you to fall down.  Oh, it wath funny!"  Tommy laughed merrily.

"Grace Thompson!  I am amazed!" exclaimed Miss Elting.

"Tho wath Mr. Januth.  But I'm thorry, now.  I won't do it again, if
you won't make fatheth at me."

"Well, I swum!  Shake, little pardner!  You got the best of Janus Grubb
that time, but his time will come."

"You've got to promithe," insisted Tommy.

"All right.  I promise."

"Tho do I."

Peace had been declared, greatly to the relief of the rest of the
party, who did not know to what lengths Tommy Thompson might go to pay
the score she thought she had against the guide who had grinned at her
on seeing her in an unpleasant predicament that afternoon.

The meal finished, Janus went away to secure fresh fuel for the fire,
the girls in the meantime setting the camp to rights, which meant
spreading the blankets for the night and clearing away the dishes.

"There is one advantage about this kind of living," observed Hazel; "we
do not have any glassware to polish."

"Nor silver," added Margery.

Janus returned with an armful of wood.  The fire was built up, flaring
into the air just as Tommy uttered a scream.  The scream was followed
by a distant clatter.

The girls jumped.  For a second they thought Grace had fallen over, but
great was their relief to see her standing a few feet from the edge of
the precipice trying to peer over.

"What is it, dear?" called the guardian.

"Oh, I lotht the frying pan," wailed Tommy.

"What!" shouted the girls.

"I lotht it.  I did.  I wath emptying it when it fell down.  But never
mind, Mr. Januth will go down for it."

The girls groaned.

"Now you have done it," exclaimed Jane.  "Whatever are we going to do
without a frying-pan?"

"I told you Mr. Januth ith going down after it," insisted Tommy.

"No, Janus is not," answered the guide.  "There isn't enough of that
frying-pan left to make grit for chickens.  Two hundred feet and then
the rocks.  Well, I swum!  You'll go without eating to-morrow, so far
as the frying-pan is concerned."

"We ought to do something to Tommy for that," declared Harriet.  "What
shall it be, girls?"

"Oh, let her alone.  Tommy will punish herself if you give her time,"
averred Margery.

Tommy nodded.  "Yeth, leave it to me," she urged.  "I can take care of
mythelf.  Buthter ith right, for once in her life.  Leave it to me."

They agreed to do so.  Harriet turned to Miss Elting.

"You promised to tell us the legend that belongs to this shelf of rock
on which we are encamped.  If not too long a story, will you relate it
now?"

The girls crept to the fire, about which they sat in a circle with
their feet tucked under them in true council-fire style.

"You probably have read," began Miss Elting, "that the Sokokis, a
powerful Indian tribe, once held possession of these hills.  Chocorua,
for whom this mountain is named, was chief of a mighty tribe.  The
chief, in revenge for the loss of his son, who had been slain by the
whites in battle, killed a white settler's wife and child.  This white
man swore to have the life of the powerful Chocorua.  Shouldering his
gun, he followed the mountain trails for many days and nights.  The
chief knew that an avenger was on his trail; his braves knew it.  They
made every effort to catch the avenging white man, but he was too
clever for them.  Yet not an Indian was molested.  The white man wanted
only Chocorua, and Chocorua knew it.  The chief fled from place to
place, ever pursued by the persistent avenger.  Then, at last, the
white man found the trail when it was hot.  He followed the trail, and
one day, when the morning was young, came face to face with the savage
chief."

"Do you know where they met, young ladies?" interrupted Janus, who was
familiar with the legend.

The girls shook their heads.

"Right here where we are sitting now."

"Grathiouth!" muttered Tommy, glancing about her apprehensively.

"They aren't here now, my dear Tommy," observed Miss Elting smilingly.
"The white man pointed his gun at the Indian," she continued, "but the
old chieftain never flinched.  He sent back a look so full of hatred
that the white man almost feared him.  The chief, with upraised hands,
called down the curses of the Great Spirit on the head of the white man
and all his kind.  Then Chocorua turned and sped swiftly to the far end
of the shelf, near where we got the water for our supper, and, without
an instant's hesitation, leaped far out into space."

"Oh!" exclaimed the girls shudderingly.

"The body of the chief dashed from rock to rock, finally dropping into
the lake which you saw as we came up.  Then a strange thing occurred.
The white settlers finally conquered the Indians; then they brought in
their stock and began to graze them.  But after that every animal that
drank from the lake died.  It came to be known as the 'Lake of the
Poisoned Waters.'  The Indians declared this to be the revenge of the
Great Spirit."

"How strange!" pondered Harriet.

"A number of scientific men, passing through this section years
afterward, unraveled the mystery.  They say that the lime formation of
the rocks, through which the water seeps into the lake, has poisoned
the water.  But you cannot make an Indian believe that."

"Ith thith a fairy thtory, or a really-truly thtory?" demanded Tommy.

"It is only a legend, Tommy," was Miss Elting's smiling reply.

"It has been a most interesting story," nodded Harriet.  "I love Indian
folklore."

"Girls, it is time for you to turn in," reminded Miss Elting.

"I don't like such stories before going to bed," objected Margery.  "I
know I shall have the nightmare.  Oh!"

"We will roll you over if you do," answered Jane.  "There's nobody but
ourselves to hear you, either, so you may yell all you please, and----"

"No!" protested Tommy.  "If Buthter yellth I'll yell, too, and wake up
all the retht of you."

"Then you'll be attended to then and there," Jane warned her.

"You let me alone.  I will let you know when I get ready for your
thervithes.  You needn't go on talking about me, either.  You make me
nervouth, ath Buthter sayth."

Janus began his preparations for the night.  These consisted
principally in taking each girl's rope and securing it to his own belt,
which he had taken off for the purpose of making the ropes fast to it.
They watched him with keen interest.

"Just a precaution," he explained.  "If any one of you moves in the
night I shall know it."

"My grathiouth!"  shuddered Tommy, "ithn't it exthiting?"  She made a
ridiculous face at the guide's broad back.

The girls tried hard not to laugh, but Margery giggled audibly,
bringing a frown from the guardian.  Tommy, however, declared that she
would not roll up in her blanket, that she would fold it over her, so
she could get up without disturbing the camp.

"Roll up when you are ready," directed the guide.

Each girl, except Tommy, lay down on her blanket, and, tucking in one
edge, proceeded to roll herself up in it Indian-fashion, leaving only
her head and face exposed to the air.  Tommy sat up, observing them
solemnly.

"You look like a lot of mummieth," she declared.

"And we feel like them, darlin'," answered  Jane.

The guide now proceeded to wrap the free end of rope about each girl's
waist over the blanket, except in Tommy's case.  She preferred to have
the rope about her waist before rolling up in her blanket, determining
in her own mind to slip the loop off after the others had gone to
sleep.  Fortunately, however, Tommy Thompson's eyes grew heavy and she
dropped to sleep ahead of her companions.  The guide lay down with his
blanket half folded over him without a single worry on his mind,
knowing that his charges could not get far away without a pulling on
the lines that would awaken him.

But when the pulling on the lines did come, Janus Grubb was not
prepared for it, and the camp of the Meadow-Brook Girls was thrown into
wild excitement by what followed.




CHAPTER XII

TOMMY FALLS OUT OF BED

The night was far spent, and the air at their altitude was crisp and
chill.  Below them a fog had settled over the canyons and gullies,
blotting the landscape entirely from the sight of any one above the
mist line.  But, though there was no moon, objects could be made out
with reasonable distinctness on Sokoki Leap, where the girls, their
guardian and the guide were sleeping more or less soundly.  Toward
morning, however, Tommy awoke with a start.  She twitched and jerked,
rolled herself into a ball, straightened out again and twisted and
turned, wide awake and nervous.  Her rope being long, the guide was not
disturbed--at least, not then.

An owl hooted high in a ledge above their camping place.  It hooted
three times.  Tommy rose, throwing off her blanket.  She stood
shivering in her kimono, for the air had grown chilly, undecided
whether to awaken the camp or lie down again.  Finally she sank down
and rolled over and over in her blanket, this time determined to wrap
up so snugly that the cold could not reach her.

Then came the interruption, starting with a scream so terrifying as to
awaken every member of the party and to frighten the owl into sudden
silence.  Shouts were heard from all sides.  The girls began struggling
to free themselves from their blankets.  To do this some of them rolled
toward the guide, others from him, according to the way they had rolled
themselves in their blankets before going to sleep.  Harriet was the
first to free herself from the folds of the gray blanket that enveloped
her.  She leaped to her feet, crying out, "What is the matter now?"

A strange sight met her gaze.  Janus was sliding over the shelf, half
rolling, half slipping, in a mysterious fashion.  At the same time the
others of the party were performing strangely, getting up, falling
down, as, entangled in their blankets, they staggered dangerously near
the edge of the rocky shelf, apparently unmindful of their peril.

"Catch me!  Jump on the rope!" yelled the guide.

Harriet's quick eyes, now wide open, caught the significance of the
scene.  Without an instant's hesitation she sprang toward Janus, fairly
hurling herself upon him.  One hand grabbed a taut rope that was
straining with some heavy weight pulling on it at the other end.

Janus sat up as the girl threw her own weight on the line to assist in
holding it until the guide should have recovered himself.

"Oh, what has happened?" cried the guardian.

"Some one is over the edge," answered Harriet almost breathlessly.
"Quick!  Find out who it is."

"It's Tommy!" screamed Margery Brown.

Miss Elting sprang toward the edge of the shelf.

"Stop!" thundered the guide.  "Careful!  Don't rush.  Take it easy.
All the rest of you stay back.  You go cautiously to the edge, Miss
Elting, and find out just what shape she's in."

Grubb gave his commands in a quick, business-like tone; at the same
time he removed his belt and unfastened the girls' ropes.

Margery began to scream again.  Jane grasped and shook her.

"Stop that!  Tommy's doing enough howling for the whole party," she
exclaimed.

Tommy's cries were all-sufficient--heart-rending, in fact.  Harriet
motioned to Jane to come and assist in holding the rope.  Jane
responded promptly.

"May I go and help?" questioned Harriet eagerly.

"Yes.  It's a good idea.  Keep her quiet if you can," urged Miss
Elting.  "She is likely to saw the rope in two at the rate she is
floundering about.  I hope her belt is strong enough to hold."

"Oh my stars, what a mess!" groaned Jane McCarthy.

"It's worse than that," answered Janus, but he did not explain just
what danger threatened the screaming little girl.

Harriet turned the rope over to her companion and hurried to the edge
of the shelf, where she stretched herself on the rock with her head
protruding over.  What she saw was an object that resembled a great
spider suspended from a silken thread.  The spider was dangling in the
air, with arms and legs working frantically.  The poor little spider,
in this instance Tommy Thompson, was slowly turning from side to side,
clawing frantically at the smooth side of the mountain when her hands
got into position where she could touch it.  Miss Elting was trying to
soothe her.  Harriet adopted a different policy.

"Tommy!" she cried sharply.

"Oh, thave me!  Thave me!" wailed the little tow-headed girl.

"Do you want to drop clear to the bottom?" demanded Harriet.

"No, oh, no!  Thave me!  I'll be good.  I'll--"

"You'll be down there in a heap if you don't stop struggling.  Listen
to me!  Are you going to stop that screaming and do something for
yourself, or are we to let you hang there until to-morrow morning?"
continued Harriet.

"Yeth, oh, yeth!  I'll be good.  I'll do whatever you tell me.  But
thave me.  Pleathe thave me!" sobbed the unhappy little Tommy.

"Stop clawing.  Let your body hang limp.  Don't make a move, and keep
quiet.  You confuse us.  Remember, if you struggle you are likely to
pull us over with you.  I am going to get something; then I shall try
to pull you up.  Hazel and Margery, stay close to Miss Elting.  Miss
Elting, will you look after them while I go to hunt a stick?"'

"Come over here by me, girls," commanded the guardian in response to
the request.  "Now, stand perfectly still.  Tommy's life may depend
upon your doing only what you are told.  A Meadow-Brook Girl is a sort
of soldier, and a soldier is not a good soldier unless he can take and
obey orders."

Hazel was trembling a little, Margery a great deal, but the words of
the guardian served to quiet and steady both girls.

Harriet came running toward them, carrying a round stick, a piece from
a small sapling that the guide had picked up for firewood.  This she
cautiously slipped under the rope at the edge of the shelf, prying the
rope up a little in order to do so, thus sending Tommy into a fresh
outburst of terror when she felt the added movement of the rope.

"Miss Elting, I think you had better manage the stick.  You are not
likely to lose your presence of mind.  Hazel and Margery may help me
pull Tommy up.  Be sure not to let the rope drag over the sharp edge of
the stone, or we may lose her."

Margery indulged in a fresh attack of shivering.  Hazel gripped her
arm, whispering, "Brace up, dear!"

"Oh, I can--n't," sobbed Margery.  "My knees won't hold me up."

"Now, girls," called Harriet cheerily, "take hold of the rope, but be
gentle about it.  Remember, a sharp jolt might be a serious thing for
Tommy.  It might jerk Miss Elting over, too, so be very careful.  Now,
Tommy, we are going to pull you up.  Don't reach for the rock.  It
won't help you any to do so.  Just hang limp.  Try to imagine that you
are a bag of meal and we are pulling you up for the muffins to-morrow
morning."

"Oh, I can't laugh," wailed Tommy.

"Then cry, if you wish, but don't make a noise doing it.  Shed all the
tears you wish to, but let them be silent tears.  Now then!"

Harriet stepped back, taking firm hold of the rope.  She was near the
edge of the shelf, Hazel directly behind her, with Margery still
farther back.

"When you are ready, Miss Elting!  Let us know when you wish a fresh
hold."  Harriet was perfectly calm outwardly.

"Ready!"

"All together!  One, two, three--pull!  Steady; not so violently.  This
is a small rope, and----"

"Whoa!" interjected the guardian sharply.

"We are taking up the slack back here.  Good work for you girls,"
encouraged the guide.

"What is it?  Oh, what is it?" screamed Tommy.

"Stop that noise!" commanded Harriet.  "Everything is all right!"

"Ready again," commanded Miss Elting.  "One, two, three--pull!"

Tommy came up about a foot this time.  Her progress was slow, but it
was, at least, sure.

Jane and the guide were acting as anchors, at the same time assisting
in pulling on the line, holding down when the pauses came.

After every pull Miss Elting would call a halt while she worked the
round stick down over the edge of the rock to keep the rope from being
unduly worn.  In this way Tommy came up little by little, now and then
uttering a sharp scream at some unexpected jolt.  Once, when the rope
slipped from the round stick, Tommy felt herself slipping into
unconsciousness, but pluckily recovered herself.  She clenched her
fists until the nails almost cut into the flesh of her hands, and all
the time she was wondering if the belt that seemed to be cutting her in
two would hold or break.  Those on the ledge above were wondering much
the same thing.  They were operating with extreme caution for that very
reason.

"You are almost up to us, Tommy," encouraged the guardian.  "Be very
careful.  Make no sudden moves.  Don't try to take hold of the edge
when we get you level with it.  We shall have to pull you over the last
two or three feet by taking hold of you.  Then we will have something
to be thankful for, won't we?"

"Yeth," wailed a weak voice from over the side.

"Ready!"

This time Tommy came up so close that the guardian was able to touch
her.  Miss Elting leaned over and patted Tommy on the shoulder
reassuringly.

"One more long, strong pull and we shall have you within a little way
of safety.  Girls, are you ready for the last pull?"

Margery was breathing heavily, Hazel, too, was taking short, excited
breaths.

"Yes, when you are ready," answered Hazel.  "Get ready back there,
ready to hold fast after the last pull.  Don't give way the fraction of
an inch," called Harriet.  "This is like things I have read about
Alpine climbing, except that I guess they don't pull them up dangling
in this fashion."

"Pull!" called the guardian.  "Steadily and slowly this time."

The girls were breathing heavily now.

"Stop!"

"Oh, am I up?" wailed the little, lisping girl.

"Yes.  Now be perfectly quiet.  Harriet, can you help me?"

"Yes.  All hold fast.  I am going to let go.  Step back a little
farther, girls.  There!"

"We have it," shouted Janus.

"We have," cried Crazy Jane.

Harriet stepped forward.

"Hold up your arm, Tommy," directed the guardian.  "You take that arm,
Harriet.  Now one foot, Tommy.  I'll take that.  Don't move about any
more than you can help.  Wait!  Her arm first.  Have you got it,
Harriet?"

"Yes."

Snap!  Tommy uttered a wild scream of terror.  Miss Elting was reaching
for the upraised foot.

Tommy's belt gave way when her foot was almost within the guardian's
grasp, and her slender body shot downward.




CHAPTER XIII

PLACING THE BLAME

Such screams as rose from over the ledge none of that party ever had
heard.  Harriet, it will be remembered, had hold of the little girl's
hands, or rather one hand, when Tommy's belt broke.  The jolt was so
great that it seemed to the two girls as if their arms would be pulled
from their sockets.

Tommy thought, too, that she was being hurled to her death when she
felt herself falling.  But Harriet, with unusual presence of mind, had
clutched the little girl's hand with a desperate grip.

"Give me the other hand," she panted.

"I--I can't," sobbed Tommy, who immediately began to wriggle in an
attempt to reach the shelf.

"Then keep quiet.  Don't stir."  Instead of keeping quiet, the girl,
now fairly beside herself with fear, began a series of lunges for the
ridge above her.  The result was what Harriet had feared.  She felt
herself slipping forward toward the edge.  In those few seconds Harriet
Burrell came nearer to realizing what fear was than ever before.  To
let go would be to save herself at the cost of Tommy's life.  Harriet
not only held on; but reached over her free hand which she clasped over
that of her companion.  Now she slipped more than ever.  Her companions
did not seem to realize what had occurred.  It had all come about so
quickly that they did not quite comprehend.

"Grab me!" cried Harriet.  "I've got her!  Why don't you do something?
I'm slipping over.  Quick!  For mercy's sake, move!"

Jane McCarthy, who, with Janus, was still clinging to the rope, now
dropped it and sprang forward.  Jane went down on her knees, grasping
Harriet by the ankles.

"Hold me!  Are you all asleep?" shouted Jane.

Janus awakened suddenly.  But Miss Elting was a little ahead of him.
The guardian sprang behind Jane and slipped both arms around the
latter's waist.

"Help Harriet!" she cried.

Janus ran forward with a rope, making a noose in it as he ran.  The
guide went down on his knees beside Harriet Burrell.

"Can you swing her a little without dropping her?" he shouted.

"Yes, but she'll be dreadfully frightened."

"We can't help that.  Swing her," commanded Janus.

Harriet did so, bringing from Tommy Thompson a series of terrified
screams.  If any one else heard he must have believed that some one was
being killed.  But her shouts and screams did no harm.  The guide took
quick advantage of the opportunity offered by Harriet to slip the loop
in the rope over one of Tommy's feet, then draw it taut.

"I'm caught.  Mercy, I'm caught!" screamed Tommy.

"Hang on to her!  Don't let go!  Stop that yelling until I tell you
what to do!" commanded the guide.  "We're going to pull you up the best
way we can git you up.  If you don't like it, don't fight; just yell.
Hold her as she is, Miss Harriet, while I give her foot a yank."

He really did jerk on the rope, but more for the purpose of tightening
the loop than for any other reason.  Of course, the proceeding was
followed by an ear-piercing scream.  Janus promptly began to pull up on
the line.  Tommy's foot came up with it, leaving the other foot and one
arm dangling in the air nearly two hundred feet from the bottom of the
cliff.

"Pull when we get her level.  No; the rest of you folks keep back, or
we'll all be over, first thing we know.  There!  Over she comes!"  With
a final effort they had landed Tommy on the shelf.  She was sobbing
pitifully.  Her ordeal had been sufficient to upset the strongest
nerved person.

"You poor darling," cried Miss Elting, gathering the terror-stricken
Tommy in her arms and staggering to the rear of the shelf, where she
placed the terrified girl on a blanket.

Harriet sat back where she was.  She was breathing heavily from her
exertions, and further than this she admitted to herself that she was a
little faint.  But not for worlds would she have her companions know
this.

"Better get back," advised the guide.  "One is enough."

"Don't trouble about me.  I will as soon as I get my breath.  That was
a hard position in which to do any lifting."

"I reckon.  I take off my hat to you, Miss Burrell.  This outfit isn't
in such great need of a pilot.  You could get along without me and
never miss me for a minute except when it comes to toting a pack, and
even then I guess you could do without me, especially if that young
lady threw a dish or so overboard after every meal," he added jocularly.

"Is there any wood?"

"Yes.  There you are again.  I never think of anything.  I get lost
wondering what's going to happen next.  You sit down.  I'll attend to
the fire.  It is cold.  You are shivering, aren't you"?

"I--I believe I am."  Harriet got up and walked over to her companions.
She walked rather unsteadily, but they were too much upset themselves
to observe it.  Tommy lay on a blanket with face buried in her arms,
sobbing, every fourth sob being a hysterical moan.  Harriet sat down
beside the unhappy little girl, slipping an arm about her waist.

"It's all over now, honey.  Don't cry."

"I'm thick!  Pleathe give me thome--thome water."

"Water," called Harriet.   "Is there any?  If not, let Mr. Janus get
it, if he will."

"If she can wait a few moments we'll all have some hot coffee,"
answered the guide.  But Tommy could not wait.  She insisted on having
a drink of water, so the guide brought it to her.  This seemed to take
the girl's mind from her recent fright, and lying on her back Tommy
Thompson gradually became quiet and surveyed the guide's coffee-making
through half-closed eyes.

"Do you think you can go to sleep?" asked Miss Elting, stooping over
the recumbent Tommy.

"Not until I get thome coffee," answered Tommy, gazing up soulfully
into the anxious face of the guardian.

Margery laughed almost hysterically.  It was the first laugh that had
been heard in camp for some time, so it was welcome, helping to relieve
the tension as it did.  Tommy turned her eyes on her stout friend in a
droll way which set Margery to giggling afresh.

The fire was crackling by this time.  Harriet dragged Tommy's blanket
up closer to it, that she might get some of its warmth.  Janus, looking
unusually solemn, was boiling water for the coffee.

"She had a pretty narrow escape," he nodded, observing Harriet's eyes
upon him.

"Indeed she did," agreed Harriet, with a slight shudder.

"No more sleep for me this night," cried Crazy Jane.  "It's my opinion
that that wild Indian chief put a hoodoo on this rock, as well as on
the lake below.  I shouldn't be surprised at most anything happening
here."

"Yes.  Suppose the wall should fall in?" suggested Margery, gazing
apprehensively up the side of the granite wall, on which the light from
the fire was reflected in arrow-like shafts.

"Will you stop that?" demanded Jane.  "Haven't we had trouble enough
for one night without your suggesting anything else?"

"You started the subject yourself," reminded Harriet.

"Who would like a bite to eat with her coffee?" interrupted the
guardian.  "Tommy, would you like to have a biscuit?"

"Oh, no, thank you."

"I would," declared Margery.

"Yeth.  Buthter ith never thatithfied.  Thhe is always hungry," taunted
Tommy.

"And you've got over your scare," added Jane significantly.

The guardian set out some biscuits and lumps of sugar on a piece of
paper.  The condensed milk was not brought.  Everyone with the
exception of Harriet and Tommy was possessed of keen appetites after
their trying experiences.  Janus, too, ate three biscuits and drank
three cups of strong coffee.

"Better have some," he urged, glancing at Harriet, who had refused the
coffee.

"I guess Harriet is ill, too," suggested Margery.

"I wish to sleep to-night.  I shouldn't sleep a wink were I to drink
that black stuff, nor will you."

"You watch us and see," chuckled Margery.

"Tommy, how did you come to get over the edge?" questioned the
guardian, now that the little girl had begun to feel better.

"You certainly cannot blame our enemy for this accident," declared Jane.

"I wonder if he did push Tommy over?"  Margery's eyes were large as she
voiced the question.

"Nonsense!" retorted Harriet Burrell.

"Yes.  That's what I say," agreed Miss Elting.

"I suppose she will lay it to me," chuckled the guide.

"Yeth, I ought to," nodded Tommy.  "But we agreed not to fight any
more, didn't we?"

"We did," he replied very gravely, "and we are not going to, are we?"

Tommy shook her head.

"Not before to-morrow, I gueth.  I'm too tired to fight.  Did I
furnithh you with exthitement enough for one night?"

"Will you listen to her?" laughed Crazy Jane.  "Little Tommy Thompson
fell off the mountain to furnish us with excitement.  Of course we are
satisfied.  We forgive you for all your tricks, and we don't care how
much excitement you furnish if you will only keep your feet on
something solid.  We came within a little of all going over with you in
our fright."

"Ithn't that nithe?" glowed Tommy.  She was recovering her spirits.  "I
thhould have had company."

"That is a very ill-timed remark, Tommy," answered Miss Elting in a
severe tone.  "I am surprised at your flippancy.  I really believe you
enjoyed our fright."

"Yeth.  Didn't you hear me laugh when I wath down there?"

"I wouldn't say such things if I had made as much trouble as Tommy
has," declared Margery.

"Of courthe you wouldn't," agreed Tommy.  "You haven't a thenthe of
humor."

"Some people have no sense at all," flung back Buster.

"We have forgotten something," interrupted Harriet.  "Tommy's blanket
is down there somewhere.  We ought to have it before going on in the
morning.  You may keep mine for to-night, if you wish.  You are going
to sit up the rest of the night, are you not, Mr. Grubb?"

"Yes.  I'll take no more chances with this party on Sokoki Leap.  I'll
keep the fire going the rest of the night, too.  Fix your blankets so
your feet will be toward the fire.  The Indians would say, 'Indian keep
him head cool, feet warm.'"

"We have done better than that this evening," answered Jane laughingly.
"We managed to keep our head and feet warm at the same time."

"I should say we have," mused Harriet.  "But what about the blanket?
We do not wish to lose it."

"I'll go down and get it in the morning," said Janus.  "You needn't
wait breakfast for me; I'll have something to eat before leaving.  But
do be careful.  I don't want to have the little one falling down the
rocks and landing on my head when I get there.  Better turn in as soon
as possible, young ladies.   We have a mighty hard trail ahead of us in
the morning, and some more slippery granite to climb.  Another thing,
you'd better put another belt on Miss Thompson.  You'll find some
leather and a buckle in my kit.  There's sewing material there also."

"How far shall we have to climb?" asked Hazel.

"'Bout a thousand feet, as a bird flies," Janus answered, with a
careless gesture.

"Ob, thave me!" wailed Tommy desperately.  "I can't thtand any more."

"Why, Tommy, we've hardly begun yet," Harriet retorted smilingly.

"Maybe _you_ haven't, but thome of uth have about finithed," asserted
the little, lisping girl.

"For once, Tommy and I agree," groaned Margery.

Not long after the girls turned in for the second time that night.
Daybreak would soon send its gray light into their camp on Sokoki Leap.
But the day ahead of them was not fated to be, in all respects, a time
of calm.  Tommy Thompson and even her better-poised companions were to
have further opportunities for distinguishing themselves.




CHAPTER XIV

GIVING A TOBOGGAN POINTS

A brilliant sun, gilding the peaks of Chocorua and shining in her eyes,
awoke Harriet Burrell.

A panorama of sunlit hills, still darkened caverns and gorges,
precipitous cliffs and sombre ravines caused the Meadow-Brook Girls to
exclaim joyously.  Thin, silvery ribbons in the landscape showed where
foaming brooks ran.  There were short waterfalls, long cascades, bright
little lakes and countless valleys of green.

"It's too beautiful to be real!" throbbed Harriet Burrell as she
unwound herself from her blanket and started to replenish the fire.

The coffee pot was already on the fire, supported by two stones.  It
was steaming and sputtering.  Then, for the first time, she observed
that Janus Grubb was nowhere in sight.  Harriet got up and tip-toed
softly to the edge of the cliff, where she lay down flat, peering over.
At first she saw nothing of interest; then all at once she caught sight
of a moving speck at the foot of the cliff.

"It's Janus!" she exclaimed.  "Why, he doesn't look any larger than a
chessman.  I wonder how much would have been left of Tommy had she
fallen down there?"

Harriet shuddered at the thought of her companion's narrow escape--the
narrow escape of the entire party, for that matter.  Crawling
cautiously back, she lay gazing off over the valley.  "The poisoned
lake" lay in plain view.  The girl pondered over the tragedy of which
the guide had told them.  Such tragedies, such deeds of violence as he
had named, should have no place in a peaceful scene such as this,
thought Harriet.

"Harriet!"  She turned her head to find Miss Elting sitting up with a
worried expression on her face.

"For pity's sake, come away from there!  My nerves will not stand many
more such shocks as we had last night."

"Why, I am not afraid," answered Harriet.

"What are you doing there?"

"Watching Janus.  He is down below.  You ought to take a peep at him.
He looks so small and so funny."

"Thank you.  I am well satisfied to take your word for it.  Will you
please come away from there?"

"Certainly, if you wish it."  Harriet got up promptly and walked back,
stepping over her companions, then sitting down beside the guardian.

"You are a brave little girl, Harriet, dear," said Miss Elting softly,
patting the brown head affectionately.  "But don't you think you are
just a little bit foolhardy?"

"I--I hadn't thought about it," answered the girl, flushing.  "I do not
mean to be."

"I know.  You are thoughtless of your own peril.  You know we must not
let anything happen to any of our party.  We want to have other happy
summers in the open together; and, were anything serious to occur to
any member of our party, that would end it.  Neither your parents nor
those of the other girls would permit them to go out again in this way.
Will you promise to be more careful in future?"

"I don't like to do that; I am afraid I might not keep my promise,"
admitted Harriet, hanging her head.  "But I will promise to do the best
I can and not to take any more chances than I have to."

Jane awakened at this juncture and lay blinking at them for a moment,
after which she sat up, rubbing her eyes.

"Good morning, Misses Owls.  Have you two been croaking there all
night?"

"No, Jane, dear, we have not.  We have been conversing for the past ten
or fifteen minutes.  Previous to that time I was peeping over the edge
at Mr. Grubb, who is down there looking for Tommy's blanket.  Still
farther back than that I was sound asleep.  Miss Elting has been
reading me a lecture.  It is your turn now."

Margery sat up at this juncture.  She unrolled her blanket, flung it
aside, and, going to the wall, sank down against it, resting her still
heavy head in her hands.

"What's the matter with you, Margery?" questioned Jane.

"Matter?" complained Buster.  "One might as well try to sleep in that
boiler factory at Meadow-Brook as in this camp."

"That's so, Little Sunshine; I agree with you.  This is a dynamite as
well as a boiler factory, with an explosion twice, every day and at
least once in the night."

"Dynamite?" piped Tommy.  "Where ith it?"

"There, you see!  You have awakened every one of us except Hazel,"
complained Jane.  "Now, go on talking and you'll waken her, too; then
we'll all be awake, and can think about cooking breakfast."

"Jane McCarthy, you can talk more and say less than any person I ever
knew," exclaimed Margery petulantly.

"I agree with you, Little Sunshine.  I agree with every word you have
said this morning, and I'm going to come right over there and kiss you
for your sweetness.  Isn't she good-natured, and so early in the
morning, too?" laughed Jane, her eyes sparkling with mischief.

A shout of laughter greeted Crazy Jane's naive words.  The shout
awakened Hazel.  Margery dropped her hands from her face.  Her petulant
mouth relaxed into an unwilling smile; then she burst out laughing.

"I thought I'd chase away that sour face," teased Jane.

"I'll look crosser than ever if you don't stop," threatened the stout
girl.

One by one the girls went over to the rivulet and washed.  There was
not much water to be had, but it made up in coldness what it lacked in
quantity and freshened them greatly.  Harriet started to prepare the
breakfast as soon as she had washed and dried her face and hands.  The
dishes were set out on the granite shelf, and there, more than two
thousand feet in the air, the Meadow-Brook Girls sat down to their
morning meal.  Janus had not returned by the time they finished, but
came in about half an hour later.  He had the blanket and the handle of
the frying-pan that Tommy had dropped.  He said that was all there was
left of the frying-pan.  He thought the handle might be useful
somewhere, so had brought it back with him.

"I suggest that we take the handle home and frame it.  We might give it
to Tommy as a souvenir," suggested Harriet.

"Never mind.  I've thouvenirth enough as it ith.  I've got thouvenirth
all over my perthon," declared Tommy.

"You may have more before the day is done," chuckled Jane, pointing to
the heights that they were to climb that day.  Tommy eyed them askance.
She did not fancy what was before her, but with a sigh of resignation
went about getting her pack ready for starting.  The other girls were
now doing the same, Janus passing on the packs after they had been made
ready.  To have a pack come open while climbing a steep mountain would
mean the loss of almost everything in that pack.  But the danger of
this was not so great now as though the luggage were being carried on
pack horses.

The start was made in a leisurely manner.  Janus halted every little
while to point out some interesting feature of the landscape, or to
relate some legend of the past associated with this or that particular
bit of mountain scenery.  An hour had been occupied in this easy
jogging before they came to the sheer climb that lay before them.  This
latter was more than a thousand feet, but the guide proposed to take
the greater part of the day for it.  There was no need for haste, as
the journey could be made easily before night.

As one gazed up the jagged side it did not seem possible that anything
other than a bird could make the ascent.  It looked a sheer wall from
where the girls stood, the projections and jutting crags appearing
perfectly flat to them.  Even Harriet Burrell and Miss Elting were a
little dubious.

"Do you think it safe?" questioned the guardian apprehensively.

"No.  Mountain climbing is never safe," replied Janus.  "It can be
done, and easily at that, if that's what you mean.  Shall we go ahead
or go back, Miss?"

"Ahead, of course," the guardian nodded.

Janus got his line ready, a small but strong and pliant rope.  He
nodded to his party, glanced up for the most favorable starting point,
then began to go up.  The Meadow Brook Girls followed in single file.
Miss Elting bringing up the rear.  Now the guide passed the rope to
them as the ascent became more precipitous.  Up and up wound the trail.
The climbers kept a firm grip on the life line, for a misstep here
would mean a bad tumble, and might take others down also.  At times the
girls were out of sight of each other, like the ends of a train
rounding a sharp curve.  The advice of the guide to "look up, never
down," was followed by each one.  In fact, none dared to look down,
fearing to lose her head and grow dizzy.

[Illustration: Up and up wound the trail.]

"We rest here," announced Janus, after they had been climbing for an
hour without once stopping during that time.  It was not a particularly
desirable place in which to rest, being located on a steep slope, but
the spot was surrounded by bushes, so that, when all came together and
sat down, they could see nothing of the rugged mountain scenery about
them.

"Better get out some biscuit or something to munch on, for we shan't
find a place where we can cook a meal until we get nearly to the top.
We'll have to rest hanging on by our eyelids after this," declared
Janus.

"No more mountain climbing for me," declared Margery.

"This is nothing," chuckled the guide.  "Wait until you climb Mt.
Washington."

"Wait until I do!" nodded Margery with emphasis.

"That is to be our next," Miss Elting informed them.  "By the time we
have finished that I think we shall be seasoned mountain climbers."

"Yeth.  And we'll have the habit so badly that we'll be climbing
telephone poleth every day when we get home," averred Tommy.  "I withh
my father could thee me now.  He wouldn't thay hith little girl wath
lathy, would he?"

Janus got up and walked out where he could look about him.  He stood
stroking his whiskers reflectively, glancing critically at the rocks
above; then along a narrow, barely indicated trail around the side of
the mountain.  He turned on his heel and returned to where his party
lay stretched out on the rocks.  There were rents in their clothing,
their boots were scratched and cut from contact with sharp points of
rocks, and the faces of the Meadow-Brook Girls were red and perspiring.

"I reckon we'll go around another way," decided Janus.  "It's too steep
here.  You'll ruin your clothes.  No need of it at all.  You will get
just as much fun out of the roundabout way as by climbing straight up."

At first the girls protested that they did not wish to take the easier
way, but when he assured them it was just as hazardous, they were
satisfied.

"This new way we will see some scenery that is scenery, and you'll have
a chance to look at it, which you wouldn't have in the straight-up
climb.  You see, you'd be too busy hanging on.  I wanted to show you
the 'Slide' anyway," he added.

"What ith the 'Thlide'?" questioned Tommy.

"You will see when you get to it; one of the curiosities of Chocorua,
and a lively one.  They say the Indians used it when in a hurry to get
down the mountain or to escape from their enemies.  But, mind you, I
don't expect any of you young ladies to follow the example of the
Indians.  Now, shall we move along?"

Interested in this new proposal, the girls sprang up, eagerly
announcing their readiness to push on.  Janus led the way to the right,
instead of following the perpendicular trail.  The former trail led
them around a jutting point of rock, then over boulders, irregular
slabs and crags, obliging them to pick their way with caution and cling
to the life line.

They were now following a sort of spiral; for, though the party seemed
to be encircling the mountain, they were rising gradually toward the
blue dome of the summit.  Here and there a mountain bird, dislodged
from its perch, would hurl itself out into space, giving the girls a
start, and threatening, for the moment, their equilibrium.  But they
did much better than the guide had hoped for.  Greatly to his relief,
he was not obliged to go to the rescue of a Meadow-Brook Girl that day.

About noon, however, Margery Brown got a blister on her right heel, and
Hazel turned one of her ankles.  This put an end to the mountain
climbing for the time being, but not to the hanging-on.  The girls
perched themselves behind rocks for support while the guardian was
dressing the sprain and the blister.  Janus went on to look over the
trail and pick out the easy places.  While they were waiting for Miss
Elting to attend to Margery and Hazel, the guide returned with an
armful of dry sticks.

"We aren't going to starve even if we can't move on," he cried
cheerily.  "I promised you that you shouldn't have a warm meal until we
reached the summit this evening.  I'm going to give you a surprise,
though.  Now, what will you have?"

"I think I'll have a thirloin thteak," answered Tommy.

"A cup of coffee will help me, I am sure," declared Harriet.

"I would eat the frying-pan handle if I couldn't get anything better,"
added Jane.  "Mountain climbing is something like work, eh?"

Janus bolstered up his dry wood in a crotch formed by a jutting rock,
and built a fire where one would scarcely have believed it were
possible to do so.  He got water from a little spring just above them,
and by the time Miss Elting had disposed of her patients for the moment
the water for coffee was boiling.  But there was no setting of a table.
To have put a dish down on that slope would have meant to lose it, and
they had too few dishes to be able to afford to lose even one.

The coffee was drunk without milk, though lumps of sugar were produced
from each girl's blouse pocket and dropped into her cup with much
laughter.  They made the best of their circumstances; but when, about
the middle of the afternoon, Miss Elting informed the guide that she
did not think Hazel's ankle would permit of her going any further that
day, there was a flurry in the mountainside camp.

The guide declared that they must go on until a suitable camping place
were reached, but how he did not say until he had consulted his
whiskers and studied the valleys below.  He then gravely announced that
he would carry Hazel on his back.  She promptly declared that she would
not permit it, and Miss Elting agreed with her.  Then Janus rose to the
occasion by telling them that he would make a litter if one of the
young ladies thought she could bear up one end of it.  Both Harriet and
Jane settled the matter by declaring they could carry the litter with
Hazel in it.

Janus made the litter by first laying two ropes on the ground about
eighteen inches apart.  On these at right angles he tied sticks until
the affair resembled a carrier belt on a piece of machinery.  A loop
with a stick rove into it was arranged at each end and a blanket was
thrown over the litter, which was then pronounced ready.  None of them
ever had seen anything like it.  The girls feared the litter would sag
so that no one could ride on it without being dragged along the ground.
Janus said the advantage in a rope litter was that they could go around
a bend with it and not break the side pieces, and, furthermore, that it
was soft and had plenty of give.  Jane winked at Harriet, Hazel looked
troubled, while Tommy's face assumed a wise expression.

"Now for the start," called the guide, taking the front end of the
litter, after all was in readiness.  "The one who takes the other end
had better not carry her pack, but lay it on the litter."

"I prefer to have my pack on my back.  I know where it is then,"
remarked Harriet.

"Now, hadn't we better strap Hazel to the litter?" proposed Jane
thoughtfully.

"It is not necessary.  There's no danger," declared the guide promptly.

"All right, then," nodded Harriet.  "But, Hazel, if you wish my advice,
you'll take pains to hold fast."

The leader of the Meadow-Brook Girls lifted the loop over one shoulder,
passing it under one arm with the end stick resting slantingly across
her back.  Janus took up the other end after Miss Elting had carefully
helped Hazel upon the litter, which tilted dangerously.

"Be careful not to drop me," begged Hazel.  "It's a shame I'm so
helpless that I have to be carried, though Mr. Grubb says it isn't far
to the camping spot."

"Pick your way carefully, bearers," urged Miss Elting.

"Wait!  Let me get ahead of you," begged Tommy, scrambling forward.  "I
don't like the lookth of that thing."  Miss Elting and Jane followed
behind the litter, with which Harriet and Janus made good progress,
though Hazel had to do some clever balancing in order to keep the
affair right side up.

For nearly half an hour the two bearers bore their burden without
halting.  It proved easier work than Harriet had expected, and perhaps
that fact gave her too great assurance.  The way was growing steeper
and narrower, with sharp fragments of rock on the trail, and below
them, alongside, the tops of dwarfed mountain trees.

All at once Harriet stubbed her toe, plunging forward and tilting the
litter so that it turned turtle, like a cranky hammock.  With a little
scream of alarm Hazel Holland pitched out headfirst and took a
graceful, curving dive into the top of a tree just below them.  The
others saw her feet disappear in the foliage, heard a muffled cry for
assistance, then silence.




CHAPTER XV

LEAVING THE TRAIL IN A HURRY

Janus was pulled from his feet.  He pitched sideways, saving himself by
grasping a projection with one hand; then, in his struggles to get up,
both feet became entangled in the rope litter, and there he lay kicking
and shouting to the girls to go after the unfortunate Hazel.

Jane McCarthy already had got into action.  Without an instant's
hesitation she clambered down the rocks and made her way to the base of
the mountain tree.

"She isn't here," shouted Crazy Jane.  "What do you suppose has
happened to her?"

"Wait!  I'll be right with you," answered Harriet.

"She must be in the tree still," cried Miss Elting.  "I hope she isn't
hurt."

"If she were not we should hear her."  Harriet was down the rocks,
reaching the bottom not more than a minute behind Jane McCarthy who was
just climbing the tree.  It was not possible to see far up into the
tree on account of the dense foliage.  Harriet waited at the foot while
her companion climbed it rapidly.

"I've got her," Jane called down.  "She has fainted.  What shall I do?"

"Get her down," urged Miss Elting.

"I can't.  She is fast."

"Wait!  I will be with you at once," called Harriet.  "Will some one
bring a rope, please?"  Tommy, Margery and the guardian were scrambling
down the rocks.  Janus, having extricated himself from the litter, had
picked it up and was on his way down to where Hazel had fallen by
another path.

"Consarn the luck!" he grumbled.  "Can't go a mile without something
breaking loose.  Never saw anything like it in all my born days.
Anything wrong there?"

"Yes, seriously wrong," answered Miss Elting.

"Please send the guide up here.  We can't get her out without
assistance," called down Harriet.

"Janus!"  The guide stepped briskly at Miss Elting's incisive command.
He shinned up the tree without loss of time.

"Well, I swum!" he muttered.

Hazel's injured ankle had caught in a crotch of the tree.  She was
lying across one of the thick lower limbs of the tree, unconscious and
with blood trickling from her face.  Harriet was trying to get under
her shoulders in order to lift her up somewhat and relieve the strain.
Janus crawled up to Jane, who sat beside the unconscious girl.

"Well, I swum!" he exclaimed.

"Do something!" exploded Jane.  "Do you want us to tell you what to do?"

"No, Miss; I know."

"Pardon me.  I didn't mean to be rude.  Only get Hazel out of the tree.
She must have help at once.  Go down and help Harriet lift her.  I'll
try to get her foot out of the crotch of the tree when you lift her off
the limb.  But be careful and don't lose your hold on her."

"If you will come here and support Hazel's shoulders I think I shall be
able to do better by lifting her at the waist," suggested Harriet.  "I
am afraid you had better remain down there, Miss Elting," she called as
the guardian made ready to climb the tree; "there isn't room for all of
us.  Besides, the tree might break.  I don't know how strong these
limbs really are.  You might have one of the girls bring a blanket.
There is one on top of the tree, but we can't get it."

Tommy climbed back to the trail, throwing a blanket down.  In the
meantime, Jane had got down and was supporting Hazel's head and
shoulders.  Harriet braced herself, back and feet, against the limbs of
the tree, both arms about the waist of the imprisoned, unconscious
girl.  Janus was working cautiously at the captive foot.

"Raise her a little.  Whoa!  Hold her there."

It was not an easy task for the two girls to follow orders in that
instance, but they did, their faces growing red under the strain.
Hazel was moaning.

"Miss Elting; the smelling salts!" called Harriet.

The guardian passed them up, Jane grasping the bottle and placing it
under Hazel's nostrils.

"Lift a little more.  That's enough."  Janus was working the ankle up a
little at a time.  "Can you hold her?"

"Yes.  Tell us when you have freed the foot, please.  You will have to
steady her.  Hold her feet together, if possible.  That will make it
easier for us.  We mustn't drop her."

"One more lift and--whoa!  It's free!"

Harriet knew that without his saying so.  A sudden weight was thrown on
her arms, nearly tipping her over.  Harriet's face grew red under the
strain.  Glancing up, she saw that the injured foot was indeed free.

"Let go, Jane, but watch her head to see that it doesn't get bumped."

"You can't handle her alone, darlin'.  Better let me help you,"
counseled Jane.

"Yes I can.  But be ready to catch her in case anything goes wrong.
Please don't try to help her down to me, Mr. Grubb, you'll surely throw
me over if you do," warned Harriet.  "Miss Elting, you and the girls
hold a blanket to catch her if we should let her fall."

Space was so limited in the tree that everyone up there was laboring
under great difficulties.

"Better let me get down there," suggested Janus.

Harriet shook her head.  She was slowly righting the now half
unconscious girl, every muscle trembling under the strain she was
putting upon it.

"Hooray!" cried Crazy Jane.

"I swum, but she is strong," muttered Janus admiringly.  "I reckon----"
He did not complete what he had started to say.  A warning snap told
him that something was giving way.

Harriet had heard and understood.  She shifted her weight to one foot,
but the combined weight of the two was too much for the limb.  It broke
from under her with amazing suddenness.

"Catch us!" screamed Harriet.

Jane grabbed frantically for Harriet and her burden as they came
crashing down.  But, instead of lending assistance, Jane pulled Harriet
toward her just as the latter was reaching out one hand for a limb by
which to break the fall.  She missed the limb of the tree by an inch or
so.  Jane's effort threw her off her balance also.  The three girls
went crashing down.

"Hold the blanket hard!" shouted Harriet.  Then, with rare presence of
mind, she let go of her burden.  The object in doing this was that
Hazel might land on the upraised blanket and thus break her fall.
Harriet reasoned that she and Jane were better able to take care of
themselves than was Hazel in her half unconscious condition.  Hazel
reached the blanket first, but her fall was of such force that the
blanket was jerked from the hands of Miss Elting and her two charges.
However, the blanket had served to break the fall of the unfortunate
mountain climber.

The next instant the other two girls came tumbling down, but they fell
feet first.

"Out of the way!" cried Jane.

Harriet threw herself to one side in order not to fall directly on
Hazel, whom those below had had no time to get out of the path of the
others.  The result of Harriet's throwing herself sideways was that she
fell heavily on her side.  She lay still.  Jane came straight down,
reaching the rocks on all fours right over Hazel.  The shock was a
severe one, and, for the moment, Jane feared she had broken both
wrists.  Miss Elting dragged her aside, then drew Hazel from beneath
the tree.  This move was made just in time, for at that juncture
something else occurred: Janus Grubb lost his footing and came crashing
down.

Janus landed in a heap on the gray blanket.  The fall stunned him
briefly.  But no one gave any heed to Janus.  Miss Elting, Tommy and
Margery were working over Hazel.

"Look after Harriet," directed the guardian sharply.

"Oh, my dear, are you hurt?" begged Margery.

"I--I don't know.  My side hurts.  Let me lie still a little.  I--I
guess I shall be all right soon."

"Well, I swum!" grunted the guide, getting unsteadily to his feet.  "I
swum!"

Jane was sitting on the ground, a little dazed from her fall.  She
stood up and leaned against the tree; then, observing that Harriet's
face was pale, she staggered over and sat down heavily beside her
friend.

"Oh, what a mess!" she groaned.  "Are you hurt, darlin'?"

"No!"  Harriet sat up determinedly, but the effort gave her pain.  She
winced a little, but made no sound.

"My kingdom for a motor car!" cried Jane.

"Let me help you, Harriet."  Harriet attempted to rise, but had to sit
down again.  Jane slipped an arm about her waist and lifted the girl to
her feet.  "Hadn't you better not sit down, darlin'?"

"I feel better standing up.  Hazel isn't much injured, is she, Miss
Elting?"

"I can't find that there is anything very serious.  I think she must
have bumped her head in falling through the tree.  She certainly has
not added to the beauty of her face."

Hazel shook her head and essayed a smile.

"Did I fall gracefully?" she asked plaintively.

"Will you listen to her?" laughed Jane.  "You did it as gracefully as
the lady who dived from the top of a house into a tank full of water at
the county fair last year."

"What I can't understand is why Tommy should have missed such an
opportunity to distinguish herself," smiled the guardian.

"I thtood athide tho Januth could dithtinguith himthelf," lisped Tommy.

"Well, I swum!  I did it, too, didn't I?  I'm not fit to guide a plow,
but I never found it out till I tried to pilot this outfit over the
hills."

"Are thethe the hillth?" questioned Tommy.

"Yes, Miss."

"Then, excuthe me from the mountainth."

"I believe my tumble has cured my sprained ankle," declared Hazel.  "I
can't feel any pain at all there, except the smart where the skin is
broken.  Let me put on my boot."  Miss Elting slipped it on for her,
and assisted Hazel to her feet.  "It is all right," cried the girl.
"Isn't that strange?"

"Yeth.  Thome thingth make thome folkth forget thome other thingth,"
observed Tommy sagely.  "Have you forgotten your troubleth, Harriet?"

"I think so, Tommy.  I will race you up to the trail."

"No; I can't rathe you up a hill, though I can fall down the hill
fathter than you can, but I will help you up."

"I'll do all the helping," Janus informed them.  "Shall I carry Miss
Holland?"

Hazel declared that she could walk and she did, with some assistance
from Miss Elting.  The others were able to take care of themselves,
though Harriet's side pained her frightfully with every step.  She
uttered no complaint, pluckily keeping her distress to herself, but the
guardian knew by the expression on the girl's face that she was in pain.

Returning to the party a brief conference was held, at which they
decided to proceed and make the "Slide" if possible before dark.  There
was no possibility of getting beyond that, but on the following day it
would be necessary to make all haste, for the provisions would not hold
out for more than another day, and even then they would have to go on
short rations for the last two meals.  It was a used-up party that
started for the "Slide" that afternoon.  Had they but known it, they
were destined to be still more weary before they retired that night.
The excitement of the day was not by any means ended.  Dusk was upon
them before they came out on more level ground and headed for the site
chosen for their camp.




CHAPTER XVI

"SUCH A LOVELY SLIDE"

"I believe I am tired out," declared Harriet laughingly.  She sat down,
then straightened and lay at full length on the ground.

"Thank goodness for a level spot on which to lay one's weary bones!"
sighed Margery, stretching herself beside Harriet.  There was moss over
the rocks and it felt soft and restful to their aching bodies.  Hazel
was not far behind the other two girls in lying down.  The little
company were quite ready to rest.

"Girls, you mustn't lie there without blankets under you," warned the
guardian.

"We are not going to lie here, Miss Elting," replied Harriet.  "We are
going to get up at once and prepare supper for our hungry selves.  Oh,
but my feet are tired!"

"Mine weigh a ton," declared Margery.

"Yeth, I imagine they do," said Tommy with a knowing nod.

"You can go on resting if you like, Harriet.  Jane, Tommy and I can get
the supper."

"And Janus," added the guide.  "You've done finely, young ladies.  I'd
like to see any young men go through a hard day as well as you have.
Why, they would have been laid out along the trail from here to Sokoki
Leap.  We'd have had to send a couple of men with a stretcher to pick
some of them up.  Let me tell you something.  You are trotting Janus
Grubb a lively race, and he isn't ashamed to say so.  Any one who says
girls haven't as much pluck and endurance as boys may have an argument
with Janus Grubb at any time."

"Thome girlth," corrected Tommy.

"Yes, some girls.  That's what I meant--you girls in particular.  It's
a pity all girls don't slant in the same direction.  Miss Thompson, if
you will pick out some stones for the stove I will rustle the wood.
No, not that way.  I swum!  You'll be down the Slide if I don't watch
you."

"The Slide!" exclaimed the girls, turning eagerly to the guide.

"Yes.  We're at it now.  Where'd you think we were?"

"O, where is it?" questioned Harriet eagerly.

"Come here, I'll show you.  Everybody that's able to walk come here, so
you'll know where it is, then there won't be any excuse for your
walking into it in the dark.  There!"

All they could see was a slight depression in the rocks.  It was
several feet wide, very steep and so smooth that its polished surface
reflected the light from the match that the guide lighted.

Harriet tossed a stone over on the smooth surface.   They heard it
sliding and rattling down, terminating in a faint splash.

"My goodness!  Is there water down there?" exclaimed Crazy Jane.

"Yes, a pond or a pool, whatever you wish to call it.  I was telling
you about the Indians who used to take the Slide here.  I know two
young fellows who took it just to be smart.  One was unhurt but the
other had to be fished out of the pool.  He was taken with a cramp and
almost died before they got him.  But this Slide isn't a circumstance
to the one over on Moosilauke.  That one is nigh to a thousand feet
long.  That ends in a lake, too.  I'd like to see any fresh young
gentleman take _that_ slide."

"Harriet could do it," declared Tommy.

"Harriet is not going to try it, my dear young friend," retorted
Harriet laughingly.  "She has had quite enough falls to satisfy her.
Besides, she values her life, liberty and happiness."

"How long is this slide, Mr. Grubb?" asked the guardian.

"Over a hundred feet," replied the guide, measuring the distance with
his eye.

"Oh, what a lovely thlide!" bubbled Tommy.  "How funny it would be to
thee Buthter toboggan down that thlide!  Wouldn't that be funny, Mith
Elting?"

"All of you keep away from here," ordered the guide.  "I'll lose my
reputation if what we have already experienced gets out.  Nobody will
want a guide who can't take care of his party better than I've done."

"You aren't to blame," replied Harriet.  "It has been just Meadow-Brook
luck, that is all.  We always have plenty of excitement.  Why, it is
tripping right along ahead of us all the time, though we do not always
catch sight of it until too late to stop.  We will keep away from the
Slide until morning.  I want to see it before we leave, and so do the
other girls.  Maybe we might have some fun bowling stones down it.  Are
there any big ones that we may roll down, Mr. Grubb?"

"There's a whole mountain of them."

"Hooray!" cried Crazy Jane.  "We will have a rolling bee in the
morning, and Margery and Tommy shall bring the stones for us."

"Yeth.  Buthter will fetch the thtoneth, too.  It will be good
exerthithe for her."

"Grace Thompson, if you don't stop making remarks about me I'll never
speak to you again as long as I live," threatened Margery.

Tommy did not reply to this awful threat.  She appeared to ponder
deeply over it, then, edging up closer to her companion, gazed up into
the latter's face with twinkling eyes.

"Do you mean that, really and truly?"

"Yes, I do."

Tommy shook her head.

"I'm tho thorry I teathed you, Buthter, but you know that you do need
exerthithe," repeated Tommy.

"Tommy!" expostulated Margery hopelessly.

"There!  You did thpeak to me! you did thpeak to me!" cried Tommy,
dancing about and clapping her hands.  "You didn't mean it at all.  You
thee, I knew you didn't really and truly mean it.  Oh, I'm tho glad!"
She danced about until Janus laid a heavy hand on her shoulder.

"Do you see where you're getting to?  In a second more you'd have been
taking the Slide on your head."  Janus led her away from the dangerous
spot.  Miss Elting walked over to Tommy and placed a firm hand on the
shoulder of the heedless little girl.

"Tommy, why will you be so careless?  You distress me very much,"
rebuked the guardian.

"I'm thorry, Mith Elting.  I'll try to be good after thith.  But I
didn't fall into the tree thith afternoon, nor out of it either, did I?"

"Her point is well taken," answered Harriet.  "Nearly every one of us,
except Tommy, distinguished herself this afternoon.  How about our
supper?"

"Oh-h-h-h!" chorused the girls.  "We forgot all about it."

"Yeth, Mr. Januth.  I'll fetch the thtoneth for the thtove.  You get
the wood, and we will have a nithe, warm thupper and have a nithe
vithit, and then a nithe thleep and pleathant dreamth.  Won't we,
Buthter?"

"If you give us the opportunity," answered Margery sourly.

"Thee!  Buthter thpoke to me again," chuckled the little, lisping girl.
Harriet took her by the arm and led her gently back to the campsite,
which was now so enshrouded in darkness that they were barely able to
locate their packs.

Harriet assisted Tommy in getting stones of the proper size for their
stove, after which these stones were piled and made ready for the fire
that the guide was to start when he returned with the wood.  Little
more could be done without light.  Hazel got the lantern from a pack,
only to find that the globe had been broken.  Very soon, however, the
cook-fire was snapping and crackling, the girls sitting near it with
elbows on their knees.  Then came supper.  It was wonderful what a
difference there was in their appetites, now that they were out in the
open, compared to them at home.  But there was not as much to eat here
as there would have been at home in Meadow-Brook.  What there was
seemed the best ever served to a company of hungry girls.

Supper over, it was not many minutes before the girls sought their
beds.  They were more tired than at any time on their journey, for this
had been a day long to be remembered, the fifteenth.  They would post
it up in their rooms to look at every day through the winter and think
of the excitement, the peril and the joys that marked that day of their
vacation.

The girls rolled themselves in their blankets, Indian fashion, as
before mentioned.  They were beginning to enjoy this way of sleeping,
wrapped up like mummies, feeling warm and comfortable in the soft
blankets.  No one who has not tried this method of sleeping in the open
in cool weather can have the slightest idea of the blissfulness of it.
Of course, if there are insects they will find one.  There were insects
on Chocorua and they found the Meadow-Brook Girls, creeping over their
faces, getting into their hair, but failing to find their way under the
tightly rolled blankets.  The girls were as wholly oblivious to the
insects as to the chattering squirrels that leaped from one rolled
figure to another, then off up the rocks, only to return again and take
up their game of "leap" over the sleeping Meadow-Brook Girls.

The day had no more than dawned when Tommy was awake, unrolling
herself, but taking the precaution to see where the unrolling would
land her.  She had not forgotten her experience at Sokoki Leap, or the
fall from the shelf into space.  This ground was fairly level and there
were no jumping-off places, except the Slide.  She was not rolling in
that direction.  Freeing herself, Tommy shook Margery awake, then began
calling her companions.  Janus sat up, took account of the time and lay
back for another nap.

"Januth ith taking hith beauty thleep," observed Tommy wisely.

Margery complained at being called so early; but when Tommy told her
they were going to skip stones down the Slide, Buster was all eagerness
to be up and at it.  The girls did not even take the time to wash their
faces, but ran to the Slide and gazed timidly down its slippery way.

"Come on.  Let'th get thome thtoneth," urged Grace.  She uttered a
merry shout as the first round stone rolled down the Slide, bumping
from side to side, finally landing with a splash in the pond, sending
up a little white geyser of spray.  Buster also began to take a more
active interest in life.  She, too, shouted as she sent a fair-sized
boulder spinning down the incline.

"My, what a racket!" cried Jane.  "Harriet, shall we go join the game?"

"I am getting ready as fast as I can.  You had better remain quiet for
a time yet, Hazel."

Hazel said she would.  Miss Elting also lay gazing up at the sky,
following with her eyes the flight of the birds, many of which, high in
the air, were soaring toward the east to meet the coming of the day.

Harriet picked up a boulder on her way to the Slide, and, reaching
there, sent it spinning with the wrist movement peculiar to bowlers.
The boulder skipped some rods out into the pond far below them before
it sank under the water and disappeared, leaving a white trail in its
wake.

"I can do that," declared Tommy Thompson.

Janus unwound himself from his blanket and stood with his hands in
pockets, observing the jolly party.

"Don't lean over too far forward when you throw," warned Harriet.

"You jutht watch me.  I'm going to make thith one thkip clear acroth
the pond.  Here it goeth.  Oh, what a lovely Thlide!"

In her excitement, Tommy leaped to the end of the slippery course,
jumping up and down.  In her left hand she held another round stone
ready to send it after the previous throw before the latter should have
reached the pond.  Margery was standing at hand ready to send hers down.

"Look out!" warned Harriet, who saw the danger of Grace's position.
"Get back instantly!"  Both she and Jane started on a run, fearing the
result of Tommy's imprudence.  But they were too late.

Tommy Thompson's feet slipped from under her.  With a scream she
plunged head first to the Slide, starting down it on her stomach.

"Catch her!" screamed Jane.

Margery made a frantic effort to do so.  Then her feet, too, went out
from under her, but in making a desperate attempt to recover her
balance, Margery turned completely around, landing on her back on the
slippery Slide.

"Hold your breath," screamed Harriet, starting to run again, for she
had halted instinctively as she saw the two girls lose their footing.
Jane followed.  Janus stood fairly paralyzed with amazement.  It had
all come about with such suddenness that he had had no time in which to
collect his thoughts.  When he did, he uttered a yell.

"Come back!" he roared.

But the two girls were past coming back for the time being.  The third
girl, Harriet Burrell, was running toward the upper end of the Slide,
having made a short detour to enable her to get exactly in line with
it.  Now she raised herself on her tiptoes, at the same time bending
over and taking a low, shooting leap, dived headfirst to the Slide,
down which she shot at a dizzy rate of speed.

"Oh, she'll be killed!"  Crazy Jane halted at the top, gazed down the
long, slippery rock, then plumped herself down on the Slide in a
sitting posture.  She was on her way before she found time to change
her mind.  When she did change her mind it did her no good, so far as
changing the situation was concerned.  A procession of Meadow-Brook
Girls was well started on a perilous journey, the result of which could
not be foreseen by the three members of the party left in the camp.




CHAPTER XVII

WHAT CAME OF SHOOTING THE CHUTE

Miss Elting had begun to unwind herself the instant her attention had
been called to Grace Thompson's perilous position at the head of the
chute.  Hazel Holland also had rolled over to free herself of the
blankets.  But before either of them had succeeded in getting to her
feet, Tommy had taken the long dive, followed, as the reader already
knows, by Margery, and later by Harriet Burrell and Jane McCarthy.

"They'll be killed!  Oh, those girls!" wailed the guardian.  "Go after
them, Janus."

"They are quite likely to be," observed the guide huskily.  "I can go
after them, but I can't stop them.  There they are."

They heard the splash--in fact, several distinct splashes--faint, it is
true, but sufficient to tell those in the camp that the girls had
reached their destination, the pond at the foot of the Slide.  Janus
already was racing down the mountain, jumping, stumbling, falling now
and then, but making his way down as rapidly as possible.

"Remain here, Hazel," commanded Miss Elting.  Then she, too, hurried
down, making even better time than did the guide, for the guardian was
more agile and much lighter on her feet.

Fortunately for Tommy, she had been headed straight along the center of
the Slide from the beginning.  The chute sloped somewhat toward the
middle.  Tommy had instinctively kept her head up, arms thrust straight
ahead of her.  She began gasping for breath, and, either obeying
Harriet's direction or the instinct of the swimmer, she closed her lips
tightly and held her breath.  Her little body flashed through a thick
growth of bushes that hung over the chute at one point.  She had seen
the bushes coming at her like a projectile and instinctively lowered
her head before reaching them.  But she quickly raised her head again,
uttering an exclamation, as the skin was neatly peeled from the bridge
of her nose.

"Oh, thave me!" groaned Tommy, as the pond rose up to meet her.  She
caught and held her breath.  When she struck the water a sheet of it
rose up on each side of her just as the water does at the launching of
a steamship, only there was much less displacement in Tommy's case.  To
her amazement she skimmed along the surface a few feet before she began
to settle.  Unfortunately, at about that time Tommy opened her mouth
for a breath of fresh air.  Instead she got a mouthful of water.  She
began to kick and struggle.

Down went Tommy, still struggling and kicking and striking out blindly,
for the girl had not yet recovered from the shock.  It was while she
was down that another girlish figure shot straight into the lake.
Instead of skimming the surface this second figure came down on her
back with a mighty splash, turned a half-somersault, landing on her
feet, where she stood treading water and screaming.

Now a third figure shot down the chute.  It took the water in a clean
dive, going clear under, passing close by where Margery was treading
water and screaming for help.  When Harriet finally did come up,
shaking the water from eyes and head, she was seen to be only a few
feet from Grace, who now was making a great splashing on her way to the
opposite shore.  Tommy could not speak as yet, but she could swim, and
swim she did.

Observing that Tommy was not in immediate need of assistance, Harriet
turned back toward Margery, who plainly was expending her strength
without accomplishing very much.  Harriet was just in time to see Jane
McCarthy sit down in the pond.  She made a great disturbance, added to
which was a wild yell as she felt the water rising about her.  Jane
went into the water over her head.  Margery, seized by a panic, forgot
to tread water and went clear to the bottom.

Harriet, still gasping for breath from her long slide and the dive
under water following, plunged ahead and dived again.  She came up with
the struggling, choking Buster firmly gripped in one hand.  Margery was
trying to grasp Harriet, and the latter was experiencing some
difficulty in keeping out of her clutches.  Tommy, in the meantime, had
reached the other side of the pond and crawled up on the shore, where
she lay complaining to herself, watching the struggle in the water with
wide-open eyes.  Now and then she shouted a suggestion.

"Oh, my stars!" cried Jane.  Coming up, she splashed about in the pond
trying to get her bearings.  Then, seeing Harriet's struggle with
Margery, Jane headed for them in a series of porpoise-like lunges.  The
last reach brought a hand in contact with one of Margery's feet.  Jane
gave it a mighty tug.  "Put her under, put her under!  That'll stop
her!" shouted Jane.

"Let go, Jane," called Harriet.  "She is all right now.  She has her
bearings now.  Let us see if she has forgotten how to swim."  Harriet
threw Margery off.  The latter splashed and floundered in the cold
water, then all at once struck off for the shore.  She reached it and
scrambled to the bank, up which she staggered and sank whimpering to
the earth.

Jane and Harriet swam shoreward.  Jane was laughing almost
hysterically.  Though she felt chilled and exhausted, Harriet's eyes
twinkled.  The two struggled to the bank, there to sit down laughing.

"Are you safe?" shouted Miss Elting.

"Hoo-e-e-e!" answered the two girls.

"Are you all right, Tommy?" Harriet next called across the pond.

"Yeth, but I'm _almotht_ wet and cold.  My clothes are thoaked, and
there are ithicleth hanging from my eyebrowth.  Thomebody better thave
me?"

"Come over here," proposed Harriet, teasingly, "and we will."

"I can't," Tommy replied, with a shake of her head.  "Too many
thraight, high rockth in the way."

"Swim across, darlin'," urged Jane.

"Can't do that either, the water ith too cold."

"Then you'll have to stay where you are," laughed Jane.  "If you get
hungry, come over and I'll give you a biscuit to take back there with
you."

"Girls, I feel so relieved," cried Miss Elting, running down to join
them.  "But why did you do such a foolish thing?"

"We came after Tommy," replied Miss McCarthy.  "If that were foolish,
we apologize."

"Tommy," ordered Miss Elting, "come here!"

"I can't," complained the little one.

"We'll have to go after her," sighed Harriet, "or the little goose will
stay there.  Miss Elting, how would you like to take a nice, cool
morning swim?"

"No, thank you," replied the guardian, with a little shiver.  "Here is
Janus.  You see that my girls are all valiant, Mr. Grubb."

There was a note of pride in the guardian's voice.

"Well, I swum!" was the guide's greeting.  "Ye did do it!"

"Yes, sir; and I shouldn't mind doing it again.  Oh, it was such sport,
Miss Elting.  Please, may we go up and have another slide?" begged
Harriet.

"Oh, goodness, yes.  Please let us," urged Jane.

"By no means.  I am amazed that you should ask such a thing.  I forbid
it.   Please get Tommy, if you are going to.  She will stay there as
long as we will wait here.  I really don't know what I am going to do
with Tommy."

"I wish you would do something, Miss Elting.  She surely will be the
death of me.  Think of me, with my weak heart, having to submit to such
terribly exciting adventures," complained Margery.

"Just listen to Buster," chuckled Crazy Jane.  "We must be so very
careful of her."

"Well, I suppose we might as well get in if we are going to," decided
Harriet.  "We can't be any wetter than we are, Jane."

"But we can be colder.  All right.  I'm with you."

Harriet dived in to get the shock over, coming up blowing.  A splash
followed hers and Jane came up beside her, shaking the water from her
head and ears.

"My, but it's cold, isn't it, darlin'," she gasped.

"Cold as a snowbank," answered Harriet.

"I'll race you to the other side."

"Go you!  Now!"

How the water did fly as they struck out in overhand strokes, shouting
and laughing, cheered on by Miss Elting and Margery, on the other side
by the irrepressible Tommy, who was dancing up and down on the shore,
shouting and clapping her hands in great glee!  The swimmers landed,
laughing merrily as they made for shore.  But they did not wait to
argue with Tommy.  Instead they picked her up bodily and tossed her
into the pond.  Tommy screamed and tried to fight, but she had little
opportunity for resistance before she went in with a splash.

They sprang in after her, pulling the girl down, she having got to her
feet in the meantime.

"Swim! swim, or we will hold your head under!" threatened Jane.

Tommy refused to swim.

"Grab her foot.  We'll tow her," commanded Harriet.  Suiting the action
to the word, she grasped one of Tommy's ankles, and throwing herself on
her back began to swim with feet and free arm for the opposite side of
the pond.

"Hooray!" cried Jane, making a couple of leaps forward, and getting a
firm hold of the other ankle of the now loudly screaming Tommy.  "Toot,
toot!  The tug is going ahead.  How do you like being towed, darlin'?"

Tommy's yells indicated that she did not fancy it, especially being
towed feet first.  Her head went under water almost instantly.  Tommy
was obliged to help herself or drown.  She began working her arms,
trying to keep her head above water, but found it awkward swimming that
way.  She never had tried the feet first style of swimming.  No one of
the party ever had, except Harriet, who could make very good progress
that way.

"Hold your breath, dear," suggested Harriet sweetly.  "You will not
swallow so much water that way."

"How--how long must I hold it?"

"Not more than five minutes," comforted Crazy Jane.

"Thave----"  She did not complete the sentence, because a volume of
water rolled into her open mouth.

They had nearly reached the middle of the pond, when Harriet stopped
swimming.

"I am afraid we shall have to turn her around.  Tommy will persist in
opening her mouth.  We mustn't drown her," said Harriet.

Jane righted their tow with a jerk.

"Those girls, those girls!" muttered Miss Elting, turning a laughing
face to Janus Grubb.

"Well, I swum!" he answered, nodding.  "Never saw such a bunch of
girls.  Are they always like they have been this time?"

"Always," chuckled the guardian.  "Usually more so."

"Well, I swum!"

"Will you swim, or will you drown?" demanded Jane of Tommy.

"I'll thwim, I'll thwim," answered Tommy chokingly.  "I think you are
horrid to treat me tho.  I'll be even with you."

Jane started for her.  Tommy got into instant action, and how she did
swim!  Harriet and Jane were much faster swimmers than was Tommy, but
they pretended to have difficulty in keeping up with her and lagged
behind until their shoulders were even with the kicking feet of the
little, lisping girl.  Then they began grabbing at her ankles, drawing
fresh shouts and protests from Tommy.  They teased her all the way to
the shore, up which Tommy staggered and ran to Miss Elting for
protection.

"Don't make me all wet," objected the guardian, leaping back out of the
way.

Tommy sat down and whimpered.  Jane and Harriet picked her up, placing
her on a seat made of their four hands, and started up the mountainside
with their burden.

"We aren't afraid of getting wet, are we, Jane?" laughed Harriet.

"Not this morning, we are not, darlin'," chuckled Jane.  But they did
not carry Tommy far.  She decided that she would walk, fearing they
were planning some trick on her.  She had no desire to be dumped off on
a steep place as Hazel had been.  The girls clambered up the
mountainside laughing over their mishaps of the morning, and ran
bounding into camp far ahead of Miss Elting and the guide.  They found
Hazel very much excited over something that had occurred in the camp
during their absence.




CHAPTER XVIII

FACED BY A FRESH MYSTERY

There were serious expressions on the faces of the Meadow-Brook Girls
when Miss Elting and the guide came in.  Miss Elting saw at once that
something was amiss.  She demanded to know what it was.

"Hazel saw something that frightened her," answered Harriet.

"Saw something?" repeated the guardian, looking from one girl to the
other.

"Tell it," urged Harriet, nodding to Hazel.

"I was watching for you and the girls when I thought I heard something
behind me.  I looked around but saw nothing unusual.  But I had a
feeling that some one was about.  I walked to the other end of the camp
and back.  I saw no one--nothing, I hadn't thought to look up.
Something made me do so just then and I saw it."

"Saw what?" demanded the guardian and the guide in chorus.

"A man."

"You did?" exclaimed Janus.  "Where?"

"He was behind those green bushes that you see up there--Oh, he has
gone.  No need to go up there now, Mr. Grubb."  Janus had begun to
climb the rocks.

"Yes.  Please wait and hear the rest of the story," ordered Miss
Elting, who was deeply interested, but apparently undisturbed.  "What
sort of looking man was he, Hazel?"

"He wore a long, black beard, and--"

"You are positive of this?" interrupted Miss Elting.

"Yes.  I saw him plainly.  That is, I saw his head and shoulders.  The
rest of his body was hidden behind the bushes.  I was going to cry out,
but I knew you couldn't hear me.  There was too much noise down there,
so I just stood still."

"Did he speak to you?" asked Janus.

"No.  I spoke to him.  I asked him what he wanted.  He did not reply.
Instead, he dodged behind the bushes and ran.  I could see, from the
movement of the bushes to the right there, that he was getting away
very rapidly."

"Did the man wear green goggles?" asked the guide.

"No, sir.  He wore no glasses."

"Of course not.  We've got the green goggles," broke in Jane.  "But the
whiskers!  Our enemy wore whiskers, didn't he?"

"What do you make of this, Mr. Grubb?" questioned Miss Elting, eyeing
Janus sharply.

"Can't make anything of it.  Might be most anybody.  A good many
persons up in these parts wear whiskers."  Janus stroked his own
reflectively.  "And then again, a good many more do not, so I don't see
that his whiskers prove much.  Wish I might have seen him.  If you
don't mind I'll go up there now and see what I can find."

Harriet said she would accompany him and assist in the search.

"You couldn't recognize in him the man we saw on the station platform
at Compton the night of our arrival, could you, Hazel?" asked the
guardian.

"Oh, no.  I don't believe it was the same person at all."

"Then we are no wiser than before, except that it behooves us to keep
our eyes open.  If that man has followed us into the mountains we shall
hear more of him.  Do you find anything up there, Harriet?"

"We find where he has broken down some bushes, but that is all.  No
footprints.  I might possibly pick up his trail, but over the rocks
there would be slight chance of running it down."

"I couldn't permit it," was Miss Elting's decisive reply.  "Come down.
Jane, will you please start the fire?  We will have breakfast."

"Oh, yeth, we haven't had breakfatht yet," piped Tommy.

"Nor have you dried your clothes.  Every one of you except Hazel is wet
to the skin."

Jane had brought some dry sticks by the time the guide and Harriet
returned.  Janus got more, realizing the condition of his party, and
wishing to build up a fire that would dry their wet clothing.  The
girls had no changes of clothing with them.  They would be obliged to
continue to wear their wet dresses until these had dried.

A hot fire proved a welcome relief.  The girls gathered about it,
turning frequently in order to give their clothing an opportunity to
dry.  It was not long before the steam rose from their rapidly drying
garments.  They laughed and joked over their condition.  Miss Elting
was more serious.  She held a low-voiced conversation with Janus while
he was getting the breakfast.  Janus insisted that he had not the
faintest idea that he had an enemy.  At least he knew of no one who
would commit the acts that had been committed since the party started
out from Compton on their journey through the White Mountains.

The girls' wet clothing was almost dry when they were called to
breakfast.  This meal was late on this particular morning, for good and
sufficient reason, but the girls did not complain about this.  What
they did complain of was their bedraggled condition.  They laid their
trouble on this occasion directly at the door of Tommy Thompson.  Tommy
was undisturbed.  She expressed her pleasure, however, that her
companions had also received a wetting, and uncharitably hoped they
would fall in every time she did.

During breakfast they discussed their situation, finally deciding to
push on as soon after the meal as possible.  The guide said they would
feel dry and warm soon after starting on their way.  He thought they
would be better off on the move than sitting about the fire.  Hazel had
now fully recovered from the effects of her fall.  Harriet's side still
gave her pain, but she, too, felt that the best thing for her would be
plenty of exercise.

That forenoon she insisted on carrying Hazel's pack, and did more real
work on the trail than any other girl of the party.  They were above
the timber line, though there was little timber below it, the side of
the mountain having been fire-swept long before that.  The only green
to be seen immediately about them were the blue-berry bushes and
similar mountain vegetation that flourished in the crevices of the
rocks.

It was early in the afternoon when they emerged on the summit of the
mountain and gazed off over its gray top, that, flanked by other domes
of the Sandwich range, reminded one of the past ages and the
fascinating legends of the Sokokis.  The summit was rough and rugged,
though devoid of big boulders such as are usually to be found in
similar locations.

"You are now three thousand five hundred feet in the air," announced
the guide, rather proudly.

"Ith that what maketh Buthter tho uppithh thith afternoon?" questioned
Tommy.

"It may be what makes you so light-headed," retorted Margery.

"There!  Now, will you be good?" jeered Jane.

"Yeth.  That wath a good one.  Too bad you don't thay thomething bright
every day.  Think what a lot more fun we would have, Buthter."

An hour was spent strolling about the summit, looking off at the
magnificent scenery which stretched on all sides of them.

A cup of coffee apiece was made and drunk, but fire-making material was
so scarce that no attempt was made to cook a meal.  About mid-afternoon
the party was called to attention and directed to shoulder their packs
preparatory to their long tramp down the mountain side to the Shelter,
where fresh clothing and food awaited them.  They left the summit with
regret.  Harriet said she would give a great deal to see a sunrise from
there.

"Wait for Mt. Washington," answered Janus.  "I shan't tell you anything
about it, but, once you are there, you will be glad you decided to
climb it."

Instead of climbing down over the rocks the party took what is known
among mountaineers as a "tote trail," a narrow pathway generally used
for packing stuff into the mountains on the backs of human beings.
This "tote trail" was a winding trail full of twists and turns and
surprises, now appearing to end at some high precipice, then creeping
around the corner of a huge jutting rock, but ever dropping and
dropping farther and farther away from the summit and nearer to the
"Shelter," which was their destination on this occasion.

Twilight was upon them again before they reached the main tourist
trail.  It was now late in the season.  Not a human being had they seen
since starting out to climb Mt. Chocorua except for Hazel's discovery
of the strange man whom she had caught spying on their camp at the
"Slide."  The memory of that face still lingered in mind, nor had the
incident been forgotten by any member of the party.  They wondered what
the next surprise would be.  They were destined to know within a very
short time.

Walking was good by this time and the remaining distance to the
"Shelter" was covered at a greater rate of speed.  Janus swung to the
right, then to the left, and behold, the little hut stood darkly before
them!

"Here we are," called the guide cheerily, striding over and throwing
open the door.




CHAPTER XIX

THE STORY THE LIGHT TOLD

"Strike a light, if you please," requested the guardian, as Janus stood
holding the door of the hut open for his charges to enter.

"You'll have a light directly," returned the guide, applying a lighted
match to the hanging lamp with its smoke-dimmed chimney.

"Oh, isn't it nice and cosy in here?" sighed Margery contentedly,
dropping down on a bench.  Unslinging her heavy pack, she let it fall
to the floor.

"What about supper?" was Janus's first question.

"Yeth, that ith what I thay," approved Tommy.  "Buthter would thay tho,
too, only thhe is afraid I'll teathe her about eating."

"Afraid of you!" exclaimed Margery disgustedly.  "Well, I guess not."

During this passage at arms Janus was making an industrious hunt for a
frying-pan.  He opened one of the packs that had been left behind,
thrust one hand inside, then paused, a look of astonishment on his
honest face, underneath the frown that wrinkled his weather-beaten
forehead.  For a few seconds the bewildered guide stared stupidly at
the object he had taken from the pack.  The girls were busy undoing
their tote-packs, so they failed to heed what he was doing until his
peculiar attitude finally attracted their attention.

Janus thrust his hand in again, but the result was no less discouraging.

"Well, I swum!" he grumbled.  "I swum!"

"So you've said before," smiled Hazel.

"Anything wrong?" asked the guardian, glancing up from her own pack,
the contents of which were spread out on the floor before her.

The guide "swum" again.  Miss Elting paused in her work, turning to him.

"Mr. Januth ith troubled," observed Tommy wisely.

"What is it?" demanded the guardian.

"What is it?  It's a rock, Miss."

"What do you mean?"

For answer he held out on the palm of one hand a chunk of granite, the
while surveying it ruefully.  Miss Elting took and examined the rock,
then directed a look of inquiry at Janus.

"I don't understand," she said, with a rising inflection on the last
word.

"Well, I swum! no more do I!" he exploded.  "Will you look into that
pack and see what you find?  Maybe I can't see straight this evening.
Maybe I can't."

Harriet ran to the pack he had indicated and peered into it.  She
uttered an exclamation, loosened the rest of the binding ropes and
turned the contents out on the floor of the Shelter.  Exclamations of
amazement fell from the lips of the Meadow-Brook Girls.  Instead of the
supplies that had originally been stowed in the pack, a choice
assortment of stones, chunks of granite, small hardheads and pebbles
rolled out on the floor.  They were speechless for the moment.  Janus
tugged nervously at his beard, too thoroughly astonished for speech.

"I gueth thomebody hath been throwing thtoneth at uth," observed Tommy
Thompson.  "I wonder who liketh uth tho much that he wanth to knock our
headth off?"

"Open the other packs," directed Miss Elting calmly.

They did so, but with the same results.  Each pack was filled with
stones, and, in some instances, pieces of wood, parts of limbs of
trees, dirt, shale and the like.

"Oh, my stars, what a mess!" cried Crazy Jane.

"Did you not say that our equipment was perfectly safe here?" demanded
Miss Elting, turning sharply on the guide.

"I--I thought it was, Miss."

"Then how do you explain this?" she asked with a comprehensive wave of
the hand.

"I don't explain it.  I swum!  I don't know what to think about it.  I
wish I could get my hands on the scoundrel."

Miss Elting sat down to think.  "It is plain that we have been followed
into the mountains.  The man whom Hazel saw at the 'Slide' undoubtedly
is the one who has been causing us all the trouble.  He may have been
hovering about us all the time, we knowing nothing about it.  I am
afraid we aren't very clever, girls.  We have allowed our enemy to
outwit us."

"I don't believe he has, Miss Elting," replied Harriet.  "If so, he has
been watching us from a distance.  We surely should have discovered if
the man had come close to our camp."

"It must have been the man that Hazel saw, and I believe he was the one
who dropped the green goggles," was Harriet's emphatic declaration.  "I
wonder what his grievance is?"

"All our stuff gone; we'll have to go back, won't we?" mourned Margery.

"We have our luggage, but that is some distance from here," replied the
guardian.  "How long will it take us to get to our supplies, Mr. Grubb?"

"A day, or a day and a half, I reckon."

"Then we had better go for them to-morrow morning.  We can do nothing
more this evening.  But--what are we to do for food?"

"We have a little.  We have some coffee and a spoonful of rice.  That's
enough.  We can live another twenty-four hours or so on that.  I'll fix
up something now.  Maybe there's something in a cache back of the hut.
I'll see."  To their delight, Janus returned, not long after that, with
a small sack of flour and one of corn meal.  It did not take the girls
long to start a fire in the small cook stove.  They threw open the
windows, the "Shelter" warming up very quickly.

The girls began work at once, Janus showing them how to make the kind
of corn cakes that are popular with the mountain guides in the White
Mountain range.  All the time Harriet Burrell was thinking intently
over their situation and the loss of the supplies.  She was considering
the perplexing problems from different viewpoints, with a view toward
solving them.

"What did the thief do with our supplies?" she demanded, turning to the
guide.

"Probably took them away with him.  That's the way thieves usually do.
Otherwise, what's the use in stealing?"

"I don't think so, sir.  I do not believe this thief took the stuff
because he wanted it, but rather to make you trouble."

"Maybe, maybe.  It's all the same thing."

"Oh, no, sir; it isn't, not if he did not carry the stuff away with
him.  If he did not carry it away with him, what could he have done
with it?"  She regarded Mr. Grubb inquiringly.

"I swum!  I don't know," declared Janus, looking deeply puzzled.

"Nor do I, but I propose to find out.  Is there such a thing as a
lantern here, Mr. Grubb?"

He shook his head.  "Better leave off everything else till we get some
food.  There's the coffee pot on the steps outside, where I put it, but
the cream is all gone.  We'll have to drink our coffee black."

"Yeth, and thtay awake all night," averred Tommy.  "But we don't care.
We are used to thtaying awake all night, aren't we, Jane?"

"Yes, darlin', we are," agreed Jane brightly.  "But I'm wishing I might
lay violent hands on the rogue who took our belongings.  Where is that
Mr. Sheriff for whom you sent to come and catch our friend of the green
goggles and the black whiskers, Mr. Grubb?"

"He'll be along in good time," replied the guide, stroking his own
whiskers while regarding with squinting eyes the progress of the supper
under the deft fingers of the Meadow-Brook Girls.  "Here!  Let me do
that.  I reckon I can be finishing the supper while you young ladies
get ready.  There's a barrel of rain water just back of the hut where
you can wash.  You look as though you needed it--no offense intended."

A merry laugh greeted the words of Janus Grubb.  The girls agreed that
they _did_ need it.  Their clothing was not in very good condition,
either, but nothing could be done with the garments until they reached
a spot where they could change them for fresh apparel.  The girls ran
out laughing, and a moment later were heard splashing in the rain
barrel.  They came in with dripping faces to get their towels, then,
running out again, rubbed their faces until their cheeks glowed
underneath their tan.  Tommy's freckles were now more pronounced than
ever, but her usually pale face wore a healthy look and her eyes were
bright and sparkling.

Supper was late that evening, nor was it a heavy supper when at last
they sat down on the benches in the "Shelter" with their cups and their
corn cakes beside them, but they were as happy a party of girls as if
sitting at a table laden with good things and sparkling with cut glass
and silver.  There were health and good-fellowship here; and there also
was the pride of achievement, for these young girls had accomplished a
great deal during the time they had been living their out-of-door life.
They made merry over their scanty supper and finished with satisfied
appetites.

After supper Harriet asked the guide to prepare some torches, saying
she wished to look about to see if she could find anything.  Janus said
there was no wood at hand fit for torches.  No wood, no
lantern--nothing save the smoky old lamp in the "Shelter," and very
little oil in that.  Janus said there had been a can of oil there a
week before that, but that some one must have carried it off, can and
all.

"I'll hold the light for you if you want to dig," he offered.

"Yes, please do that," urged Harriet.  "I know where I wish to look.
If you will hold the light out there on the edge of that bank of rocks
I will go below.  It is such a convenient place to throw things.
Tommy, look out that you don't throw your dishes over when you go out.
I think I will just wash that chimney before we go any further."

"Whatever you do don't drop it!" exclaimed Miss Elting.  "We cannot get
along without the lamp."

"We can build up a fire outside, if necessary.  I rather think that
would be a better idea still.  What do you say, Mr. Grubb?"

Janus consulted his whiskers, then decided that the idea was an
excellent one.  He said he would go out and get some fuel for the fire,
and did so.  While he was thus engaged, Harriet cleaned the lamp
chimney, Miss Elting hung canvas over the glassless windows and the
other girls washed and put away the few dishes that had been used.  A
fine, large fire was started on the ledge of rock that extended out
from the "Shelter" to a drop-off of some twenty feet.  Harriet was very
much interested in the fire that night.  Then, after it was well
started, she walked to the edge, and, with her back to the flames,
peered down.

All at once she started to run down the path to the left.  She called
to Jane to come with her.  They had to clamber over some rough ground
in order to reach a point below the hut.  The light from the fire made
the shadows dance down there.

"I saw something glisten down here," explained Miss Burrell.  "I am
certain it was a tin can.  Wouldn't it be fine were we to find our
canned supplies down here, Jane?"

"Then it is fine, for here's the very thing you were looking for."  The
Irish girl stooped, then held up a tin can.  Harriet uttered a little
exclamation and reached for it.  "But it's empty," chuckled Jane.

"Oh, fudge!  Some one has thrown it over.  Other picnic parties have
been up here.  Besides, this is not one of our cans.  But that doesn't
mean we shan't find any of our own.  Look hard, Jane."

"I'm looking hard, so hard that my eyes ache," replied Jane dryly.  An
instant later she cried out, "Will you look at that?"

Harriet was at her side in a couple of seconds from the uttering of
that cry.  Then she, too, raised her voice in a shout that called her
companions from the hut.  Miss Elting came out carrying the lamp.
Janus took it from her, and, standing on the very edge in the full
light of the campfire, held the lamp above his head and peered down.

"What is it?" cried the guardian.

"We have found our canned stuff and a whole lot of our equipment,"
answered Harriet triumphantly.

"Hooee-e-e-e!" shouted the Meadow-Brook Girls in great glee.

"Wait!  I'll be down there to help you gather it up," Janus called down
to them.

"Get the packs, girls," ordered Miss Elting.

Then there came an interruption that startled the girls into silence.
Something sped through the air over their heads, uttering a strange,
weird woo-woo-woo!  It passed, followed by a distant report, the crack
of a rifle.  Then, all at once, the lamp that Janus Grubb was holding
above his head crumbled into nothingness, the oil in the well of the
lamp streaming down over the guide's head and face.




CHAPTER XX

SEEKING A DESPERATE REVENGE

"Lie down!" bellowed Janus.

"Down!" commanded Miss Elting, in the same moment.

Janus moved more quickly than they ever had seen him do before.  They
did not think him capable of such rapid action.

"Look out below!" he roared, as, with a series of rapid kicks, he sent
the burning sticks of the campfire tumbling over the edge into the
little ravine below the "Shelter."

"Get out of the light!  Come up here as fast as ye can!  Into the hut
with ye, every one!"  Janus sprang from the rock and ran down the path
toward Harriet and Jane.

"What's the matter now?" demanded Jane, who did not understand.

"I don't know," answered Harriet, herself a little startled.  "I heard
a gun fired twice.  Can it be that some one is shooting at us?  Oh, I
hope not.  But we must get out of here!  Mr. Grubb, is that you?" she
called, hearing some one floundering toward them.

"It's Grubb.  Get out of that."

"What has happened?" begged Harriet, hurrying to meet the guide, who
came on a run to where they stood.

"Enough!  Did you hear the shots?"

"Yes."

"Well, one of them snipped the lamp.  I'm greased from head to foot.
The scoundrel!"

"But--but perhaps they were not intended for you, Mr. Grubb," suggested
Jane breathlessly.

"They were intended for me, all right.  No mistake about that, young
ladies.  Now, I want you to get into that shack on the double quick.  I
haven't a rifle, but I have a revolver that's good enough to take care
of anything that gets close enough.  Don't make too much noise; there
might be another shot."

"I think not, if we do not start any more fires.  I have an idea that
the shots were intended for you, Mr. Grubb, not for us.  If so, the man
will not shoot again in the dark, fearing to hit one of us."

"Well, I swum!" grunted the guide.

Harriet's guess seemed very plausible.  He led them quickly up the
path, and, reaching the top, hurried them into the cabin.  Janus got
his revolver, and, after loading it, slipped some extra cartridges into
a pocket.  "I don't want anybody to come out again to-night," he
ordered.  "You go to sleep, when you get ready, and I'll sit outside to
watch for the rascal in case he comes prowling around later."

"Spread your blankets on the floor and sit down," directed Miss Elting.
"I don't think we are quite ready for bed yet.  We do not know but
there may be more shots, though we aren't going to be afraid, are we,
girls?"

"No, we are not, Miss Elting.  Why should we be?  Being afraid doesn't
help us one little bit."

So the girls seated themselves on their blankets, and in low tones
talked over the series of mysterious occurrences that had marred an
otherwise happy journey to the mountains.  They wondered what wrong
their enemy might feel had been done him to make him thus vengeful.
The girls did quite believe that the man of the green goggles, Miss
Elting's caller, was either directly or indirectly concerned in the
various mysteries, but that was as far as they could go toward a
solution.

One by one the campers rolled up in their blankets and went to sleep.
Janus held his position in front of the "Shelter" throughout the night,
but nothing occurred to disturb the camp until nearly three o'clock in
the morning.  Then two quick shots, fired seemingly right over their
heads, brought the Meadow-Brook Girls out of their sound sleep,
uttering little exclamations of alarm.  Harriet sprang out through the
open door without an instant's hesitation.

"Where is he?  What did you shoot at?" she questioned apprehensively,
fixing searching eyes upon the guide.

Miss Elting repeated the questions a few seconds later, she having
joined Harriet.

The guide stood with revolver still pointed toward the tote-trail,
ready to shoot at the slightest movement.  In the faint light the two
women could see a shadowy something that appeared to be standing beside
the trail.

"There!  See him?  I swum, I don't understand it," muttered the guide.
"I fired in the air to scare him."

"Where is it?  What do you mean?" questioned the guardian.

"Him!  I looked and he wasn't there, then I looked again and there he
stood, right where you see him now.  Then I shot into the air twice."

Harriet Burrell burst into a merry shout.  She laughed and laughed
until her companions, taking fresh courage, ran out, demanding to know
what was so funny.  Tommy declared that she would give almost anything
to be able to laugh that way at that particular moment.  Neither did
Miss Elting understand the meaning of this sudden merriment, but she
knew that Harriet had discovered something.

Janus regarded the girl frowningly, all the time keeping one eye on the
faintly outlined figure out by the tote-trail.

"Laugh, consarn it!" Mr. Grubb growled, beginning to feel that, in some
way, he had made a shining mark of himself, rather than appearing in
the role of a hero who had valiantly defended his party of young women.

"What is it, dear?" asked the guardian.

"Don't you know what that is?" queried Harriet.

"No.  It looks to me like a man leaning against something," answered
Miss Elting.

"Yes, yes," interposed the guide.  "When I first shot at it it was
standing straight up, then it tilted over against the rocks, and there
it is.  You get back.  I'll go over.  If he shoots, you won't be in any
danger."

"Oh, nonsense!" exploded Harriet.  "Put your pistol down.  Don't you
dare to point it toward me.  I'll lay your intruder."

The girl ran forward, unheeding the warning cries of her companions.
She ran straight to the object that, in the uncertain light, so closely
resembled a human figure.  The girls were begging Harriet to come back.
Instead she boldly grasped the object with both hands, and threw it
across the trail.  A chorus of "Ohs!" greeted this performance.  Janus
lowered his weapon, his under jaw dropped.  He followed Miss Elting,
while the girls followed them both at a safe distance, Tommy and
Margery ready to take flight at the slightest indication of danger.

"Here he is, Mr. Grubb," cried Harriet.

"Harriet, what is it?" demanded Miss Elting.

"Just a plain, rotting old tree trunk," returned the girl.

"But--but it wasn't there before," stammered the guide.

Again Harriet laughed.  Her companions gazed at her admiringly.  None,
unless it were Jane McCarthy, would have had the courage to go out
there as Harriet Burrell had done.  They told her so, too, at which
Harriet laughed again.

"Let me tell you something," said Harriet.  "I'm not a bit braver than
you are.  As it happened, I knew what that was the instant I saw it.
The tree trunk was not standing there when we came into camp last
night.  Had it been, Mr. Grubb would have seen it.  The trunk had
fallen across the trail.  When I started to go down below to look for
our supplies I stumbled over the stick, and to prevent some one else
tripping over it, I threw it out of the trail.  The stick ended over
and stood upright against the rock where you saw it.  I presume Mr.
Grubb did see it tip to one side.  I know, however, that the stick has
been there ever since I tossed it out of the trail last night."

"Well, I swum!" muttered Janus sheepishly, "I'm so easy it's a wonder I
haven't lost myself."

"No, you were doing your best to protect us," replied Miss Elting.
"But I would rather you did not shoot again except in real defence.  In
other words, don't shoot unless some one shoots at you."

"What am I going to do?" demanded the guide rather crossly.  "Sit down
and allow some outlaw to rob us at every turn?"

"We know you are ready to defend us," pacified Miss Elting.  "What
would you advise us to do?"

"Make no further move until morning.  When daylight comes we will get
up the stuff that has been thrown over there, make up our packs and
start for Mt. Washington," returned Janus promptly.  "I'll reach a
telephone before long and send word to the sheriff about what has
occurred.  He may be out already on the bridge matter, but he ought to
know about this last affair.  It will give him a clue as to where the
man is."

"But the unknown wretch may follow us," protested the guardian.

"He won't.  He's gone into hiding after what has happened.  You won't
see any more of him.  You see, he knows we shall be on the lookout for
him, and he won't be taking any chances on it until a day has
passed--perhaps about to-morrow night--then he may come back here to
see what he can find.  I am banking on that, after having thought the
matter over.  We won't be here, but the sheriff will, if I can get hold
of him."

Miss Elting agreed that the guide's plan was as good as could be
devised, and promptly directed the girls to return to the hut and, if
possible, sleep for the few remaining hours of the night.  That morning
the girls overslept.  By the time they awakened, Janus had gathered
together all the supplies and equipment to be found below the hut.
Some of the provisions were missing.  Nothing that would be likely to
be recognized by the owners had been taken by the man who had thrown
their stores overboard, so to speak, so they found themselves better
off than they had hoped.  A real breakfast was eaten that morning,
after which packs were lashed and the party lost no time in starting to
leave the mountain that had furnished them with so much excitement.

The journey down the trail was not a long one.  After reaching the foot
of the mountain they were obliged to travel nearly ten miles before
reaching a village from whence they would go on by wagon until reaching
the point whence they were to be conveyed to Mt. Washington.

That night found them weary and sleepy, but to stay at a hotel which
boasted of all modern conveniences was a welcome change to the mountain
climbers, who were both footsore and weary.  It seemed but a few
moments after retiring before they were called to get ready for
breakfast and the long ride to the foot of the mountain, up which they
were to climb.  Their experience on Mt. Washington was to be both novel
and exciting.




CHAPTER XXI

THE ASCENT OF MT. WASHINGTON

The supper smoke rose lazily in the still air.  Below them lay a vast
panorama of valley and now flattened hills.  The Meadow-Brook Girls,
after a day of hard climbing, were about half way to the summit of Mt.
Washington.  They had chosen the most difficult climbing to be found in
the White Mountain Range.  Janus had promised them some real mountain
climbing when they reached Mt. Washington, and he had made good his word.
They admitted that laughingly upon reaching the spot he had chosen for
their night's camping, and willingly permitted the guide to start the
fire while they rested preparatory to getting the supper.

"At least we have the satisfaction of knowing that we have left our
friend of the green goggles behind," said Miss Elting, with a sigh of
relief.  "I hope we have seen the last of him.  He certainly tried to
spoil our trip."

"Sheriff's out on the trail," answered Janus.  "There's trouble of some
sort down there.  Sheriff's office said things were popping, but wouldn't
talk much because he--the fellow I got on the telephone--didn't know me.
Funny not to know me, wasn't it?"

"Yeth," answered Tommy.

"What did you conclude from what was said?" asked Miss Elting.

"That they were after some one and knew who it was.  I hope they get him.
I hope that, when they do, they give Janus Grubb a chance to tell the
fellow what he thinks of him."

"It may not be the man we think at all," suggested the guardian.

"No-o-o-o," drawled the guide reflectively.

"If not, what do you propose to do?" questioned Harriet.

"Why, keep on, of course," answered the guide, in a tone of mild
surprise.  "To-morrow we reach the top of Mount Washington; then we go
down the other side, and so on till we get through."

"All of which isn't getting our supper," Harriet reminded him laughingly.
"Jane, will you please shave some of the smoked beef?  And don't spoil
your appetite by nibbling, please."

"Why, darlin', I never did such a thing.  It was the beef that flew right
into my mouth.  Now, what could poor Jane do under such circumstances,
except to swallow hard?"

"Nothing but thubmit grathefully and thwallow the beef," commented Tommy.

"And I did just that," grinned Jane.

Their table was a rocky shelf elevated about ten inches above the ground
and standing on a sort of standard, so that the girls were able, by
sitting down beside it, to tuck their feet under the rock, which made an
excellent board for the purpose.  The night had not yet fallen, but
shadows hung over the valleys and the distant mountains, the purple tinge
creeping slowly up the side of the mountain which they were climbing,
enveloping the campers before they had finished eating their supper.

The evening, on the side of the mountain in their comfortable camp, was a
delightful one.  They sat on their blankets beside a blazing campfire
amid the great silence, broken only by the voices of the campers and the
occasional cry of a night bird.  Janus, after having made a thorough
patrol of the ground surrounding the camp, returned to the campfire and
entertained the girls by telling of the early Indian days, stories that
had been handed down by generations, and that had grown and grown until
they had assumed startling proportions.

All at once Harriet, in the midst of one of these remarkable tales,
tilted her head back, her eyes apparently studying the stars that hung
over the mountain range to the south of them.  She gazed thoughtfully.
After a few seconds of this, she shifted the position of her head,
supporting the latter with her clasped hands.  After remaining in this
position for several minutes the girl got up, yawned and began walking
slowly back and forth, the while listening to the guide's story.

"Harriet, are you nervous or tired?" questioned the guardian, eyeing her
shrewdly.

"I believe it must be nerves," answered Harriet laughingly.  She strolled
off into the shadows, there to sit down on a rock within easy sound of
the voices of her companions, who soon forgot that she was not among
them.  After making sure that she was safe in doing so, she slid slowly
from the rock, and walking on all fours ran away into the bushes and out
of sight.  It was a most unusual thing to do.  Had Crazy Jane been guilty
of such an act, nothing would have been thought of it, but had Harriet
Burrell's companions observed her they would have opened their eyes in
amazement.  Fortunately, they were too fully occupied with Janus Grubb's
story.

Harriet sat down on the ground, after having moved away some two hundred
yards from the camp.

"I hope they don't miss me," she thought.  "I hope, too, that I haven't
been seen.  Now I will try to see something for myself."  The girl sat
perfectly still, with ears more than eyes on the alert.

Harriet had not been in her position very long before her ears caught a
faint sound directly ahead of her.  Still she did not move, except to
raise her head a little.  A bird hopped into a bush close at hand without
discovering her presence.  The faint noise ahead grew more pronounced,
the whip of a bush as it was released by the hand that had pushed it away
was heard and understood.  Harriet Burrell was woodsman enough to
recognize all such sounds instantly upon hearing them.

She crouched low, fearing that the intruder might approach close enough
to discover her.  Every faculty was on the alert.  Who or what the unseen
intruder might be, of course, Harriet did not know.  It might be a
mountaineer who, seeking camp for the night, was first doing a little
investigating to satisfy himself that he would be welcome.  Then, again,
it might be a different sort of visitor.

Harriet's attention was distracted by a burst of laughter from the camp
of the Meadow-Brook Girls.  Then there followed a long-drawn "Hoo-e-e-e!"
that she knew was meant for her.

"Harri--et!"  It was Margery who was calling.  Harriet groaned under her
breath.  Were her companions to persist, were they to get an idea that
she had strayed from the camp, her quest would come to a sudden end, for
the guide and his charges would soon be piling over the rocks, searching
and shouting for her.

It was Miss Elting, however, who, quick to understand, quieted Margery
Brown.

"Harriet will return presently," said the guardian.  "Please go on with
your story, Mr. Grubb."

Janus continued.  The next moment Harriet Burrell was forgotten by her
companions once more, for which forgetfulness the girl out there in the
bushes was duly thankful.  The movement in the bushes, which had abruptly
ceased, following the call, had not been resumed.  This worried her
somewhat.  If the person out there were in the least a woodsman, he would
know that some one of the party was out of the camp and would be on his
guard.  This might defeat the plan she had in mind.  But there was only
one thing to do, that was to remain in her present hiding place, keeping
prudent silence and awaiting results.  This was what Harriet did.

She crouched there fully fifteen minutes after the interruption from the
camp before the presence of another person was again revealed.  A sound
so close that Harriet barely repressed an exclamation of surprise caught
her ears.  The girl for a few seconds held her breath.  She could hear
the beating of her heart so plainly that she feared that the other person
might hear it as well.

There followed another period of silence, but much more brief than the
previous one.  It was then that Harriet Burrell was able to distinguish
the figure of a man--that is, his head and shoulders.  The night was too
dark to enable her to do more than decide upon what it was.

Now he began creeping cautiously toward the camp, going only a few paces
at a time, then halting to listen.  Harriet moved with him, though not so
fast.  She was stepping directly toward the camp, which lay directly
ahead of her, whereas the man was following a different course with the
same destination in view.  When he moved, Harriet moved; when he halted,
she did so.  Halting a second too late would undoubtedly reveal her
presence, hence the girl exercised unusual caution, making little more
disturbance than a cat stalking its prey.  Once she sank down noiselessly
when, by a movement of the head and shoulders, she discovered that the
man was turning to look behind him.

"If he gets within sight of the camp he will see that one of the party is
missing, if he knows how many of us there are," reasoned the young woman
shrewdly.  "I must be on my guard when he discovers that, or something
may happen."  Harriet might have called out to warn her companions, but
that was not a part of her plan as yet.

About seventy-five yards had been traversed in this manner when a sudden
change came over the scene, for, between Harriet Burrell and the intruder
whom she was stalking, the camp of the Meadow-Brook Girls was soon to be
thrown into wild turmoil and the young woman's utmost expectations were
to be more than realized.




CHAPTER XXII

A ROUT AND A CAPTURE

The intruder had halted.  Harriet knew that from his position he could
see the camp.  From her position it was not visible.  She saw the man
halt, peer, then suddenly straighten up and glance about him
apprehensively.  Being now between her and the light shed by the
campfire, the girl was able to observe his movements quite clearly.

"He suspects something," quivered Harriet.  But being at a loss as to
what to do next the girl dropped swiftly to the ground, rising almost
the next second.  She was leaning well forward, peering at the figure
with all the concentration she could bring to bear.  The intruder had
by this time again directed his attention to the camp.  There was now
in the man's hands something that he seemed to be leveling over the
tops of the bushes amid which he was standing.

Harriet Burrell drew her right hand cautiously above her shoulder.
That hand held a stone.  Suddenly the stone cut through the bushes
about a foot to the right of the intruder's shoulder.  He jumped, but
before he could decide upon what his next move should be a second and
larger stone smote him between the shoulders.  Then followed a perfect
rain of stones.  Some hit him, others did not.

There was but one way by which the man could get away without turning
back and facing this unseen peril.  That way was almost straight toward
the camp.  He hesitated.  A large stone grazed his cheek.  The fellow
leaped through the bushes.  Something was swept from his hands by the
bushes and fell to the rocks with a clatter.  The girls in camp heard
the sound.

"Harriet, what are you doing?" called Jane.

"Look out!" shouted Harriet.  She started in pursuit of the fleeing
man, sending a shower of missiles after him.  Some of the stones
dropped to the rocks back of the camp, rolling into the camp itself.

Then, to the amazement of the Meadow-Brook party, a man darted across a
corner of the lighted space, which he cleared in half a dozen leaps and
bounds, Harriet still hurling stones after him and shouting her
warnings to her companions.

The girls fled from the campfire, crying out in alarm.  Janus, for the
instant, was overcome with surprise, but he pulled himself together
sharply, running to his pack and snatching up his revolver.

"It's our man!" cried Harriet.  "I made him run."

"Thave me!" wailed Tommy, throwing herself flat on her face behind a
rock.

Janus had clattered down the rocks after the intruder.  The guide's
revolver began to speak.  He was firing wildly, not being able to see
the man, who either had got safely away, or else was in hiding behind
one of the many rocks and projections.  It did not seem as if he could
have run down the mountainside at the rate he was going without falling
and breaking his neck.  The guide fired his revolver into every dark
recess that he thought might afford a hiding place for the fugitive.
Then he loaded up and emptied his revolver a second time.

By this time the camp was almost in a state of panic.  Miss Elting
spoke sharply to the girls, commanding them to stop their shouting and
to come back.

"Mr. Grubb, if you keep on shooting you will have no ammunition left,"
the guardian warned him.  "Besides, I would rather you wouldn't shoot
any more.  We don't know that this man is the one we suspect."

Janus broke his smoking revolver and ejected the exploded shells, after
which he recharged the cylinder and put the weapon back in his pocket.
He returned to the campfire, holding his hat in one hand, with the
other hand brushing the perspiration from his forehead.

"Well, I swum!" he muttered.  "I swum!"

"Harriet, we will hear your explanation.  Why didn't you tell Mr. Grubb
in time, so he could look after this fellow?" demanded Miss Elting.
"You knew there was some one about some time before you got up and
walked away, didn't you?"

"I thought I heard some one.  That was the reason I strolled off by
myself."

"So I supposed," commented the guardian.

"Had I said anything the person would have cried out and given the
alarm.  I wanted to satisfy myself that I was right, and I was."

"I should say you were!"

"Yeth, and he had black whithkerth, too," interjected Tommy.

"He wore a soft hat pulled down over his face," added Margery.

"I believe it is the same man," said the guardian reflectively.

"Get back out of the light, ladies, please," urged the guide.  "We will
let the fire burn, but we had better keep out of the light.  The man
may have a gun."

"No, he has not," spoke up Harriet.

"What was he doing out there?" questioned Miss Elting.

"Spying on the camp, then getting ready to shoot.  I think he was going
to shoot Mr. Grubb," was the startling declaration.  Janus gripped his
whiskers with all the fingers of the right hand.  He gave the whiskers
a tug that threatened to thin them out.

"Shoot me?" he roared.

Harriet nodded and smiled.

"But I thought you said he had no gun," objected Miss Elting.

"He hasn't now.  I have his gun," answered Harriet with a twinkle in
her eyes.  "Yes, it is a rifle.  I am glad we have it, for, from the
present outlook, we shall need it."  She stepped away and from a rock
picked up a repeating rifle.  This the intruder had dropped.  Harriet
had picked up the weapon and taken it to camp, laying it down to
continue her stone-throwing.  She had forgotten all about the gun until
the excitement had subsided somewhat, and Miss Elting and the guide had
begun questioning her.  Janus took the rifle, turning it over in his
hands, examining it with critical eyes.

"Modern gun, thirty-eight calibre, repeating," he muttered.  "Well, I
swum!"

"Do you recognize it?" asked the guardian.

Janus shook his head.  "Of course, you will keep it for the present."

"Until the owner calls for it, Miss," replied Janus grimly, whereat
there was a giggle from Margery.

"Tell us how you discovered the man.  Let us have the whole story,"
urged Miss Elting.  Harriet related briefly how she had discovered the
stranger and all that followed until she had driven him into the camp,
as she had hoped to be able to do, believing that Janus would be able
to capture the man.  Had Janus been a more active man and quicker of
wit, he undoubtedly would have been able to catch the fellow; however,
by the time the guide had collected himself, the intruder had
disappeared.

Miss Elting was vexed at Janus's inactivity, but it would do no good to
say so.  Janus had done the best he could and had wasted more than a
dozen bullets among the rocks of Mt. Washington.  They had the
stranger's gun, therefore she was reasonably certain that their enemy
could do them no further harm that night.  Still, it was thought best
to have Mr. Grubb remain on watch for the rest of the night.  Harriet
offered to do this, but the guide would not listen to such a
proposition, nor would Miss Elting.  While they were discussing the
incident he kept his eyes on Harriet almost continuously.  Wonder and
admiration were plainly to be seen in their expression.

Some time elapsed before the camp of the Meadow-Brook Girls settled
down.  They felt even more secure, knowing that Harriet had captured
the intruder's rifle.  It was not believed that the man possessed
another, so there was little danger of further shooting that night.  At
the suggestion of the guide, and the further orders of their guardian,
the girls rolled in their blankets and soon were asleep.  They were
awakened, shortly after twelve, by a shout from the guide.  Then
followed a volley of quick shots and a warning cry from Janus Grubb.




CHAPTER XXIII

A MYSTERIOUS DISAPPEARANCE

"Quick, girls!" shouted Miss Elting.

"Thave me!" screamed Tommy Thompson.

Harriet opened her eyes in time to see Janus running rapidly from the
camp, firing his revolver at every jump.  After his second shout of
warning he was not heard to speak again.  For a moment or so they could
hear him crashing through the hushes, now and then firing his revolver,
probably when he caught sight of the man he was pursuing, the intruder
having no doubt returned, perhaps hoping to be able to catch the camp
asleep, thus giving him an opportunity to recover his rifle.

The girls unrolled themselves from their blankets as quickly as
possible.  Harriet started to follow Janus.

"Come back!" commanded Miss Elting.

Harriet halted abruptly.  "Please let me go," she pleaded.

"By no means!  How could you ask such a thing?  Let Janus attend to
matters of this sort.  We must look after ourselves here.  The man may
return."

Harriet Burrell still stood where she had halted.  Her head was bent
slightly forward.  She was listening.  Not a sound could be heard now
from the pursuing guide.

"Hoo-e-e-e-e!" called Harriet.  But no answering call came back to her.
She still kept her position until the guardian called to her.  Harriet
then walked slowly back to her trembling companions.  Jane and Miss
Elting were no more frightened than Harriet.  They did not know,
however, what had occurred to disturb Janus, and could only surmise.
Harriet stirred the fire, throwing on more dry boughs and brush until a
crackling blaze had sprung up.  She was more disturbed than her
expression indicated.  In the meantime Miss Elting had satisfied
herself that nothing had been taken from the camp, which knowledge
served in a way to relieve her.

However, as the moments passed, and nothing further was heard from the
guide, the others of the Meadow-Brook party began to feel a vague
alarm.  They could not believe that anything had happened to Janus, nor
could they understand why he should remain away from the camp so long.
Jane and Harriet "Hoo-e-e-ed!" until they were hoarse, but no reply
followed their calls.  Half an hour passed; then an hour, during which
time everybody walked nervously about the camp.

"Miss Elting, something serious must have occurred to Mr. Grubb,"
declared Harriet.

"Oh, goodness, more mystery!" exclaimed Jane.

"Please, let Jane and myself go out to look for him.  He may have been
shot, he may be suffering, or----"

"No!  Not a girl may leave this camp," replied the guardian firmly.

"But what if Mr. Grubb is in trouble?" protested Harriet.

"Would it better the situation were any of you girls to get into the
same difficulty?  No, I could not think of it.  Besides, I believe Mr.
Grubb will return in good time.  We do not know but he may be hiding,
hoping to catch the one he went out after.  If so, you would be
interfering with, perhaps defeating, the very plan he has in mind.  No,
girls; you will stay here."

There was no more to be said.  Miss Elting's word was law with her
charges.  Harriet and Jane submitted without further protest, but this
did not lessen their concern over the continued absence of the guide.
Of course, there was no more sleep in the camp that night.  The party
sat down, always keeping out of the firelight, Harriet and Jane doing
guard duty, walking about the camp some little distance back.  Harriet
had the rifle.  The possession of this gave them a feeling of greater
security than otherwise would have been the case.  She kept the rifle
in her hands during all the rest of the night.

Dawn found the girls pale after their long vigil following the exciting
incidents of the evening.  But daylight served to bring back their
failing courage.  Harriet put down the rifle at the first suggestion of
morning light.  Jane gathered fresh fuel for the fire and a roaring
blaze warmed them up, for the morning on the mountain was very chill.

"Come, girls, get breakfast," directed Miss Elting.  "We must eat.
Afterward we shall consider what is to be done.  The situation demands
careful thought, then action.  We cannot go far without our guide."

They knew that.  Breakfast was prepared in some haste that morning.
While eating they discussed their predicament, finally coming to a
decision.  It was decided that they should try to follow the guide's
trail, spreading out so as to cover the ground thoroughly.  In this
formation they would continue until they either found him or failed.
There seemed no other course to take.  The guide's pack was distributed
among the girls.  It made quite a load for them, but Harriet and Jane
carried more than the others, in addition to which Harriet carried the
captured rifle.  An examination of the magazine showed that there were
ten cartridges in it, quite sufficient for any likely needs of theirs.

Before starting out Harriet raised the rifle with the muzzle pointing
skyward.

"Don't be frightened, I'm going to fire a signal," she announced.
Margery screamed, despite the warning, when a crash woke the echoes.
After an interval of a few seconds Harriet fired two more shots in
quick succession.  This was a signal.  All listened, but no answering
shot was heard, nor any shout to indicate that the signal had been
heard.

"We will move on," announced the guardian.  "Keep within calling
distance.  Harriet will take the trail from the camp; the others will
spread out on either side."

Harriet Burrell started a little in advance of the others, beginning at
the point where she had seen Janus disappear.  For a time it was
somewhat difficult to follow the trail, because of the trampling the
bushes had had on the evening before.  However, after a short time the
trail stretched away, clear to the eyes of an experienced woodsman.
There were broken bushes here and there; that was all, though enough
for one who knew how to use her eyes.

"I have found the trail," called Harriet; "it is turning to the east."
This she knew was to enable the pursued to make better time in getting
away.  After a short distance the trail turned upward, then led to the
east again.  Bushes were getting more scarce.  Only occasional clumps
of them were to be found, making the work of following the trail much
more difficult.

Two hours of climbing, with frequent periods of hunting for the trail
that had lost itself, brought them to the end of their resources.  The
trail, at first so plainly marked, had, as a famous woodsman has said,
"petered out into a squirrel track, run up a tree and disappeared into
a knothole."  On every side were almost barren rocks, though below and
further to the east the mountain vegetation showed thick and green,
dropping away into ravines here and there, the surface being more
uneven than anything they had yet encountered on this particular
mountain.  Still further below, the mountainside appeared to be quite
heavily wooded.

"I believe we should look into that," said Harriet, indicating the
lower part that was covered with green.  "We may find some clue to the
whereabouts of our guide."

"We might get lost there," answered the guardian.

"But--we have only to go down.  We can't possibly get lost if we do
that.  Going down will lead us to the foot of the mountain, and out
into the open once more," urged Harriet.  The guardian smiled.

"How silly of me not to have thought of that.  I am beginning to think
that my pupil knows more about outdoor life and woodcraft than I ever
dreamed.  If you think best, Harriet, we will look down there.  In the
meantime I would suggest that one of us remain in this vicinity to make
a more thorough search."

Harriet offered to do this, so it was agreed that the rest of the party
should head obliquely down the mountain while she worked back and
forth, like a switchback railway, until she, too, had reached the
objective point where the others would be waiting for her.  This
programme was carried out, beginning immediately.  Not a trace,
however, did she find of the lost trail.  While awaiting her arrival
the others of the party walked back and forth along the edge of the
thick growth, but with no better results than had attended the search
made by Harriet Burrell.

At noon they stopped for luncheon, then followed the same method as had
Harriet, moving east and west, ever enlarging their field as the growth
increased in area.  Night found them far up on the mountainside still
facing the mystery of the disappearance of the guide, whom the girls
earlier had named "The Pilot of the White Mountains."

He was no longer a pilot, but in need of one.

It was not a particularly cheerful party of girls that sat down to a
supper of rice, corn cakes and coffee that evening.  It was arranged
that Harriet should take the early part of the night watch, Jane
McCarthy the last half, for they dared not leave their camp unguarded.
A huge fire was built that sent a glow high above the foliage of bushes
and second-growth trees, visible for a long distance.  This was done
with a purpose.  The girls hoped that, were Janus within sight, he
might see the light and be guided to them.  The blaze did serve to
attract the attention of others whom the girls were to see before the
night was ended.

Harriet's vigil was not a lonely one to her.  She always found comfort
in Nature, no matter how dark or silent Dame Nature's mood might be.
She drew back a short distance from camp so that her moving about might
not disturb her companions, remaining quiet until they had finally gone
to sleep, after which she began strolling back and forth.

She had been on guard for something more than two hours when she was
startled by three shots from somewhere lower down the mountain.
Harriet pointed her rifle into the air and promptly pulled the trigger
twice.  Two heavy reports from her rifle caused an instant commotion in
the camp of the Meadow-Brook Girls.  The girls untangled themselves
from their blankets and sprang up very much frightened.  Their nerves
were on edge after all they had experienced, and these shots, fired so
near at hand, had sent at least three of them to the verge of panic.

"Are we attacked?" cried Jane.

"We may be," answered Harriet.  "Hurry and get yourselves together.
Some one besides ourselves is in the mountains and we must be ready for
whatever comes.  I don't know what it is.  Hurry, please!  We may have
to leave here very suddenly."

No time was lost in "getting themselves together," as Harriet had
expressed it.  Fortunately, having gone to bed with their clothing on,
there was little preparation to make.  This completed, at Miss Elting's
direction the girls moved off in a body, secreting themselves in the
shadows some distance from the light of the campfire, but within sight
of it.  Up to this time Harriet had made no explanation.  Miss Elting,
after having placed the girls to her satisfaction, eagerly demanded to
know the meaning of Harriet's signals, the guardian not having heard
the other shots fired farther, down the mountainside.

"I answered a signal," replied Miss Burrell.

"Oh, then it is the guide?  It's Janus!" cried Miss Elting joyously.

"No, it was not Janus.  The signal was fired from a rifle," answered
Harriet Burrell.




CHAPTER XXIV

CONCLUSION

"There goes another shot!" exclaimed Harriet.

"Answer it, dear."

"There are only five more shells in the gun.  Shall I use them all?"

"Shoot once."

Harriet did so, getting two signal shots in return.

"That means the strangers have heard and understood, does it not?"
questioned the guardian.

"I think so.  Now, I would suggest that we keep very quiet until we see
who it is.  We don't know but it may be our old enemy, who is taking
this method of locating us.  I have four more cartridges in the
magazine.  I think we should be able to hold the strangers off with
those if we have to."

"Do not fire a shot unless I tell you to!" commanded Miss Elting firmly.

Harriet agreed with a nod, while the guardian stepped back to warn the
other girls to be absolutely silent, no matter what might happen.

Harriet, acting upon a sudden thought ran over to the fire and
scattered it with a stick so that it would not blaze up so high.  Then
she returned to her post.  Some time had elapsed before she was
startled, all at once, by the sound of a stick snapping.

The girl crept to a more favorable position, where she could obtain a
better view of the camp.  Then her heart fairly leaped into her throat.
Standing plainly outlined in the flickering light of the campfire was a
man.  Harriet studied the man, then slowly slid the barrel of the rifle
into position.

"Stand still!  Don't move!" she cried.  "I have you covered.  If you
move I'll shoot!  Hands up!"

The man started, opened his mouth as if he were about to speak, then
quickly raised his hands above his head.  There was a half grin of
amusement on the face of the visitor, but Harriet, as she crouched
squinting over the barrel of the captured rifle, failed to notice it.
The light was faint and the man's hat shaded his face.

"Who are you and what do you want here?" she demanded, a trace of
excitement in her tone.

"It's all right, Miss," the man smiled, tilting back his hat and
revealing an open countenance.  "I'm the sheriff of the county.  I've
been sent to look you up.  We have your guide down at the foot of the
White Trail.  He's been hurt.  We've got another fellow in whom you'll
be interested too.  Janus Grubb sent us to find you."

"Is Mr. Grubb badly hurt?" queried Harriet, as all the girls came
slowly out from their hiding places.

"Sprained an ankle, not much, but it will lay him up for a few days.
The other man we have is Charlie Valdes, known as Big Charlie.  The
story of Valdes dates back to the time when Jan was a deputy sheriff.
He ran down Charlie and another bad character, Henry Tracy.  Both
fellows were poachers, preying on the preserves of rich men in these
mountains.  Jan got his hands on the pair and gathered the evidence
that put them in prison.  Charlie's time was up first, and he came back
on purpose to even the score with Jan.  The instant I had a description
of the fellow who bothered you in Compton I felt sure it was Big
Charlie.  He's the man who has been following you, and we'll prove the
burning of the bridge against him, too."

"Did Mr. Grubb catch the man again this time, too?" asked Hazel.

"Jan overhauled Valdes, and in the fight that followed put a bullet in
his leg," replied the sheriff.  "It was in the tussle that Jan got his
ankle sprained, but your guide landed his man.  Sometimes Jan may seem
slow, but in a rumpus he's a terror for speed, decision, and grit.  We
were heading up the White Trail, hoping to head you off, when we ran
into Jan and Valdes."

Later, at the county seat the Meadow-Brook Girls were permitted to put
their evidence against Big Charlie, whom they recognized and
identified.  Charlie was held for trial, and afterward sent back to
prison for a much longer term than his first one.

The Meadow-Brook Girls regretted parting with Janus Grubb, whom they
held in the highest esteem.  But Janus was not able to guide any one
for the next fortnight or longer, so he recommended a new guide, who
led the Meadow-Brook Girls on a long mountain "hike" over beaten
trails.  Then, at last, Harriet Burrell and her friends reluctantly
turned homeward.



***END OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE MEADOW-BROOK GIRLS IN THE
HILLS***


******* This file should be named 17865.txt or 17865.zip *******


This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
http://www.gutenberg.org/dirs/1/7/8/6/17865



Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://www.gutenberg.org/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.org),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS', WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, is critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.gutenberg.org/fundraising/pglaf.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://www.gutenberg.org/about/contact

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org

Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://www.gutenberg.org/fundraising/donate

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations.
To donate, please visit:
http://www.gutenberg.org/fundraising/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.

Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.

Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.org

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.
